BALLAST  WATER  INVASIVE  SPECIES  MANAGEMENT 

AND  THREATS  TO  CORAL  REEFS 

S.  HRG.  109–1092 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON NATIONAL OCEAN POLICY 

STUDY 
OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  15,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

62–180 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  NATIONAL  OCEAN  POLICY  STUDY 

JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

BARBARA  BOXER,  California,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 15, 2005  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Falkner,  Maurya  B.,  Program  Manager,  Marine  Invasive  Species  Program, 
California State Lands Commission (CSLC)  ......................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Gilmour, Rear Admiral Thomas H., Assistant Commandant for Marine Safety, 
Security and Environmental Protection, U.S. Coast Guard  .............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hum,  Kim,  Director,  Coastal  Marine  Program,  The  Nature  Conservancy  of 
Hawaii  ...................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Keeney,  Timothy  R.E.,  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Oceans 
and  Atmosphere,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration,  U.S. 
Department of Commerce  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Mandelman, Joel C., Vice President/General Counsel, Nutech O3, Inc.  .............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Metcalf,  Kathy  J.,  Director,  Maritime  Affairs,  Chamber  of  Shipping  of  Amer-
ica; on Behalf of the Shipping Industry Ballast Water Coalition  ....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Allen, Hon. George, U.S. Senator from Virginia, prepared statement  ................
American Waterways Operators (AWO), prepared statement  .............................
Collins, Hon. Susan M., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement  ............
Ham,  Michael  L.,  Secretariat,  United  States  All  Islands  Coral  Reef  Initiative 
Coordinating Committee (USAICRICC), prepared statement  ..........................
Levin, Hon. Carl, U.S. Senator from Michigan, prepared statement  ..................
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Barbara Boxer to: 

Maurya B. Falkner  ...........................................................................................
Rear Admiral Thomas H. Gilmour  ..................................................................
Timothy R.E. Keeney 
.......................................................................................
Kathy J. Metcalf  ...............................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Rear Admiral Thomas H. Gilmour  ..................................................................
Kim Hum  ...........................................................................................................
Timothy R.E. Keeney 
.......................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Maurya B. Falkner  ...........................................................................................
Kim Hum  ...........................................................................................................
Timothy R.E. Keeney 
.......................................................................................
Joel C. Mandelman  ...........................................................................................
Kathy J. Metcalf  ...............................................................................................
Smith,  Dr.  Celia  M.,  Professor  of  Botany,  University  of  Hawai’i,  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................

Page 
1 
2 
3 
4 
4 
1 
1 

32 
34 

16 
18 

27 
29 

20 
22 
5 
7 

12 
14 

55 
61 
57 

63 
56 

78 
72 
69 
74 

70 
76 
65 

81 
78 
70 
73 
75 

60 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

BALLAST  WATER  INVASIVE  SPECIES 

MANAGEMENT  AND  THREATS 

TO  CORAL  REEFS 

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  15,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON NATIONAL OCEAN POLICY STUDY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9:32  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  E.  Sununu, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Good  morning.  I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to 
the  first  meeting  of  the  National  Ocean  Policy  Study  in  approxi-
mately 10 years. This is a group that was created in 1974 that has 
had fairly limited activity since 1994 but it’s, obviously, a very im-
portant  mission.  The  National  Ocean  Policy  Study  is  designed  to 
investigate  the  very  diverse  and  incredibly  complicated  world  that 
covers  70  percent  of  the  Earth’s  surface.  I’m  pleased  to  be  joined 
by Senator Boxer who is the Ranking Member of the Policy Study, 
and I see Senator Inouye is here as well. I will submit my opening 
statement for the record because we do have the vote scheduled at 
10  o’clock.  I  hope  to  move  things  along.  That  will  give  us  ample 
time  to  take  all  of  the  witnesses’  testimony,  and  at  least  begin  a 
question  period.  I  want  to,  before  I  turn  it  over  to  Senator  Boxer, 
ask  unanimous  consent  that  Senator  Allen  be  allowed  to  submit  a 
statement regarding Nutech of Arlington, Virginia. I know that Dr. 
Celia Smith of the University of Hawaii was also unable to be here 
and has asked that a statement of hers be submitted for the record. 
And  without  objection  these  statements  and  the  full  written  testi-
mony *  of  all  of  our  witnesses  will  be  added  to  the  record,  and  at 
this time, I will turn it over for opening remarks to Senator Boxer. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Sununu follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Good  morning,  and  welcome  to  the  first  meeting  of  the  National  Ocean  Policy 
Study  in  over  a  decade.  Created  in  1974,  but  dormant  since  1994,  the  National 
Ocean Policy Study is designed to investigate the rich, diverse, and incredibly com-
plicated world that covers 70 percent of the Earth’s surface. 

* The information referred to has been printed in the Appendix. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

The ocean is our most plentiful and important natural resource. According to the 
U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy,  ocean-related  activities  directly  contribute  over 
$117 billion a year to the U.S. economy each year and supports over 2 million jobs. 
Our  Nation’s  ports  handle  $700  billion  a  year  in  merchandise,  the  offshore  oil  and 
gas  industry  is  valued  at  nearly  $40  billion,  and  the  fisheries  industry  is  valued  at 
close to $50 billion. 

We need to be good stewards of our oceans, protecting them for future generations 
as  we  enjoy  the  benefits  they  offer  today.  It  is  my  hope  that  the  National  Ocean 
Policy  Study  can  explore  some  of  the  many  challenges  we  face  in  maintaining  that 
balance. 

Today’s  hearing  covers  two  very  different  topics,  ballast  water  invasive  species 

management and threats to coral reefs. 

Along  with  the  $700  billion  in  merchandise  they  move,  cargo  ships  going  to  and 
from  American  ports  also  carry  small  stowaways.  These  uninvited  plants  and  ani-
mals hitch a ride around the globe, only to be dumped in a new home when a ship 
empties its ballast tanks. Many of these species are quickly killed in their new envi-
ronment, never to be heard from again. But some find their new home a virtual par-
adise,  with  plenty  of  food,  few  competitors,  and  no  natural  predators.  These  non- 
native  species  do  what  any  creature  would  do  in  a  similar  setting;  they  thrive,  cre-
ating a potentially harmful impact on their new ecosystem. Today, we’ll look at poli-
cies  designed  to  prevent  these  invasive  species  from  making  their  long  journey  to 
a new home, or at least from surviving it. 

The Coral Reef Conservation Act of 2000 is set to expire this year. Senator Inouye 
plans  to  introduce  legislation  shortly  to  reauthorize  this  program,  taking  into  ac-
count  what  we’ve  learned  about  these  complex  and  fragile  systems  in  the  past  five 
years.  It  is  my  understanding  that  Senator  Inouye  will  also  incorporate  some  of 
what we learn today. 

I  would  now  like  to  recognize  the  Ranking  Member  of  the  National  Ocean  Policy 

Study, the Senator from California. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator BOXER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, very much. I will also 
submit  my  statement  for  the  record  if  there’s  no  objection.  But  I 
would like say just one or two things in summary of it. 

First  of  all,  I  am  so  delighted  that  we  have  this  subcommittee 
and  that  you  are  chairing  it,  and  I,  you  know,  I  had  a  choice  of 
which  subcommittees  I  would  work  on  and  this  was  the  one  I  se-
lected because of my love of the oceans and also I feel very strongly 
that  you  and  I  can  work  well  together.  I  also  want  to  say  how 
proud  I  am  of  Senator  Inouye  and  that  at  this  first  hearing  we’re 
going to be discussing one of his priorities, this very important bill 
that I strongly support. And my last point is as I’ve detailed in the 
statement  that  we’ll  not  go  through  I  have  written  a  bill,  a  com-
prehensive  bill,  on  ocean  protection  that  was  inspired  by  the  two 
commissions, the Pew Commission and the U.S. Commission on the 
Oceans.  And  in  that  bill,  basically,  is  almost  detail  for  detail  this 
particular  bill  by  Senator  Inouye,  so  I  couldn’t  be  more  pleased 
about  this  and  I  hope  that  we  can  move  forward  because  I  under-
stand that my comprehensive bill, which we have shared with your 
staff  at  length,  and  with  the  staff  of  Senator  Stevens  and  Senator 
Inouye, is very broad and has some controversy, I’m not unmindful 
of  that,  but  if  we  could  look  at  bit  by  bit,  piece  by  piece,  look  at 
the  things  you  want  to  do,  look  at  the  things  I  want  to  do  and  all 
the  members  of  the  Committee,  I  think  we  can  have  a  great  year 
for  oceans  because  as  Jacques  Cousteau’s  grandson  said  at  this 
press  conference  I  had,  the  oceans  need  our  help,  they’re  in  crisis 
right  now.  And  so  there’s  not  a  lot  of  time,  we  should  act  soon.  So 
thank  you  very  much.  I,  again,  look  forward  to  working  with  you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

[The prepared statement of Senator Boxer follows:] 

3 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  may  I  begin  by  saying  how  pleased  I  am  to  be 

serving as your Ranking Member and that we are holding our first hearing. 

By reestablishing this Subcommittee, Congress is again acknowledging the impor-
tance of the oceans to our Nation’s and the world’s health, and to the economy, and 
how important it is to understand and act to lesson the threats to our oceans. 

That was underscored twice in the last two years with the release of two separate 
reports  by  two  distinguished  Commissions—the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy, 
headed  by  Admiral  Watkins,  and  the  Pew  Ocean  Commission,  headed  by  Leon  Pa-
netta. 

Last week, I introduced comprehensive legislation, the National Oceans Protection 

Act, to implement the recommendations of these two Commissions. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  look  forward  to  a  good  working  relationship  with  you  and  the 
other members of this subcommittee, and I hope we can approve good oceans legisla-
tion in this Congress. 

It is appropriate that the first two issues on deck are combating aquatic invasive 

species and protecting coral reefs. 

Harvard’s  E.O.  Wilson,  one  of  the  world’s  greatest  living  biologists,  says  that 
invasive  species  are  second  only  to  loss  of  habitat  as  the  causes  most  destructive 
to biodiversity. 

Invasive  species  destroy  habitat,  attack  native  species,  and  upset  the  ecological 

balance that has been in place for thousands and thousands of years. 

In  San  Francisco  Bay  alone,  more  than  175  invasive  species  threaten  to  over-
whelm  native  fish  and  other  wildlife—and,  nationally,  the  total  economic  damage 
of invasive species is estimated to be $137 billion each year. 

One  of  the  most  common  causes  of  invasive  species  is  ballast  water  from  ships, 
which  brings  water  from  around  the  world—including  a  host  of  creatures—into 
America’s waters. 

My comprehensive oceans bill includes new regulations on ballast water, including 
prohibiting  nearly  all  discharges  into  U.S.  waters.  My  bill  also  addresses  the  need 
for  early  detection  and  rapid  response,  including  assisting  states  in  combating 
invasive species. 

I  commend  Senator  Inouye  for  introducing  the  Ballast  Water  Management  Act. 
I  appreciate  his  leadership  on  this  issue,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  him. 
The other subject of this hearing is coral reefs. Coral reefs are critical habitat for 
ocean  creatures  and  are  home  to  potential  cures  for  human  ailments.  They  have 
been called the rainforests of the seas. 

But  warming  seas  and  warming  climate,  water  pollution,  and  harmful  fishing 

practices threaten the world’s coral reefs. 

We must reauthorize the Coral Reef Conservation Act of 2000, which was an im-
portant  start  in  promoting  scientific  research  and  sound  management  of  our  coral 
reefs. But we must go further. 

My oceans legislation contains important provisions to preserve critical coral habi-
tat, including creating Coral Management Areas to provide a higher level of protec-
tion. 

I look forward to working with my friend, Senator Lautenberg, one of the Senate’s 
true champions for our coral reefs, and other members of the Committee to advance 
protections for coral reefs this Congress. 

Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  very  pleased  to  be  your  Ranking  Member,  and  I  look 

forward to the testimony of the witnesses. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Boxer,  and  I  appreciate  the 
work  that  you’ve  done  on  the  legislation  you’ve  introduced.  It  is  a 
very  comprehensive  bill,  no  question  about  that,  but  I  think  there 
are a number of elements that we can and will address through the 
Policy  Study,  and  very  much  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to 
identify  those  pieces.  But  I  think  we’re  starting  with  a  good  one, 
the  issue  of  invasive  species  and  the  role  that  ballast  water  plays 
in  spreading  those  invasive  species  to  places  they,  obviously,  are 
not desired and can be very harmful. And with that, I’d like to turn 
it  over  to  Senator  Inouye  for  any  opening  remarks  he  might  have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator INOUYE. Mr. Chairman, I thank you for calling this hear-
ing. It’s very important. When one considers that 70 percent of this 
planet  is  water  and  we  spend  less  than  5  percent  of  the  funds 
studying  the  ocean  and  95  percent  studying  space,  something’s 
wrong. At the same time, when one considers that about 85 percent 
of all the coral reefs within the jurisdiction of the United States are 
found in the Hawaiian chain, that’s a major concern to us. In addi-
tion,  billions  of  gallons  of  ballast  water  are  literally  being  dumped 
in our ports annually. If it was just the water, that’s one thing, but 
these  ballast  waters  contain  invasive  species,  and  so  they’re  all 
over  the  world  now.  We  have  experienced  species  going  extinct  in 
our  area  and  we  want  to  do  something  to  stop  that.  I  ask  that  my 
statement  be  made  part  of  the  record.  Thank  you  very  much,  Sen-
ator. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
I  would  like  to  join  our  Chairman  in  welcoming  our  distinguished  panel  of  wit-
nesses  today,  and  to  thank  him  for  holding  this  important  hearing.  I  would  like  to 
particularly  welcome  Ms.  Kim  Hum,  of  The  Nature  Conservancy  of  Hawaii,  to  the 
hearing and to thank her for her work on coral reef conservation in the Pacific. 

Unfortunately,  I  am  all  too  familiar  with  the  problems  of  invasive  species  and 
threats  to  coral  reefs.  In  my  home  State  of  Hawaii,  the  two  often  go  together.  The 
impacts  of  such  alien  species  on  our  native  species  have  been  among  the  most  sig-
nificant in the country. 

The  United  States  Ocean  Commission  recognized  the  problem  of  invasive  species 
as one of the greatest threats to coastal environments. Invasive aquatic species have 
been  found  in  all  regions  of  the  United  States,  including  most  of  the  states  rep-
resented  on  this  Committee.  Invasive  species  are  thought  to  have  been  involved  in 
most of the extinctions of native aquatic species. 

The Commission also called for expanded national and international action to ad-

dress increasing threats to coral reefs, including those posed by invasive species. 

Ballast  water  from  ships  is  one  of  the  largest  pathways  for  the  introduction  and 
spread  of  aquatic  invasive  species.  It  has  been  estimated  that  some  10,000  non-in-
digenous  aquatic  organisms  travel  around  the  globe  each  day  in  the  ballast  water 
of cargo ships, and billions of gallons of ballast water are discharged in U.S. waters 
each year. The problem is not only from ballast water, but also invasive species that 
travel on the hulls and other parts of ships. 

The  direct  and  indirect  costs  of  aquatic  invasive  species  to  the  economy  of  the 
United  States  are  also  staggering,  and  have  been  estimated  to  amount  to  billions 
of  dollars  per  year.  We  need  to  find  a  solution  to  this  problem,  while  at  the  same 
time ensuring that our maritime industry can continue to operate in a cost-effective 
manner. 

Existing law does not provide the legal authority needed to effectively address this 
problem. That is why I introduced the Ballast Water Management Act of 2005. The 
bill  establishes  standards  for  ballast  water  treatment  that  will  be  effective,  but  on 
a  schedule  that  our  maritime  fleet  can  realistically  achieve.  It  recognizes  safety  as 
a  paramount  concern,  and  allows  flexibility  in  ballast  exchange  practices  to  safe-
guard vessels and their passengers and crew. 

Looking  to  the  future,  the  bill  will  also  encourage  the  development  and  adoption 
of  new  ballast  water  treatment  technologies,  as  well  as  innovative  technologies  to 
address other vessel sources of invasive species such as hull fouling, through a grant 
program. 

Coral  reef  resources  are,  of  course,  central  to  life  in  Hawaii,  where  we  rely  on 
them  to  sustain  our  fisheries,  attract  and  retain  tourism,  and  protect  our  coastal 
communities  during  extreme  weather  events.  Reef-related  tourism  and  fishing  ac-
tivities  directly  generate  $360  million  each  year  for  Hawaii’s  economy,  and  coral 
reefs  are  the  lynchpin  for  Hawaii’s  entire  tourism  industry,  valued  at  over  $10  bil-
lion. Hawaii and other areas of the Pacific boast some of the most beautiful and ex-
otic reefs on the planet, but they are threatened by a variety of impacts, from global 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

warming  and  vessel  groundings,  to  invasives,  pollution,  and  overharvesting.  These 
impacts  are  even  more  apparent  in  the  Western  Pacific,  where  communities  may 
rely almost exclusively on coral reefs and associated resources for economic survival. 
We  are  particularly  fortunate  to  have  the  Northwestern  Hawaiian  Islands  as  a 
laboratory  for  the  study  and  protection  of  coral  reefs.  This  remote  and  uninhabited 
area,  1,200  nautical  miles  long  by  100  nautical  miles  wide,  contains  unparalleled 
resources for scientists and others concerned with coral ecosystem protection. 

Congressional support for designation of this area as the largest National Marine 
Sanctuary  in  the  world  has  given  us  the  opportunity  to  map,  monitor,  assess,  and 
explore  these  vast  regions  and  habitats.  The  Sanctuary  will  help  us  build  our  base 
of  knowledge  to  improve  restoration  and  conservation  of  coral  reefs  around  the 
world. 

The  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  of  2000,  which  Senator  Snowe  and  I  developed 
5  years  ago,  helped  us  begin  to  identify  our  national  coral  reef  resources,  assess 
their condition and current threats, develop a national action strategy, and mobilize 
states,  territories  and  the  Federal  Government  to  address  the  problem.  Today,  we 
see how far we have come, and how far we still need to go. 

In  our  reauthorization  of  the  Act,  we  must  increase  and  focus  funding  on  coral 
protection and conservation, and provide new authorities to prevent and respond to 
coral  reef  damage.  We  need  to  bring  private  and  public  resources  together  at  the 
local level to ensure full community participation in protecting and conserving these 
sensitive  areas.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  my  colleagues  to  pass  this  much 
needed reauthorization. 

I  am  very  pleased  that  we  have  assembled  this  group  of  experts  today  to  discuss 

these very important issues. I look forward to your testimony. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  have  a  list  of  our  wit-
nesses  and  I  will  go,  for  the  sake  of  organization,  from  my  left  to 
right  as  we  take  your  testimony.  We’ll  have  each  witness  summa-
rize  their  remarks  as  they  would  desire  and  go  through  all  of  the 
testimony before opening it up to questions. 

Our first witness is Joel Mandelman, Vice President and General 
Counsel  of  Nutech.  I  know  that  Senator  Allen  has  presented  some 
information  already  for  the  record,  but  we  welcome  you  here  and 
ask you to provide your testimony. 

STATEMENT OF JOEL C. MANDELMAN, VICE PRESIDENT/ 

GENERAL COUNSEL, NUTECH O3, INC. 

Mr. MANDELMAN. Thank you. First, we do want to thank Senator 
Inouye  and  Senator  Stevens,  for  introducing  the  legislation.  It’s 
desperately  needed,  and  we  thank  you  for  scheduling  the  hearing 
because  this  is,  obviously,  the  first  step  in  getting  the  bill  passed. 
We  hope  this  bill  does  pass,  preferably  with  several  amendments, 
which I’ll discuss in a couple of minutes. 

It’s been our impression over the years that one reason Congress 
has been somewhat reluctant to move legislation of this type is the 
belief  that  there  was  no  technology  available  that  would  solve  the 
problem.  The  first  thing  I  want  to  discuss  with  the  Committee 
today is the fact that a solution is available, it would be here very 
shortly.  So  I’d  like  to  spend  a  couple  of  minutes  discussing  how 
Nutech’s  ozone  injection  technology  works  so  that  the  members  of 
the Senate, and hopefully the House, will feel confident that a solu-
tion is available and that it meets the bill’s requirements. 

We’ve  been  working  with  British  Petroleum  for  8  years  to  de-
velop ozone injection technology. What it involves is injecting ozone 
into  the  ship’s  ballast  water  as  the  ballast  water  is  taken  onboard 
the  ship.  The  ozone  kills  invasive  species  in  two  ways.  First,  di-
rectly on contact; it will kill about half of the invasive species with-
in 5 seconds of it being injected into the sea water. Then the ozone 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

begins  to  disintegrate,  it  reverts  to  oxygen  so  it’s  not  creating  a 
safety problem either on the ship or to the sea water. 

Second,  ozone  interacts  with  bromide  ions.  Bromide  ions  natu-
rally occur in sea water all over the world. The ozone oxidizes those 
ions  and  turns  them  into  hypobromous  acid.  What  the  ozone  did 
not kill, the hypobromous acid will kill. Then the hypobromous acid 
breaks  down,  probably  breaking  down  faster  in  sunlight  as  it’s 
spread  over  the  surface  of  the  water,  but  testing  that  we  will  be 
conducting  later  this  year  will  develop  definitive  data  that  we  can 
submit to the Committee on that point. 

But  the  bottom  line  is,  the  treated  ballast  water  will  not  harm 
the  quality  of  the  water  into  which  it  is  discharged.  Also,  previous 
testing  proved  that  ozone  will  not  harm  the  hull  of  a  ship,  it  does 
not  increase  the  corrosion  rate  of  a  ship  and,  in  fact,  may  in  some 
instances  decrease  it  because  as  the  ozone  kills  bacteria  that  form 
in  and  around  wells.  It’s  the  bacteria  that  secretes  acid  that  cause 
a lot of corrosion. As those bacteria are destroyed the corrosion rate 
decreases.  We’ve  been  working  on  this  for  really  5  years  now.  We 
have  had  one  set  of  our  equipment  on  a  BP  tanker  that  regularly 
transports  Trans-Alaska  Pipeline  oil  from  Valdez  to  refineries  in 
California  and  Washington.  We  will  be  putting  a  refined,  and  far 
less expensive, version of that technology on a second BP oil tanker 
in September. If the weather holds, we’ll have at least some defini-
tive  final  test  results  for  Congress  in  December,  and  then  every-
body can feel absolutely confident that this has been proven under 
real  world  operating  conditions  on  a  real  ship  that  carries  12  mil-
lion  or  more  gallons  of  ballast  water.  So  if  it  works  there,  it  will 
work anywhere. 

That having been said, and we do support the bill, we would urge 
that the Committee adopt several amendments to it. The most im-
portant  of  these  is  an  early  start  date.  The  bill  as  it  now  stands 
wouldn’t  require  anybody  to  comply  with  it  before  2009,  and  in 
some cases not till 2016. We feel this is extremely unwise. The pol-
lution  problem  caused  by  invasive  species  is  growing  day  by  day. 
If technology is available, ours will be, we believe some of our com-
petitors  will  have  technology  on  the  market,  ships  should  be  re-
quired  to  install  it  a  great  deal  sooner.  What  we’re  recommending 
is  18  months  after  the  Coast  Guard  certifies  the  first  technology, 
that’s when ships should be required to install it. 

Third,  we  see  absolutely  no  logical  reason,  and  certainly  not  in 
terms  of  protecting  the  environment,  to  exclude  from  the  statute 
ships  that  are  already  in  service.  As  S.  363  and  the  IMO  Treaty 
are now drafted, only new ships would be required to install ballast 
water  treatment  equipment.  This  is  a  serious  mistake.  All  ships 
that have any reasonable useful life in them should be required to 
install the equipment. 

Fourth, we suggest that the Coast Guard’s STEP Program, which 
was  an  incentive  to  get  people  to  install  equipment  prior  to  the 
start  date  or  the  implementation  date,  be  expanded.  As  the  pro-
gram now stands only five or six ships a year at most could partici-
pate. We think every ship owner should be allowed to have 15, 20, 
maybe  25  ships  in  the  program  using  either  the  same  technology 
or  different  technologies  because  you  want  to  encourage  the  ship 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

owners  to  do  something  they  will  not  otherwise  do  until  they  are 
legislatively forced to do it. 

Fifth,  the  method  of  determining  compliance.  The  bill  con-
templates  doing  bacteria  counts.  We  think,  and  from  scientists  we 
have  talked  to,  there  are  some  significant  problems  in  getting  rep-
resentative  samples,  let’s  say  out  of  12  million  gallons  of  ballast 
water,  which  is  probably  an  amount  of  water  several  times  larger 
than  required  to  fill  this  room.  If  you’re  just  taking  four  or  five 
samples that is not scientifically representative of anything. 

At  a  minimum,  we  urge  that  you  adopt  an  additional  testing 
standard.  For  example,  total  residual  oxidants,  that  is  finding  in 
the  treated  ballast  water  a  residual  of  the  treatment  chemical. 
With  most  of  these  chemicals,  if  there  is  any  chemical  left,  that 
means  you’ve  killed  all  of  the  critters  that  you  want  to  get  rid  of 
because  if  they  were  still  alive  they  would  have  consumed  the 
chemical. 

This  kind  of  testing  can  be  done  with  automated  equipment,  it 
can be done with tamper-proof equipment that just relays the data 
to the Port Authority, to EPA, to the Coast Guard. 

As  an  alternative  to  that,  we  would  strongly  suggest  that  once 
Coast  Guard-certified  equipment  is  installed  on  the  ship,  the  cap-
tain  of  the  ship  signs  a  certification,  under  oath,  under  penalty  of 
perjury,  that  the  treatment  equipment  operated,  that  it  was  oper-
ating  as  certified  for  the  amount  of  time  that  the  manufacturer 
said  was  needed  to  treat  the  ballast  water,  and  that  certification 
should  be  sufficient.  Then  allow  the  Coast  Guard,  EPA,  the  Port 
Authority  to  conduct  look-behind  microbe  counts  on  a  periodic 
basis, once every 6 months, once every year. 

The  Committee  needs  to  understand  that  doing  microbe  counts, 
aside from the problems I just discussed, is a time-consuming, very 
expensive  operation.  You  can’t  do  it  onboard  the  ship,  you  must 
take  water  samples  from  the  ship,  transport  them  to  a  laboratory, 
and then do the count, and that must be done by hand. There’s no 
computer  technology  that  would  enable  somebody  to  do  a  microbe 
count.  You  literally  sit  there,  counting  critters  on  a  little  piece  of 
microscopic-size graph paper. This can take weeks. Obviously, that 
is not a very effective means on a trip-by-trip basis of proving that 
a  ship  complied  with  the  treatment  requirements.  You  need  an  al-
ternative. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Mandelman,  I’m  going  to  ask  you  to  submit 
any  further  testimony  for  the  record.  We  are  working  under  a  5- 
minute clock and I would like to make sure as much time is avail-
able  before  the  vote  for  all  of  the  witnesses  to  provide  testimony. 
I  very  much  appreciate  your  remarks  and  understanding  of  the 
problem. I think the lights are self-explanatory and there are a full 
5  minutes  available  and  I  won’t  shortchange  anyone.  You  can  rest 
assured. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mandelman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOEL C. MANDELMAN, VICE PRESIDENT/GENERAL COUNSEL, 

NUTECH O3, INC. 

I. The Need for Ballast Water Treatment Legislation 

A. We commend Senator Stevens and Senator Inouye for taking the lead in spon-
soring  the  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  and  in  moving  the  legislation  closer  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

passage.  The  invasive  species  problem  requires  a  prompt  solution.  Invasive  aquatic 
nuisance  species  threaten  water  quality,  power  plants,  municipal  water  treatment 
systems,  and  ships  throughout  the  United  States.  Prompt  Congressional  action  is 
required  to  solve  what  is  an  acknowledged,  and  worsening,  worldwide  environ-
mental and public health problem. 

One  of  the  major  barriers  to  the  development  of  treatment  technologies  has  been 
the absence of definitive invasive species legislation and regulations. Without those 
clear guideposts, many prospective investors have been reluctant to commit venture 
capital to the small businesses that are the principal developers of the technological 
solutions for this problem. Ironically, passage of effective invasive species legislation 
has been delayed, in major part, by concerns that treatment technology was unavail-
able  and  that  ship  owners,  therefore,  could  not  meet  the  proposed  law’s  ballast 
water treatment requirements. 

That concern is no longer valid. 
Nutech  O3  has  worked  closely  with  British  Petroleum,  since  1998,  to  develop  an 
effective means of killing dangerous aquatic nuisance species found in all ships’ bal-
last  water  operating  on  the  high  seas;  we  anticipate  having  comparable  data,  and 
results,  for  vessels  operating  on  the  Great  Lakes  next  Spring.  Testing  of  our  ozone 
injection  technology  began  in  2000,  with  the  installation  of  a  prototype  system  on 
the  125,000  Dead  Weight  Ton  (DWT)  BP  oil  tanker,  T/V  Tonsina.  This  ship  regu-
larly  transports  Trans-Alaska  pipeline  oil  from  Valdez,  Alaska,  to  refineries  in 
Washington  and  California.  Testing  has  continued,  both  onboard  ship  and  by  the 
University of Washington at its Merrowstone Test Facility. 

All  of  the  on-board  ship  and  laboratory  testing  was  conducted  by  an  independent 
team  of  scientists  and  engineers  from  the  University  of  North  Carolina—Wil-
mington,  the  University  of  Washington,  the  University  of  Western  Washington,  the 
Department of the Interior—Fish and Wildlife Service, the Smithsonian Institution’s 
Environmental  Research  Center  in  Edgewater,  Maryland,  ENSR,  Inc.  of  Greeley, 
Colorado, Parametrix Inc. of Corvallis, Oregon, and Northeast Technical Services of 
Olmsted Falls, Ohio. 

The  Research  Team’s  report  was  released  in  June  2002.  Their  report  dem-
onstrated that the injection of ozone into a ship’s ballast water is an effective means 
of  killing  unwanted  invasive  species  without  damaging  the  quality  of  the  receiving 
water  into  which  the  treated  water  is  discharged.  The  report’s  primary  conclusion 
was that ozone could serve as an effective biocide in the removal of invasive species 
from  sea  water,  but  (inferentially)  that  the  technology  required  refinement  before 
it would be commercially viable. 

The  Ballast  Water  Research  Team’s  report  also  proved  that  ozone,  when  it  is  in-
jected  into  sea  water,  forms  various  bromine  compounds.  This  Total  Residual  Oxi-
dant (TRO) typically decays over a 24 to 48 hour period after injection. 

An  earlier  report,  prepared  by  the  La  Que  Institute  for  Corrosion  Technology,  of 
Wrightsville  Beach,  North  Carolina,  demonstrated  that  ozonated  water  will  not  in-
crease  the  rate  of  corrosion  of  a  ship’s  hull  or  impact  the  ship’s  sacrificial  zinc 
anode.  It  should  also  be  noted  that  the  introduction  of  ozone  and  bromine  com-
pounds  to  the  ballast  water  inhibits  oxygen  thriving  colonies  of  bacteria  that  exist 
in weld areas. Those bacterial colonies are a major cause of corrosion. 

B.  Last  year,  Congress  earmarked  $1.7  million  for  the  development  of  an  ad-
vanced, more technologically efficient and affordable version of our technology. With 
the assistance of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, Nutech will 
install  an  advanced  version  of  this  ozone  injection  technology  on  a  second  BP  oil 
tanker, the 140,000 DWT, T/V Prince William Sound, in September 2005. This im-
proved  version  of  this  technology  will  cost  approximately  65  percent  less  to  build 
and  install  than  the  original  version,  the  installation  time  will  be  sharply  reduced 
and  it  may  be  possible  to  perform  most  (if  not  all)  of  the  installation  work  without 
taking  the  ship  out  of  service.  All  of  this  testing  will  be  completed  no  later  than 
the  Spring  of  2006  and,  if  favorable  weather  conditions  exist,  it  may  be  completed 
before that time. 

NOAA  has  established  an  Advisory  Panel,  to  work  with  Nutech  and  the  Ballast 
Water Research Team, to assist in the development of the Testing Protocol that will 
be  used  during  the  Prince  William  Sound  test  series.  This  Advisory  Panel  includes 
representatives from the U.S. Coast Guard, the U.S. Navy, the Fish & Wildlife Serv-
ice,  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency,  the  California  State  Lands  Commission, 
the  Washington  State  Department  of  Fish  &  Wildlife,  the  Chamber  of  Shipping  of 
America  and  British  Maritime  Technologies,  a  major  ship  design  and  engineering 
firm. 

Nutech  is  confident  that  it  has  developed  an  effective  and  affordable  solution  to 
the invasive species problem. Therefore, we strongly urge that the Commerce Com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

mittee,  and  the  Senate,  promptly  enact  the  Inouye-Stevens  Ballast  Water  Manage-
ment Act, with the changes that we recommend. 

C.  Nutech’s  Ballast  Water  Treatment  System  will  pay  for  itself,  in  operational 
cost  savings,  within  12  to  18  months  of  its  installation.  Our  cost  savings  estimate 
is  based  on  data  published  by  the  Coast  Guard,  in  its  March  2003  ANPRM.  This 
data  showed  that  a  deep  ocean  ballast  water  exchange  costs  a  ship  owner  between 
$16,000 and $80,000, per exchange. This is a shipping industry trade association es-
timate. Since the typical tanker or freighter has a useful life exceeding 30 years and, 
typically, conducts at least one ballast water exchange a month, the savings will run 
into the millions of dollars over the ship’s life. 
II. Suggested Changes to the Ballast Water Management Act 
Amendment #1—Speeding Up the Compliance Timetable 

Premised on the availability of effective treatment technology, we, therefore, think 
that  it  would  be  reasonable  to  move  up  the  implementation  date  from  the  distant 
schedule  contained  in  the  IMO  Treaty  and  carried  over  into  S.  363.  Under  our  rec-
ommendation,  all  affected  ship  owners  would  have  18  months  after  the  date  on 
which the Coast Guard certifies the availability of an effective treatment technology 
to install it on their ships. 

Since  we  believe  that  our  technology,  and  those  of  some  of  our  competitors,  can 
be installed without taking the ship out of service or, at most taking it out of service 
for only a few days, the prompt installation of many treatment technologies will not 
impose  a  financial  burden  on  ship  owners  while  rapidly  improving  the  quality  of 
local water supplies. 
Amendment  #2—Encouraging 

the  Installation  of  Ballast  Water  Treatment 

Technology Before the Bill’s Initial 2009 Compliance Date 

Invasive  species  pose  an  increasing  threat  to  water  quality.  Therefore,  Congress 
should take all available steps necessary to encourage ship owners to install ballast 
water treatment equipment at the earliest practicable date, prior to the bill’s initial 
planned implementation date of 2009. 

Therefore,  the  technology  incentive  provisions  of  the  Ballast  Water  Management 
Act, carried over from the IMO Treaty, need to be significantly modified. The appli-
cation  process  was  too  cumbersome  and  it  is  limited  to  only  5  or  6  ships  a  year. 
As currently drafted, those provisions will discourage ship owners from participating 
in  a  program  in  which  the  maximum  number  of  ships,  and  ship  owners,  should  be 
encouraged to participate. 

We recommend that the Commerce Committee take the Coast Guard’s STEP Pro-
gram, issued in January 2004, and expand its more generous scope (more generous 
in comparison to the IMO Treaty’s parallel provisions) to allow a far larger number 
of  ships,  operated  by  the  same  ship  owner,  to  participate  in  the  experimental  tech-
nology program. 

More importantly, in terms of encouraging ship owners to participate in the STEP 
Program,  we  recommend  that  anyone  installing  approved  technology  prior  to  the 
bill’s  mandatory  implementation  date  be  permanently  grandfathered,  i.e.,  perma-
nently deemed to be in compliance with statutory or regulatory treatment standards 
even  if  the  standards  become  more  stringent  in  later  years.  For  both  reasons,  we 
believe  that  this  proposal  will  offer  ship  owners  the  necessary  economic  incentives 
to  install  treatment  technology  well  ahead  of  the  bill’s  stretched  out  compliance 
deadlines. 

Without this proposal, the invasive species problem will unnecessarily worsen be-
fore the shipping industry starts to use the technological solutions now available to 
it.  With  them,  it  will  be  far  more  likely  that  ship  owners  will  take  the  lead  in  in-
stalling  treatment  technology  before  the  contemplated  compliance  dates,  instead  of 
waiting  until  the  last  possible  minute  to  do  so.  With  it,  technology  vendors  will  be 
encouraged  to  bring  new  treatment  technologies  to  the  market  more  quickly.  And 
investors,  who  have  mostly  remained  on  the  sidelines,  waiting  for  regulatory  agen-
cies,  and  the  Congress,  to  establish  the  rules  of  the  game,  will  be  encouraged  to 
bring venture capital to the market which, until now, they have been very reluctant 
to do. 
Amendment  #3—Additional  Means  of  Verifying  Compliance  With  Ballast  Water 

Treatment Requirements 

In terms of enforcing the bill’s treatment requirements, it is essential that a ship 
captain’s ability to prove to the Coast Guard that the ship has complied with those 
requirements  be  temporally  and  economically  feasible.  This  is  especially  critical  if 
proof of treatment must be presented each time a ship enters a port and discharges 
ballast water or has done so inside the Exclusive Economic Zone. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Conducting microbe counts is not a practical or economical means of proving that 
compliance,  especially  on  a  multiple  trip,  or  multiple  port  entry  basis.  Such  counts 
are very expensive. They require trained, scientific personnel. Expensive laboratory 
equipment is required. Moreover, it can take several days to transport ballast water 
samples  from  a  ship  to  a  laboratory.  The  microbe  count  could  rapidly  increase  (or 
decrease)  during  shipping,  thus  providing  inaccurate  results  to  an  enforcement 
agency. For all of these reasons, such counts cannot routinely be conducted onboard 
a ship. 

Moreover,  it  is  very  doubtful  that  taking  a  few  ballast  water  samples,  even  from 
widely dispersed areas of a ballast tank, is a statistically accurate method for prov-
ing  that  the  ballast  water  has  been  treated  to  a  specific  microbe  per-cubic-meter  of 
water standard. A typical oil tanker carries 12 to 18 million gallons of ballast water 
in a ship that has ballast water compartments running the entire length, width and 
height of a ship that may be 900 or more feet long, 100 or more feet wide, and 100 
or  more  feet  high.  It  is  highly  improbable  that  a  few  gallons  of  water  taken  ran-
domly  from  those  ballast  tanks  will  be  representative  of  the  content  of  the  ship’s 
ballast water. This is especially so since it is practically impossible to take samples 
from tanks immediately above the bottom of the ship’s hull. 

While  it  may  be  desirable  to  perform  such  sampling  annually,  or  on  some  other 
periodic  basis,  to  establish  another  reference  point  for  gauging  the  effectiveness  of 
a treatment system, it is not practical to do so during every port entry. Our testing 
has proven that the presence of a Total Residual Oxidant (TRO) is an effective and 
scientifically accepted methodology for proving that ballast water has been properly 
treated.  This  identical  methodology  has  been  in  use,  for  decades,  to  prove  that 
drinking water has been properly chlorinated (or, these days, ozonated) pursuant to 
the Safe Drinking Water Act’s Surface Water Treatment Regulations. 

It has also been suggested that after the Coast Guard certified that a given tech-
nology  meets  the  established  treatment  standard,  that  the  ship’s  captain  certifying 
that  the  approves  equipment  was  in  operation  for  the  required  time  period  be  ac-
cepted as proof of compliance. 

Testing  for  the  required  level  of  a  TRO  is  easily  performed.  Nutech,  for  example, 
can  provide  customers  with  off-the-shelf,  automated,  equipment  that  will  measure 
TRO  levels  as  the  system  is  in  use.  This  is  less  difficult,  and  less  time  consuming, 
than  testing  a  swimming  pool’s  water  for  the  proper  level  of  chlorine.  Use  of  this 
testing  procedure  is  not  limited  to  ozone  injection  treatment  technology.  This  tech-
nique  should  work  as  well  with  other  biocides  producing  bio-chemical  residuals. 
Thus, requiring that the Coast Guard (and EPA) accept TRO levels as proof of com-
pliance would not give Nutech a competitive advantage over other biocide-based tech-
nologies. 

In any event, nothing in draft amendment #3 would preclude the Coast Guard (or 
EPA)  from  conducting  microbe  counts  on  an  annual  basis  as  a  back  up  means  of 
certifying or recertifying the effectiveness of any given ballast water treatment tech-
nology,  assuming  that  accurate  sampling  methodology  can  be  established.  Finally, 
this  amendment  requires  that  state  regulatory  agencies  also  accept,  as  conclusive, 
whatever  test  data  are  acceptable  to  the  Coast  Guard  as  proof  of  compliance  with 
parallel state regulations. 
Amendment #4—Ballast Water Management Act Should Be the Exclusive Legislative 

Authority for Regulating Ballast Water Discharges 

We  understand  the  Chamber  of  Shipping  of  America  has  urged  the  adoption  of 
an  amendment  that  would  make  it  explicitly  clear  that  the  Ballast  Water  Manage-
ment  Act  provides  the  sole  legislative  authority  for  mandating  the  treatment,  and 
regulating  the  discharge,  of  ballast  water.  This  proposal  would  prevent  conflicting 
regulation of such discharges under the Clean Water Act. We strongly support adop-
tion of that proposal. 

We also support the Chamber’s proposal that Congress preempt this area of envi-
ronmental regulation and bar the enforcement of any conflicting, or more stringent, 
State  ballast  water  treatment  regulations  such  as  those  enacted  by  Michigan  and 
California. 

Amendment #1—S. 363 

Delete  the  Implementation  Schedule,  page  21  line  3  through  page  22,  line  4  and 

insert, in lieu thereof, the following: 

(3) Implementation Schedule—Paragraph (1) applies to vessels in accordance with 

the following schedule and procedures. 

(D) Effective Date—The effective date of this Act shall be January 1, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

(E) Vessels Required to Treat Ballast Water—All covered vessels in operation on, 
or  after,  the  effective  date  of  this  Act  shall  be  required  to  install  ballast  water 
treatment  equipment  no  later  than  18  months  after  the  Coast  Guard  certifies 
that at least one technology or process meets the treatment standards set forth 
contained in section (f). 
(F) Excluded Vessels—The following vessels shall not be required to install bal-
last water treatment equipment: 

(i) Any vessel that initially entered service 25 years, or more, prior to the ef-
fective date of this Act. 
(ii) Any vessel of less than 1,000 Gross Registered Tons. 
(iii)  Any  vessel  that,  in  the  ordinary  course  of  its  operations,  does  not  carry 
ballast water. 
(iv) Combat vessels of the Navy and the Coast Guard unless they are required 
to  treat  ballast  water  pursuant  to  regulations  subsequently  adopted  by  the 
Navy or the Coast Guard. Vessels that primarily carry cargo for military use 
shall  be  required  to  treat  their  ballast  water  in  accordance  with  section  (f). 
(v) Comparable vessels of foreign Navies. 

Amendment #2—S. 363 

Strike  from  Page  23,  line  3  though  page  24,  line  7  all  of  the  section  entitled 
‘‘Delay of Application for Vessel Participating in Promising Technology Evaluations,’’ 
and insert, in lieu thereof, the following: 

(5)  Experimental  Testing  and  Approval  of  Ballast  Water  Treatment  Equipment— 

Permanent Use Testing and Certification of treatment Equipment. 

(A) In General—The Coast Guard shall continue in effect the Shipboard Evalua-
tion & Testing Program (STEP Program) established in the Coast Guard’s Navi-
gation  and  Vehicle  Inspection  Circular,  NVIC  01–04,  of  January  2004,  subject 
only  to  the  revisions  set  forth  in  subsection  (B).  The  STEP  Program  shall  not 
be  discontinued  or  otherwise  modified,  except  as  provided  herein,  without  the 
express authorization of the Congress. 
(B)  Modifications  to  NVIC  01–04—The  Coast  Guard’s  NVIC  01–04  is  modified, 
as follows: 

(1)  Any  ship  entering  the  Exclusive  Economic  Zone  of  the  United  States  in-
cluding the waters of Alaska, and also including the Great Lakes, the Hudson 
River,  the  Mississippi  River  or  any  tributary  thereof,  shall  be  eligible  to  par-
ticipate  in  this  program  irrespective  of  the  country  in  which  it  is  registered 
or in which its owner is incorporated or organized. 
(2) Each vessel owner or operator wishing to participate in the STEP Program 
shall  file  with  the  Coast  Guard  a  single  application  for  each  technology  it 
wishes  to  use.  That  application  shall  apply  to  as  many  as  fifteen  (15)  ships 
of the same or similar design, irrespective of the ship’s ballast water capacity 
provided  the  vessel  regularly  operates  carrying  not  less  than  500,000  gallons 
of ballast water. 
(3)  A  ship  owner  or  operator  may  have  in  the  STEP  Program  no  more  than 
twenty-five  (25)  vessels  of  all  designs  and  sizes,  using  differing  technologies, 
at any one time. 

(C)  Authorization—There  is  authorized  $100,000,000  for  Fiscal  Years  2006  and 
2007, to pay for the establishment and operation of such test facilities, and the 
hiring of personnel, as the Coast Guard determines may be required to fully op-
erate the STEP Program. 
(D)  Use  of  Independent  Testing  Laboratories  Required—The  Coast  Guard  is  di-
rected to employ independent, non-governmental laboratories and personnel for 
the  purpose  of  evaluating  and  certifying  ballast  water  treatment  technologies 
and  equipment  at  least  until  such  time  as  the  Coast  Guard  has  established, 
equipped, and staffed a sufficient number of government operated test facilities 
so  that  any  technology  or  equipment  vendor  submitting  equipment  for  testing 
and  certification  has  that  process  completed  within  sixty  (60)  calendar  days  of 
its submission to the Coast Guard. 
(E)  Standing  to  Sue—Any  equipment  vendor  whose  equipment  or  technology  is 
rejected  for  use  in  the  STEP  Program,  or  which  the  Coast  Guard  or  the  Envi-
ronmental  Protection  Agency,  refuses  to  certify,  or  decertifies,  for  permanent 
use onboard a vessel, shall have standing to file suit, pursuant to the provisions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

of  the  Administrative  Procedures  Act,  for  injunctive  relief  or  such  other  relief 
as  is  authorized  by  Federal  law.  Such  suit  may  be  filed  in  the  district  court  in 
which  the  aggrieved  party  maintains  its  principal  place  of  business  or  in  the 
United States District Court for the District of Columbia. 
(F)  Applicability—The  foregoing  provisions  supersede  any  conflicting  provisions 
of  NVIC  01–04,  or  any  subsequent  modifications  thereto,  and  supersede  any 
regulations heretofore issued by the Coast Guard, or by any other agency of the 
United  States,  pertaining  to  the  testing  of  any  type  of  ballast  water  treatment 
equipment or process in any pilot or experimental testing program or for perma-
nent installation on any vessel subject to this Act. 

Amendment #3—S. 363 

On  page  20,  after  line  13  insert  a  new  subsection  (2)  and  renumber  the  existing 

subsections accordingly: 

(2) Verification of Compliance Methodologies— 

(a) The Coast Guard shall conduct, not more than once in any 12 month period, 
an actual microbe count after the operation of a vessel’s ballast water treatment 
technology,  during  the  vessel’s  regular  operation,  to  determine  if  the  ballast 
water  treatment  equipment  is  treating  the  ballast  water  to  the  standard  set 
forth in section (1). 
(b)  For  purposes  of  determining  compliance  at  all  other  times  during  a  vessel’s 
actual operation the Coast Guard, the Environmental Protection Agency, and all 
state regulatory agencies, shall accept as conclusive proof of the required treat-
ment of the vessel’s ballast water: 

(i) An actual microbe count demonstrating compliance with the standards set 
forth  in  section  (1)  that  is  conducted  in  accordance  with  generally  accepted 
scientific testing methodologies; or, 
(ii) The presence of Total Residual Oxidant (TRO), or other residual chemical 
in the treated ballast water, at a level consistent with the killing of the orga-
nisms  required  to  be  removed  from  that  ballast  water,  that  is  conducted  in 
accordance with generally accepted scientific testing methodologies; 
(iii)  Any  other  verification  standard  or  methodology  that  is  scientifically  ac-
ceptable  to  the  Coast  Guard  that  is  conducted  in  accordance  with  generally 
accepted scientific testing methodologies; or, 
(iv)  In  lieu  of  any  of  the  foregoing,  the  Coast  Guard,  the  Environmental  Pro-
tection  Agency  and  any  State  regulatory  agency  may  accept  as  proof  of  oper-
ational compliance with the treatment requirements of section (1) that: (I) the 
treatment  equipment  was  certified  by  the  Coast  Guard  as  meeting  the  treat-
ment  standards  of  section  (1);  and  (II)  that  the  vessel’s  captain  affidavit  and 
supporting  written  documentation  showing  that  the  vessel’s  ballast  water 
treatment  system  was  in  operation  for  the  period  of  time  required  pursuant 
to its certification by the Coast Guard, to treat the ballast water to the stand-
ards required by section (1). 

Senator SUNUNU. Our next witness is Kathy Metcalf, Director of 
Maritime  Affairs  for  the  Chamber  of  Shipping  of  America.  Wel-
come. 

STATEMENT  OF  KATHY  J.  METCALF,  DIRECTOR,  MARITIME 
AFFAIRS, CHAMBER OF SHIPPING OF AMERICA; ON BEHALF 
OF THE SHIPPING INDUSTRY BALLAST WATER COALITION 
Ms. METCALF. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Senator Boxer, Senator 
Inouye.  I’m  here  today  on  behalf  of  the  Shipping  Industry  Ballast 
Water  Coalition.  And  we  are  pleased  to  be  able  to  testify  in  sup-
port,  with  a  few  exceptions,  of  Senator  Inouye’s  Senate  Bill  363, 
and finally downloaded just last night off the GPO website, Senator 
Boxer,  your  S.  1224  bill,  while  we  have  not  had  a  chance  to  go 
through  the  entire  bill,  but  certainly  we’ve  looked  at  the  ballast 
water section. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Our coalition is an informal organization of maritime trade asso-
ciations  and  companies  that  own,  operate,  and  charter  all  types  of 
vessels engaged in domestic and international trade and represent, 
essentially,  over  90  percent  of  large  commercial  vessels  that  are 
trading  in  U.S.  waters.  And  by  virtue  of  the  membership  of  the 
American  Association  of  Port  Authorities,  the  Coalition  also  rep-
resents the ports to which these vessels trade. 

Due  to  the  time  limitations  I  will  make  one  comment  that  while 
the testimony we provide today highlights the agreement by a vast 
majority  of  our  coalition,  our  members  would  respectfully  request 
the opportunity to provide written comments to the record for addi-
tional information or points they may wish to make. 

General comments. We congratulate Senator Inouye and Senator 
Boxer for taking the lead on this issue in a way that the Coalition 
is very supportive of. Senators, your two bills are the only bills that 
we have seen thus far, and I’ve been working on this issue for over 
8  years,  which  most  closely  resemble  the  recently  agreed  to  IMO 
Convention. The Coalition always has and will continue to support 
prompt  enactment—let’s  don’t  slow  the  process  down—but  prompt 
enactment  of  a  national  ballast  water  management  program  that 
reflects,  to  the  maximum  extent  possible,  the  substantive  provi-
sions  of  this  international  agreement.  While  we  note  that,  Senator 
Inouye, your bill and, Senator Boxer, yours as well, reflects a num-
ber  of  these  similarities,  there  are  five  issues  that  we  would  like 
to point out that the industry has some concern with. 

First,  the  Coalition  would  support  altering  the  performance 
standard  as  currently  contained  in  the  bills  to  reflect  the  IMO 
standard.  In  the  current  proposals  your  performance  standards, 
Senator,  are  a  hundred  times  more  stringent  than  what  the  inter-
national  community  has  agreed  is  reasonably  achievable  in  the 
near  and  medium  term.  And,  in  fact,  with  no  disrespect  of  Mr. 
Mandelman  because  the  ships  that  he  is  speaking  about  are  also 
operated  by  our  members,  we  still  have  not  yet  seen  any  peer-re-
viewed  scientific  data  that  suggests  we  can  even  reach  the  IMO 
standard.  So  we  respectfully  request  your  consideration  of  that 
change, noting that in the pre-review process, the ability to change 
the  standard  to  reflect  the  realistic  capabilities  of  technology  at  a 
given point in time will exist. 

We  also  support  the  inclusion  in  your  bill  of  a  quantitative  per-
formance  standard  and  not  leaving  this  issue  in  the  development 
through a regulatory process. I can unequivocally state to you that 
it  was  only  when  the  fixed  quantitative  standard  was  established 
by  IMO  that  ship  owners  and  technology  developers  finally  began 
to  be  able  to  justifiably  commit  financial  and  human  resources  to 
solving  this  problem.  For  now  we  had  a  hard  target  at  which  to 
aim,  so  it  is  critical  that  your  bill  contains  the  quantitative  stand-
ard. Now, other bills include standards that would be based on best 
available  technology,  and  while  conceptually  we  have  no  problem 
with  best  available  technology,  we  do  not  believe  it  has  a  place  in 
establishing  the  initial  standard.  It  will,  appropriately  by  default, 
become  the  general  criteria  for  later  adjustments  of  the  standard 
to reflect developing technology. 

Very  quickly,  both  of  your  bills  contain  provisions  for  a  pre-re-
view  process  and  a  feasibility  analysis.  We  would  suggest  that  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

provisions as drafted are fine, but we would also suggest the addi-
tion  of  five  specific  criteria  that  are  currently  listed  in  the  IMO 
Convention  to  provide  better  direction  to  the  regulatory  agencies 
which  will  conduct  these  reviews.  These  five  criteria  are  consider-
ations  of  safety,  environmental  acceptability,  practicability,  cost-ef-
fectiveness, and biological effectiveness. 

The  next  issue  is  relative  to  preemption.  We  believe  strong  Fed-
eral  preemption  is  necessary  in  an  enacted  legislation.  Senator 
Inouye, your bill does contain a preemption clause, but it’s one that 
we  think  could  be  made  stronger  by  a  little  bit  stronger  language, 
and in my review late last night of S. 1224, regrettably, we did not 
see that preemption clause so we would recommend that clause be 
included  in  your  bill,  Senator  Boxer.  We  also  believe  that  due  to 
a  recent  District  Court  decision  for  the  Northern  District  of  Cali-
fornia  relative  to  the  control  of  ballast  water  through  the  Clean 
Water Act NPDES Program, which we disagree with, but nonethe-
less,  it  is  still  a  court  decision,  so  that  we  would  strongly  rec-
ommend the inclusion of language in your bill that establishes your 
bill as the exclusive Federal law governing ballast water exchange. 
In  other  words,  your  bill  would  create  the  permitting  system  for 
ballast water rather than trying to shove a square peg into a round 
hole.  We  all  can  remember  with  great  concern  when  EPA  tried  to 
accommodate  the  storm  water  discharges  into  their  system  and 
how  long  that  took.  Too  long,  we  cannot  afford  to  wait  that  long. 
And,  finally,  wrapping  up,  we  believe  there’s  a  need,  a  vast  ma-
jority  of  the  Coalition  believes  there’s  a  need  for  a  specific  exemp-
tion for tug barge operations. Briefly, to describe this in 15 seconds, 
as currently drafted without an exemption, without a safety exemp-
tion  for  these  operations,  we  will  be  asking  human  beings  to  dis-
connect a tug and a barge in the middle of the ocean, and even on 
a  calm  day  we’re  talking  five-  to  seven-foot  seas,  and  move  a 
human being 20 to 30 feet up a steel vertical wall so they can climb 
on that barge to do ballast water exchange. Please note the exemp-
tion  is  only  relative  to  exchange  and  not  to  treatment.  Please  also 
note  that  this  exemption  is  not  without  precedent  because  the 
States  of  Oregon  and  Washington  already  contain  such  an  exemp-
tion in their state law. 

We thank you for the opportunity to testify. We would be pleased 

to answer any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Metcalf follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KATHY J.  METCALF,  DIRECTOR,  MARITIME AFFAIRS, 
CHAMBER OF SHIPPING OF AMERICA;  ON BEHALF OF THE SHIPPING INDUSTRY 
BALLAST WATER COALITION 
Mr.  Chairman,  we  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today  on  the 
subject  of  invasive  species  management,  and  specifically,  the  provisions  of  Senate 
Bill  363,  the  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of  2005  as  introduced  by  Senator 
Inouye  on  behalf  of  himself  and  Senators  Akaka,  Cantwell,  Lautenberg,  Sarbanes 
and Stevens. 

The Shipping Industry Ballast Water Coalition (the Coalition) is an informal orga-
nization of maritime trade associations and companies that own, operate, or charter 
commercial  vessels  of  all  types  engaged  in  both  domestic  and  international  trade, 
and represents over 90 percent of the vessels calling in U.S. ports. The types of ves-
sels  owned  and  operated  by  Coalition  members  include  oceangoing  and  coastwise 
containerships,  tankers,  roll-on/roll-off  vessels,  bulk  carriers,  and  passenger  vessels 
as  well  as  tug/barge  units  which  operate  in  oceangoing,  coastwise,  and  inland 
waters. While the testimony we provide today highlights points of agreement by the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

vast  majority  of  the  Coalition,  individual  members  of  the  Coalition  would  respect-
fully reserve their right to provide written comments to this record to provide addi-
tional information as they deem necessary. 

The  Coalition  was  formed  over  4  years  ago  by  a  number  of  entities  that  believed 
resolution of this complex issue required the coordinated efforts of all stakeholders. 
Since  that  time,  the  Coalition  has  provided  testimony  or  comments  to  both  legisla-
tive  and  regulatory  initiatives  regarding  ballast  water  management  both  at  the 
international and domestic level. 
General Comments 

The  Coalition  congratulates  Senator  Inouye  and  his  colleagues  for  drafting  the 
proposed  legislation  as  it  is,  to  date,  the  legislation  which  most  closely  mirrors  the 
management structure as contained in the recently agreed upon International Con-
vention  for  the  Control  and  Management  of  Ships’  Ballast  Water  and  Sediments, 
2004 (the IMO Convention) by the member states of the International Maritime Or-
ganization.  The  Coalition  has  always  and  continues  to  support  the  prompt  enact-
ment  of  domestic  legislation  which  will  establish  a  national  ballast  water  manage-
ment  program  and  that  reflects,  to  the  maximum  extent  possible,  the  substantive 
provisions and regulatory framework of the IMO Convention. In this regard, the Co-
alition supports the provisions of S. 363 with a few specific changes as noted below. 
The Ballast Water Management Performance Standard 

The  Coalition  supports  changing  the  performance  standard  as  currently  included 
in  S.  363  to  reflect  the  standard  contained  in  the  IMO  Convention.  As  currently 
drafted,  S.  363  contains  a  performance  standard  that  is  one  hundred  times  more 
stringent  than  that  contained  in  the  IMO  Convention.  It  is  important  to  note  that 
at this point in time, there is no published peer-reviewed data that suggests the ex-
istence of technology which can achieve the IMO standard, although we are hopeful 
that this technology will emerge from testing programs which are underway around 
the  world  and  on  a  variety  of  ships.  It  is  this  data,  once  published  and  peer-re-
viewed,  that  will  become  part  of  the  pre-review  process  conducted  at  IMO,  and 
under  the  pre-review  process  as  contained  in  S.  363  as  introduced.  What  is  critical 
here  is  that  the  first  standard  be  achievable,  recognizing  future  adjustment  of  the 
standard  during  the  periodic  review  process  which  will  reflect  the  capabilities  of 
emerging technology to provide even more efficient treatment results. 

The  Coalition  also  strongly  supports  including  a  quantitative  performance  stand-
ard  in  the  legislation  itself  and  not  leaving  the  establishment  of  the  performance 
standard to the regulatory process. For a number of years, members of our Coalition 
have had discussions with technology developers and reviewed various ballast water 
treatment  technologies.  I  can  unequivocally  state  that  it  was  only  when  the  fixed 
quantitative  standard  was  established  by  IMO,  that  shipowners  and  technology  de-
velopers  alike  were  in  a  position  to  commit  vast  sums  of  financial  and  human  re-
sources  to  finding  a  solution  to  this  perplexing  problem.  Once  this  quantitative 
standard  was  established,  shipowners  and  technology  developers  alike  had  a  ‘‘hard 
target’’ at which to aim. While the concept of ‘‘best available technology’’ is a viable 
one,  it  has  no  place  in  establishing  initial  performance  standards  for  ballast  water 
treatment  systems.  It  will  more  appropriately,  by  default,  become  the  general  cri-
teria for later adjustments of the standard to reflect developing technology. 
Review of Standards and Feasibility Review 

Section  3(f)  of  S.  363,  entitled  Ballast  Water  Treatment  Requirements,  contains 
provisions for a periodic review of standards (3(f)(4)) and an initial feasibility review 
(3(f)(6)).  These  are  key  provisions  in  ensuring  that  appropriate  technologies  are 
available  to  achieve  the  initial  standard  and  provide  for  periodic  reviews  of  the  es-
tablished  standard  in  light  of  new  technologies  that  provide  even  more  effective 
treatment  results.  While  the  Coalition  strongly  supports  inclusion  of  both  of  these 
provisions,  we  believe  that  more  detail  is  necessary  in  the  legislation  to  guide  the 
regulatory  program  which  will  implement  these  provisions.  Specifically,  the  Coali-
tion  believes  that  the  legislation  should  explicitly  include  five  specific  criteria  on 
which these reviews will be based. The five criteria are considerations of safety, en-
vironmental  acceptability,  practicability,  cost  effectiveness,  and  biological  effective-
ness.  By  including  these  specific  criteria,  Congress  will  more  clearly  outline  the 
charge to the agencies which will be responsible for implementing these review pro-
grams. 
Urgent  Need  for  a  Coordinated  Federal  Program  Which  May  Be  Imple-

mented by the States 

Shipping is international and the regulation of shipping should be, too. While this 
is  not  always  possible,  the  Coalition  believes  that  regulation  of  shipping  through 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

international requirements, as established by IMO, is the correct way to comprehen-
sively regulate the industry in a clear manner. However, there are cases where do-
mestic  legislation  has  been  enacted  which  varies  with  international  requirements. 
Not without some pain, the industry has adjusted to these U.S. requirements. How-
ever, in the case of ballast water management, the industry has, over the past sev-
eral years, been exposed to state requirements that, in some cases, have varied from 
the Federal requirements. We fear this trend will continue without the inclusion of 
appropriate language in S. 363. Continuing this patchwork-quilt approach would be 
catastrophic for the environment and the industry, and undermine the progress that 
we  can  make  on  this  issue  by  the  establishment  of  a  strong,  uniform  Federal  pro-
gram.  Therefore,  the  Coalition  strongly  advocates  the  modification  of  the  current 
preemption  language  found  at  Section  3(q)  to  reflect  the  recognition  that  the  pro-
gram,  as  established  under  this  legislation  is  the  sole  program  established  in  the 
United States for the management and control of ballast water discharges. With the 
implementation  of  this  strong  Federal  program,  there  should  be  no  need  for  state, 
regional  or  local  implementation  of  additional  or  conflicting  ballast  water  manage-
ment requirements, and thus, the inclusion of strong preemption language is appro-
priate. 
S.  363  as  the  Exclusive  Federal  Program  Which  Regulates  Ballast  Water 

Management and Discharges in U.S. Waters 

The  Coalition  strongly  believes  that  enacted  ballast  water  legislation  should  be 
the  exclusive  Federal  program  which  regulates  ballast  water  management  and  dis-
charges  in  U.S.  waters.  As  a  result  of  a  recent  U.S.  district  court  decision,  there  is 
some  question  as  to  whether  Congress  intended  to  include  ballast  water  discharges 
under  provisions  of  the  Clean  Water  Act,  and  specifically  the  National  Pollutant 
Discharge Elimination System permitting program. The Coalition strongly supports 
Congressional action to clear up this confusion and recommends the inclusion of ap-
propriate  text  to  clearly  manifest  Congress’s  intent  to  regulate  ballast  water  man-
agement under the provisions of ballast water-specific legislation such as S. 363. 
Need for a Specific Exemption From Ballast Water Exchange Requirements 

for Tug/Barge Operations 

A  vast  majority  of  the  Coalition  believes  that  an  express  provision  should  be  in-
cluded  in  S.  363  which  exempts  tug  and  barge  operations  from  the  ballast  water 
exchange  requirements.  The  basis  for  this  specific  exemption  relates  to  the  inher-
ently  unsafe  nature  of  maneuvering  a  tug  alongside  a  barge  and  then  place  a 
human  life  at  risk  by  requiring  a  crew  member  to  scale  what  is  essentially  a  20 
to 30 foot vertical steel wall, in order to allow exchange to be conducted on the barge 
at sea. While the existing safety exemption would arguably cover such an operation, 
it  would  be  more  appropriate  to  clearly  manifest  the  intent  of  Congress  that  such 
an  operation  would  not  be  condoned  by  including  specific  language  exempting  tug/ 
barge operations from the ballast water exchange requirements. In fact, Washington 
and  Oregon  have  exempted  tug  and  barge  operations  from  state  requirements  to 
conduct ballast water exchange. These states have acknowledged the inherent risks 
in  requiring  barges  to  conduct  ballast  water  exchange.  It  is  important  to  note  that 
this  exemption  would  not  apply  to  the  integration  of  ballast  water  treatment  sys-
tems  as  they  become  available,  provided  that  the  system  would  enable  treatment 
of  ballast  while  the  vessel  was  berthed,  and  thus,  obviate  the  need  to  conduct  an 
unsafe operation at sea. 

We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  testimony  to  your  subcommittee  and 

would be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Metcalf.  Our  next  witness  is 
Rear Admiral Thomas Gilmour, Assistant Commandant for Marine 
Safety  and  Environmental  Protection  at  the  Coast  Guard.  Wel-
come, Admiral. 

STATEMENT  OF  REAR  ADMIRAL  THOMAS  H.  GILMOUR, 
ASSISTANT  COMMANDANT  FOR  MARINE  SAFETY,  SECURITY 
AND ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, U.S. COAST GUARD 
Admiral  GILMOUR.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  distin-
guished  members  of  the  Subcommittee.  It’s  certainly  my  pleasure 
to  appear  before  you  today  to  provide  our  views  on  ballast  water 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

management  and  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of  2005,  S.  363, 
and I’ll also touch briefly on coral reef protection. 

The  Administration  certainly  shares  this  committee’s  concern 
with  the  significant  environmental  and  economic  damage  that  has 
been caused by aquatic invasive species and recognizes that ballast 
water  discharge  is  one  of  the  important  pathways  for  such  inva-
sions.  We  are  committed  to  working  with  Congress  to  enact  effec-
tive  legislation  that  will  address  ballast  water,  the  ballast  water 
issue,  and  substantially  reduce  the  threat  of  damaging  invasions 
through  this  pathway.  In  early  2001,  through  a  series  of  inter-
national  workshops,  the  Coast  Guard  began  working  with  sci-
entists,  marine  engineers,  experts  from  water  treatment  industry, 
and  our  Federal  agency  partners  to  develop  criteria  for  a  ballast 
water  discharge  standard.  These  workshops  concluded  that  this 
standard  should  address  all  organisms  at  all  life  stages  and  it  be 
concentration-based, set at values that are scientifically sound, en-
vironmentally  protective,  and  enforceable.  We  are  currently  com-
pleting  an  environmental  impact  statement  analyzing  the  impacts 
of  several  alternative  standards  as  well  as  a  cost  benefit  analysis 
associated with this rulemaking. 

In February of 2004, the Coast Guard led an inter-agency United 
States delegation to the International Maritime Organization’s dip-
lomatic conference on ballast water management of ships. The con-
ference  adopted  the  International  Convention  for  the  control  and 
Management  of  Ships’  Ballast  Water  and  Sediments,  2004,  which 
is  a  significant  step  forward  in  the  international  effort  to  combat 
invasive  species  introduced  through  ships’  ballast.  One  significant 
provision  of  the  convention  calls  for  ships  to  meet  a  ballast  water 
discharge standard according to a schedule of fixed dates beginning 
with  certain  ships  constructed  in  2009.  These  fixed  dates  serve  as 
a  signal  to  the  shipping  industry,  as  well  as  to  emerging  ballast 
water  treatment  industry  of  the  need  for  the  investment,  plans, 
and  inventory  to  meet  Ballast  Water  Management  requirements. 
Another key feature of the implementation schedule is the phasing 
out  of  the  practice  of  ballast  water  exchange,  which  means  most 
ballast  water  discharges  will  eventually  have  to  meet  a  maximum 
concentration  standard.  The  ballast  water  discharge  standard  in 
the Convention would allow less than 10 organisms of a given size 
range, per-cubic-meter of discharge ballast water. The Coast Guard 
believes  that  this  level  of  stringency  may  not  be  sufficient  to  ade-
quately reduce invasions and that technologies currently under de-
velopment may be able to do better. 

However, substantial uncertainty remains in both of these areas. 
Significantly, the standard adopted by IMO is concentration-based, 
and we think that’s important. This is desired by the United States 
because  the  concentration  approach  provides  for  more  effective 
monitoring of compliance in a more uniform and protective level of 
risk reduction across all vessels. 

The  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of  2005  contains  many  pro-
visions  similar  to  the  IMO  Convention  adopted  in  2004.  The  legis-
lation  provides  for  the  eventual  sunset  of  practice  of  ballast  water 
exchange  in  favor  of  an  environmentally  protective  ballast  water 
treatment standard. The ballast water discharge standard in S. 363 
is  the  same  format  of  the  concentration-based  standard  found  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

the  IMO  Convention  which  deals  with  all  organisms  and  their  life 
states.  The  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of  2005  also  addresses 
the  movement  of  non-indigenous  species  by  ballast  water  between 
ports within the United States which is a critical step in controlling 
the spread of invasive species. 

The  continued  ability  to  evaluate  and  the  performance  of  proto-
type  technologies  under  the  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of 
2005,  is  also  important.  The  Coast  Guard  has  launched  the  Ship-
board  Technology  Evaluation  Program  in  2004  as  an  incentive  to 
assist  vessel  owners  in  the  installation  of  prototype  ballast  water 
treatment systems under our current regulations. 

In  addition,  we’ve  been  working  closely  with  the  Environmental 
Protection  Agency’s  Environmental  Technology  Verification  Pro-
gram  toward  the  development  of  a  rigorous  technical  protocol  for 
land  based  testing  systems  and  the  evaluation  of  ballast  water 
treatment technologies. 

The  Coast  Guard  also  works  closely  with  the  National  Oceano-
graphic and Atmospheric Administration to help preserve and pro-
tect coral reefs. In 2004, the Coast Guard dedicated over 2,000 air-
craft and over 1,700 hours at a cost of over $13 million in coral reef 
enforcement efforts. 

Thank you for the opportunity to provide these comments on the 
Ballast  Water  Management  Act,  and  we  look  forward  to  working 
with  Congress  as  we  continue  our  ongoing  efforts  to  implement  an 
effective ballast water management regime. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Admiral Gilmour follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REAR ADMIRAL THOMAS H.  GILMOUR,  ASSISTANT 
COMMANDANT FOR MARINE SAFETY,  SECURITY,  AND ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, 
U.S. COAST GUARD 
Good  Morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  distinguished  members  of  the  Subcommittee. 
I am Rear Admiral Thomas Gilmour, Assistant Commandant for Marine Safety, Se-
curity  and  Environmental  Protection.  It  is  my  pleasure  to  appear  before  you  today 
to  provide  the  Coast  Guard’s  views  on  ballast  water  management  and  the  Ballast 
Water Management Act of 2005, S. 363, and to touch briefly upon coral reef protec-
tion. 

The  Administration  shares  this  committee’s  concern  with  the  significant  environ-
mental and economic damage that has been caused by aquatic invasive species and 
recognizes  that  ballast  water  discharge  is  one  of  the  important  pathways  for  such 
invasions.  Over  the  past  several  years,  the  U.S.  has  been  a  leader  in  international 
efforts  to  address  this  problem.  While  we  have  made  significant  progress  domesti-
cally under the current legislative framework, there is no question that this frame-
work  needs  to  be  upgraded  to  move  us  to  a  higher  level  of  protection.  We  are  com-
mitted  to  working  with  the  Congress  to  enact  effective  legislation  that  will  address 
the  ballast  water  issue  and  substantially  reduce  the  threat  of  damaging  invasions 
through this pathway. 

The Coast Guard is a leader in ensuring America’s maritime environment is pro-
tected. We take great pride in providing valuable services that preserve and protect 
our Nation’s waters, making them cleaner, safer, and more secure for legitimate use. 
The Coast Guard remains committed to providing a leadership role on ballast water 
management  both  domestically  and  internationally,  and  working  diligently  with  all 
stakeholders  to  protect  U.S.  waters  from  the  introduction  of  aquatic  nuisance  spe-
cies. 

In  early  2001,  through  a  series  of  international  workshops,  the  Coast  Guard 
began  working  with  scientists,  marine  engineers,  experts  from  the  water  treatment 
industry, and our Federal agency partners to develop the criteria for a ballast water 
discharge  standard.  These  workshops  concluded  that  the  standard  should  address 
all organisms at all life stages, that it be concentration-based and set at values that 
are  scientifically  sound,  environmentally  protective,  and  enforceable.  These  criteria 
informed our approach for international negotiations at IMO as well as to our rule-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

making to develop a ballast water discharge standard, currently in process. The bal-
last  water  discharge  standard  will  be  used  to  approve  ballast  water  management 
equipment installed on ships as an alternative to ballast water exchange, under our 
current authority. The standard will also be used to evaluate compliance on vessels 
performing treatment. We are currently completing a Programmatic Environmental 
Impact Statement analyzing the environmental impacts of several alternative stand-
ards as well as the cost-benefit analysis associated with this rulemaking. 

In  February  of  2004,  the  Coast  Guard  led  the  interagency  United  States  delega-
tion  to  the  International  Maritime  Organization’s  (IMO)  Diplomatic  Conference  on 
Ballast  Water  Management  for  Ships.  The  Conference  adopted  the  International 
Convention for the Control and Management of Ships’ Ballast Water and Sediments, 
2004,  which  is  a  significant  step  forward  in  the  international  effort  to  combat 
invasive  species  introduced  by  ships’  ballast  water.  The  U.S.  delegation  played  a 
major  role  in  development  of  the  Convention’s  basic  structure  and  in  ensuring  that 
a number of key objectives were included in this new treaty. 

One significant provision of the Convention calls for ships to meet a ballast water 
discharge  standard  according  to  a  schedule  of  fixed  dates,  beginning  with  certain 
ships constructed in 2009. These fixed dates serve as a signal to the shipping indus-
try  as  well  as  to  the  emerging  ballast  water  treatment  industry  of  the  need  for  in-
vestment,  plans,  and  inventory  to  meet  ballast  water  management  requirements. 
Another  key  feature  of  the  implementation  schedule  is  the  phasing-out  of  the  prac-
tice  of  ballast  water  exchange,  which  means  most  ballast  water  discharges  will 
eventually  have  to  meet  a  maximum  concentration  standard.  The  Convention  con-
tains  provisions  for  the  experimental  testing  of  prototype  ballast  water  treatment 
systems  on  operating  vessels.  In  addition,  the  Convention  contains  a  U.S.  backed 
provision that allows the sampling of ballast water from ships as a port state control 
activity for the purposes of evaluating compliance with the Convention. 

While  there  were  many  important  and  positive  provisions  adopted  by  the  Con-
ference,  one  significant  element  is  the  stringency  of  the  ballast  water  discharge 
standard.  For  example,  the  standard  in  the  Convention  would  allow  less  than  10 
organisms  of  a  given  size  range  per-cubic-meter  of  discharged  ballast  water.  The 
Coast Guard believes that the Convention’s level of stringency may not be sufficient 
to  adequately  reduce  invasions,  and  that  technologies  currently  under  development 
may be able to do better. However substantial uncertainty remains in both of these 
areas.  Significantly,  the  standard  adopted  by  IMO  is  concentration-based  rather 
than expressed as a percent removal. This was desired by the U.S. because the con-
centration approach provides for more effective monitoring of compliance and a more 
uniform and protective level of risk reduction across all vessels. Further, the stand-
ard,  as  adopted,  when  met  by  all  vessels,  will  likely  significantly  reduce  the  dis-
charges  of  potentially  invasive  species  via  ballast  water.  Since  the  adoption  of  the 
Convention, the Coast Guard has led an interagency delegation in the development 
of  supporting  guidelines  for  the  implementation  of  the  Convention,  the  first  set  of 
which will likely be adopted by IMO resolution in July. 

The  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of  2005,  contains  many  provisions  similar  to 
the  IMO  Convention  adopted  in  2004,  and  is  consistent  with  the  basic  structure  of 
the  Convention.  In  addition  to  authorizing  an  amendment  to  the  Non-indigenous 
Aquatic  Nuisance  Prevention  and  Control  Act/National  Invasive  Species  Act,  the 
legislation provides for the eventual sunset of the practice of ballast water exchange, 
in favor of an environmentally protective ballast water treatment standard. The bal-
last water discharge standard in S. 363 is the same format of a concentration-based 
standard  found  in  the  IMO  Convention,  which  deals  with  all  organisms  and  their 
life  states.  This  concentration-based  standard  is  important  in  that  it  provides  a 
threshold  for  the  maximum  number  of  organisms  in  a  volume  of  discharged  ballast 
water regardless of the source of the ballast water or type of vessel. This is essential 
for both the approval of ballast water treatment systems and enforcement of the dis-
charge  standard  on  ships.  However,  the  standards  in  S.  363  are  100  times  more 
stringent than the standards found in the IMO Convention. There has been no eval-
uation to date of currently-available technologies to show whether extant and proto-
type ballast water treatment systems would be able to achieve the standards set in 
the bill. The Administration believes it may be premature to fix these standards in 
legislation, given the substantial uncertainties in the future capabilities of emerging 
technologies. 

The Ballast Water Management Act of 2005, also addresses the movement of non- 
indigenous  species  by  ballast  water  between  ports  within  the  U.S.,  which  is  a  crit-
ical  step  in  controlling  the  spread  of  invasive  species.  To  date,  there  has  been  no 
significant analysis of the risks presented by these ballast water discharges against 
the feasibility of various ballast water management options. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

The continued ability to evaluate the performance of prototype technologies under 
the  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of  2005,  is  also  important,  as  the  Coast  Guard 
launched the Shipboard Technology Evaluation Program in 2004, as an incentive to 
assist vessel owners in the installation of prototype ballast water treatment systems 
under  our  current  regulations.  In  addition,  we  have  been  working  closely  with  the 
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s Environmental Technology Verification Pro-
gram  in  the  development  of  rigorous  technical  protocols  for  land-based  testing  and 
evaluation  of  ballast  water  treatment  technologies.  This  provision  will  allow  the 
Coast  Guard  to  continue  facilitating  the  development  of  improved  ballast  water 
treatment technology, even after the application of a ballast water discharge stand-
ard to all vessels. 

The  Coast  Guard  also  works  closely  with  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric 
Administration (NOAA) to help preserve and protect coral reefs. In 2004, the Coast 
Guard  dedicated  2,032  aircraft,  323  boat,  and  1,708  cutter  hours  at  a  cost  of  over 
$13  million,  in  such  enforcement  efforts.  The  Coast  Guard  has  also  worked  with 
NOAA, the State of Hawaii, the Department of the Interior, and local organizations 
to help remove marine debris from coral reefs surrounding the Northwestern Hawai-
ian Islands. 

Thank you for the opportunity to provide comments on the Ballast Water Manage-
ment  Act  of  2005.  The  Coast  Guard  looks  forward  to  working  with  Congress  as  we 
continue  our  ongoing  efforts  to  implement  an  effective  ballast  water  management 
regime. I will be happy to answer any questions you may have. 

OF 

FOR 

OCEANS 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Admiral.  Tim  Keeney  is  the  Deputy 

COMMERCE 

Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Oceans and Atmosphere. 
STATEMENT  OF  TIMOTHY  R.E.  KEENEY,  DEPUTY  ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY 
AND 
ATMOSPHERE,  NATIONAL  OCEANIC  AND  ATMOSPHERIC 
ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Mr.  KEENEY.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  members  of  the 
Subcommittee.  I  also  co-chair  both  the  Aquatic  Nuisance  Species 
Task  Force  and  the  Coral  Reef  Task  Force.  I’m  pleased  to  be  here 
today to discuss both of these important issues. The U.S. Ocean Ac-
tion  Plan  outlines  the  importance  of  each  of  these  topics  with  spe-
cific  goals  of  promoting  coral  reef  conservation  as  well  as  pre-
venting  the  spread  of  invasive  species.  Today  I’ll  discuss  both  our 
coral and ballast water programs. 

The  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  of  2000  called  for  the  creation 
of  a  national  strategy  and  program  to  address  the  threats  to  coral 
reef  communities.  This  led  to  the  creation  of  NOAA’s  Coral  Reef 
Conservation  Program  or  the  CRCP,  which  draws  experts  together 
from  across  NOAA  and  engages  external  parties  to  develop  inte-
grated strategies to address coral reef decline on the local, national, 
and  international  scales.  The  authority  provided  to  NOAA  under 
the  Act  has  yielded  many  benefits  to  coral  reef  management  and 
protection.  Reauthorization  of  the  Act  is  an  important  step  in  con-
tinuing  this  work.  Reauthorization  will  allow  continuation  of  im-
portant  NOAA-sponsored  mapping,  monitoring,  research  manage-
ment  efforts  throughout  the  CRCP  national  and  grants  programs 
and the Coral Reef Conservation Fund partnered with the National 
Fish and Wildlife Foundation. 

In  addition  to  carrying  out  the  requirements  of  the  Act,  NOAA 
continues  to  play  an  important  and  active  role  in  the  U.S.  Coral 
Reef  Task  Force  which  brings  together  Federal  and  non-Federal 
members  to  exchange  information  and  collaboration  on  new  ac-
tions. Many of NOAA’s coral reef conservation efforts have been de-
veloped in partnership with task force members. While the Act has 
allowed  NOAA  to  develop  an  effective  coral  program,  there  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

some  limitations  to  the  current  act  that  if  addressed  could  signifi-
cantly advance efforts to conserve our valuable coral reef resources. 
For  example,  although  the  Federal  Government  has  authority  to 
address coral reef damage from groundings in designated protected 
areas such as national marine sanctuaries, no similar authority ex-
ists to respond to any groundings that occur outside of these areas. 
Appropriate authority in the act would enable NOAA to respond to 
events and recover from the responsible party the cost for both the 
response and where warranted, comprehensive damage assessment 
in  restoration  activities.  The  Administration  and  Congress  have 
recognized  the  value  of  this  program.  It  would  be  appropriate  to 
recognize the support by authorizing the Act at the President’s Fis-
cal  Year  2006  request  level  of  $27.2  million  and  ensure  that  an 
adequate  portion  of  this  funding  is  available  for  effective  program 
administration. 

I’d  now  like  to  address  the  critical  issue  of  invasive  species  in 
ballast  water.  Non-indigenous  species  are  affecting  habitats  and 
species in all of our lakes and streams. Introduction of new species 
can alter both the physical habitat as well as impact native species 
in  ecosystem  productivity.  For  example,  last  year  Ohio  shut  down 
its  Great  Lakes  smallmouth  bass  fishery  for  two  of  the  most  pop-
ular months for this recreational fishery. The closure surprised the 
public  because  the  cause  was  a  fish  much  smaller  than  the 
smallmouth  bass—the  round  goby,  a  ballast  water  introduction 
that  eats  bass  eggs.  Because  NOAA  is  a  trustee  for  living  marine 
resources  we  are  particularly  concerned  with  introductions  of  non- 
indigenous aquatic species that may affect Federally-managed fish-
eries.  In  the  Summer  of  2000,  there  was  a  massive  jellyfish  bloom 
in the coastal areas of Alabama and Mississippi. Because of clogged 
nets, shrimping operations had to be suspended and it has been es-
timated it cost shrimpers over $10 million. 

I  would  like  to  update  the  Subcommittee  on  our  progress  in  ad-
dressing ballast water issues. NOAA and Fish and Wildlife Service 
are  charged  with  sponsoring  research  to  develop  new  technologies 
for  ballast  water  management.  Since  1998,  54  research  projects 
have  been  sponsored  under  the  Ballast  Water  Demonstration  Pro-
gram  and  16  additional  ballast  water-related  projects  have  been 
sponsored through the National Sea Grant Program. We have test-
ed  filtration,  ultraviolet  radiation,  ozone  injection,  sonic  bombard-
ment, heat treatment, and oxidizing and non-oxidizing biocides. We 
are  well  beyond  proof  of  concept  with  many  of  these  technologies 
and there are some promising results. 

As  you  know,  the  Coast  Guard  had  made  a  formal  finding  and 
the voluntary guidelines included in the 1996 Invasive Species Act 
were  not  effective  and  issued  regulations  requiring  ballast  water 
management  for  vessels  entering  U.S.  ports  beyond  the  EEZ.  All 
stakeholders  recognize  that  exchange  is  an  interim  solution  until 
methods for treating ballast water are developed. 

NOAA  supports  the  goal  of  S.  363  which  is  to  reduce  the  risk  of 
introducing new invasive species by ballast water. The 2006 Presi-
dent’s budget request requests $7.9 million to continue NOAA’s val-
uable  work  to  prevent  invasive  species  through  programs  such  as 
the Aquatic Invasive Species Program, Sea Grant, the Great Lakes 
Environmental  Research  Laboratory,  and  the  National  Center  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Coastal Ocean Science. Considerable progress has been made in ad-
dressing the ballast water program since the 1996 reauthorization, 
but  much  work  remains.  With  a  strong  commitment,  I  think  that 
we’ll  be  able  to  significantly  reduce  the  risks  associated  with  bal-
last water as a vector for the introduction of new species. 

NOAA  looks  forward  to  working  with  the  Subcommittee  in  bal-
last  water  legislation  and  the  reauthorization  of  the  Coral  Reef 
Conservation  Act.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today.  I’d  be 
happy to respond to any questions the Subcommittee may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Keeney follows:] 

AND ATMOSPHERE,  NATIONAL OCEANIC

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TIMOTHY R.E.  KEENEY,  DEPUTY ASSISTANT SECRETARY 
AND ATMOSPHERIC 

FOR OCEANS
ADMINISTRATION , U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  am  Timothy 
Keeney,  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere  at  the  National 
Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA). I am Co-Chair of both the Aquat-
ic  Nuisance  Species  Task  Force  and  U.S.  Coral  Reef  Task  Force  and  am  pleased  to 
be here today to discuss both of these important issues. The U.S. Ocean Action Plan 
outlines the importance of both of these topics with specific goals of promoting coral 
reef conservation as well as preventing the spread of invasive species. Today, I will 
discuss  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  of  2000  (the  Act),  and  the  importance  of 
its reauthorization as well as present NOAA’s views on S. 363, which would amend 
the  Nonindigenous  Aquatic  Nuisance  Prevention  and  Control  Act  of  1990 
(NANPCA), to establish vessel ballast water management requirements. 
Reauthorization of the Coral Reef Conservation Act 

Coral  reefs,  often  called  the  ‘‘rainforests  of  the  sea,’’  are  among  the  oldest  and 
most  diverse  ecosystems  on  the  planet.  Coral  reefs  provide  resources  and  services 
worth  over  $375  billion  each  year  to  the  United  States  economy  and  economies 
worldwide, a surprising amount considering these ecosystems cover less than 1 per-
cent  of  the  Earth’s  surface.  Coral  reef  resources  provide  economic  and  environ-
mental  benefits  in  the  form  of  food,  jobs,  natural  products,  pharmaceuticals,  and 
shoreline  protection.  Ten-and-a-half  million  people  in  the  United  States  live  in 
coastal communities adjacent to coral reefs (U.S. Census 2002). Consequently, coral 
reefs  have  become  an  integral  part  of  the  culture,  heritage,  and  economies  of  these 
regions. Unfortunately, a combination of stressors has caused a rapid decline in the 
health of many coral reefs globally. 

Congress  recognized  the  need  to  preserve,  sustain,  and  restore  the  condition  of 
coral  reef  ecosystems  by  passing  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  of  2000,  calling 
for  the  creation  of  a  national  strategy  and  program  to  address  the  threats  to  coral 
reef communities. The Act calls for NOAA to carry out a number of activities to pro-
mote  the  management  and  sustainable  use  of  coral  reef  ecosystems,  to  develop 
sound  scientific  information  on  the  condition  of  coral  reef  ecosystems,  and  to  assist 
in the preservation of coral reefs by supporting external conservation programs. 

The  authority  and  guidance  provided  in  the  Act  has  allowed  NOAA  to  undertake 
a  number  of  activities  important  to  understanding  and  conserving  coral  reef  eco-
systems.  The  Act  authorized  the  establishment  of  a  national  program  to  fund  and 
conduct activities to conserve coral reefs, which led to the creation of NOAA’s Coral 
Reef  Conservation  Program  (CRCP).  The  CRCP  draws  experts  together  from  across 
NOAA  and  engages  external  partners  to  develop  integrated  strategies  to  address 
coral reef decline. In addition, the CRCP works with scientific, private, government, 
and  non-government  partners  to  address  coral  reef  conservation  on  local,  national, 
and international scales. One of the first tasks of the CRCP was to develop the Na-
tional Coral Reef Action Strategy (National Action Strategy), as called for in the Act. 
The  National  Action  Strategy  established  13  goals,  4  to  improve  our  understanding 
of reef ecosystems and 9 to reduce impacts of human activities. The National Action 
Strategy  builds  on  the  U.S.  National  Action  Plan  to  Conserve  Coral  Reefs  adopted 
by  the  U.S.  Coral  Reef  Task  Force  (USCRTF)  in  2000,  and  provides  the  roadmap 
for  sustaining  coral  reef  ecosystems,  and  the  communities  and  economies  that  de-
pend on them. 

One  of  the  mandates  of  the  Act,  and  goals  of  the  National  Action  Strategy,  is  to 
map and characterize U.S. shallow water coral reefs. The goal is to map all shallow 
reefs by 2009, and to date, NOAA has mapped approximately 66 percent; only Flor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

ida reefs remain to be mapped. These habitat maps provide scientists and managers 
basic  information  about  coral  reef  ecosystems,  assisting  them  in  designing  research 
and management plans, assessing damaged corals, monitoring reef health, and eval-
uating the results of their work. 

The  Act  and  the  National  Action  Strategy  also  call  for  NOAA  to  partner  with 
other Federal agencies, and state and territorial governments to build an integrated 
coral reef observing system to monitor, track and report on the condition of the eco-
system  over  time.  This  information  is  used  to  assess  and  adapt  management  ac-
tions.  In  2002,  NOAA  worked  with  Federal,  state,  territorial,  and  commonwealth 
partners to produce the first State of Coral Reef Ecosystems of the United States and 
Pacific  Freely  Associated  States  report.  This  report  assessed  the  condition  of  U.S. 
coral  reefs,  ranked  threats,  detailed  ongoing  conservation  actions  taken  by  Federal 
agencies, and contained recommendations from coral reef managers. The second re-
port,  scheduled  for  publication  this  summer,  will  reflect  more  quantitative  data  ob-
tained through collaborative monitoring programs. 

The  CRCP  has  developed  the  first  NOAA-wide  coral  ecosystem  research  plan  to 
set  priorities  and  guide  NOAA-funded  coral  reef  ecosystem  research  for  the  next  5 
years  (FY  2005–2010),  including  the  research  conducted  through  grants  and  con-
tracts.  The  Research  Plan  covers  all  coral  reef  ecosystems  under  the  jurisdiction  of 
the  United  States  and  the  Pacific  Freely  Associated  States,  and  incorporates  direct 
input  and  review  from  partner  agencies,  state  and  territorial  governments,  coral 
reef  managers,  scientists,  and  other  key  stakeholders.  The  plan  is  intended  to  pro-
vide  scientific  information  and  tools  for  management  of  coral  ecosystems,  and  is 
scheduled for completion in 2005. 

CRCP  efforts  authorized  by  the  Act  have  also  addressed  the  threat  to  reefs  from 
marine  debris  and  abandoned  vessels.  Debris  and  vessels  can  cause  physical  harm 
to  coral  reefs  through  entanglement  and  collision,  and  thus  are  serious  concerns  in 
some regions of the United States. NOAA leads a partnership with the State of Ha-
waii,  Department  of  the  Interior  (DOI),  U.S.  Coast  Guard  (USCG),  nongovern-
mental, and many local organizations to remove and dispose of derelict fishing gear 
from  the  Northwestern  Hawaiian  Islands  (NWHI).  Since  2000,  this  effort  has  re-
moved  over  400  metric  tons  of  marine  debris  from  the  NWHI.  The  removal  of  all 
major, existing accumulations of derelict fishing gear and other marine debris from 
the  NWHI  will  be  completed  this  year.  Because  derelict  fishing  gear  continues  to 
accumulate  in  this  area,  NOAA  and  our  partners  have  been  coordinating  an  inter-
national discussion on how to detect and remove derelict fishing gear from the open 
ocean. NOAA has also created an Abandoned Vessels Program to identify candidate 
wrecks  for  further  attention  and  to  initiate  removal  of  the  highest  priority  cases. 
As  required  in  the  Act,  outreach  and  education  activities  to  build  public  aware-
ness  and  local  capacity  are  another  way  the  CRCP  promotes  sustainable  manage-
ment  of  coral  reef  ecosystems.  The  CRCP  has  reached  out  to  stakeholders  by  cre-
ating  and  distributing  educational  materials  and  by  conducting  workshops  and 
training  sessions.  For  example,  NOAA  has  supported  a  series  of  coral  reef  fisheries 
management  workshops.  NOAA  has  also  assisted  state  and  territorial  governments 
in  enhancing  their  human  resource  capacity  for  marine  resource  management  by 
providing  technical  training  for  managers,  by  creating  internship/fellowship  pro-
grams, and by providing direct funding to support management staff. 

The U.S. states, territories, and commonwealths, through the USCRTF, developed 
three-year  Local  Action  Strategies  (LAS)  to  promote  collaborative  on-the-ground 
management  of  threats  to  coral  reefs.  These  LAS  are  locally-driven  roadmaps  for 
collaboration and cooperation among Federal, state, territory, and nongovernmental 
partners  that  identify  and  implement  priority  actions  needed  to  reduce  key  threats 
to  valuable  coral  reef  resources.  Florida,  Hawaii,  Guam,  the  U.S.  Virgin  Islands, 
American Samoa, Puerto Rico, and the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Is-
lands each created specific LAS for select, locally-relevant, threats using six priority 
focus  areas:  overfishing,  land-based  sources  of  pollution,  recreational  overuse  and 
misuse,  lack  of  public  awareness,  climate  change  and  coral  bleaching,  and  disease. 
Additional  focus  areas  were  identified  in  some  jurisdictions  including:  invasive  spe-
cies in Hawaii, population pressure in American Samoa, and maritime industry and 
coastal construction impacts in Florida. With assistance from NOAA and other Fed-
eral  agencies,  these  jurisdictions  completed  LAS  for  selected  priorities  in  2004,  and 
will be implementing the various projects through 2007. The Administration strong-
ly  supports  the  local  jurisdictions’  efforts.  As  part  of  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan, 
the  Administration  has  requested  funding  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  NOAA  and  DOI 
budgets to support implementation of the LAS. 

The CRCP supports local reef management and conservation efforts through grant 
programs  authorized  by  the  Act.  The  comprehensive  grants  program  supports  a 
wide  range  of  coral  reef  conservation  projects  both  nationally  and  internationally. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

NOAA’s CRCP grants are awarded in six categories: State and Territory Coral Reef 
Management;  State  and  Territory  Coral  Reef  Ecosystem  Monitoring;  General  Coral 
Reef  Conservation;  Projects  to  Improve  or  Amend  Coral  Reef  Fishery  Management 
Plans;  International  Coral  Reef  Conservation;  and  Coral  Reef  Ecosystem  Research. 
These  projects  have  advanced  important  conservation  activities,  such  as  the  LAS, 
local  capacity  building,  publication  of  educational  materials,  implementation  of 
school  marine  science  programs,  identification  and  mapping  of  essential  fish  habi-
tats,  and  the  promotion  of  sociological  assessments  of  marine  protected  areas.  Be-
tween 2002 and 2004, NOAA awarded 133 grants to external partners in the public, 
private,  and  nonprofit  sectors  providing  $15,650,145,  and  leveraged  an  additional 
$5,821,553  through  matching  funds.  The  awarded  funds  represent  over  thirty  per-
cent of the CRCP budget for Fiscal Year 2004. NOAA plans to award an additional 
$4,550,000 in Fiscal Year 2005 through the CRCP grant program. 

As authorized by the Act, NOAA has partnered with the National Fish and Wild-
life  Foundation  (NFWF)  to  administer  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Fund.  Over  the 
past  4  years,  this  partnership  has  leveraged  $2  million  in  CRCP  funds  into  more 
than  $9  million  awarded  in  Federal  and  non-Federal  matching  funds  for  116  coral 
conservation  projects  in  20  countries,  five  U.S.  trusts  or  territories,  and  four  U.S. 
states.  The  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Fund  is  designed  to  foster  public-private  part-
nerships  and  to  promote  site-based  conservation  efforts.  These  grants  foster  inte-
grated resource management and have advanced the development of tools to address 
threats to coral reefs throughout U.S. and international waters. 

NOAA, as directed by the Act and the National Action Strategy, also supports and 
participates  in  international  coral  reef  conservation.  NOAA  promotes  improved 
human and institutional capacity to manage and conserve coral reefs internationally 
through  technical  assistance  and  its  international  coral  small  grants  program. 
NOAA participates in multiple international efforts such as the International Coral 
Reef Initiative (ICRI), which supports international coral reef research and manage-
ment efforts, including the Global Coral Reef Monitoring Network that produces bi-
ennial Status of Coral Reefs of the World reports. Last year, NOAA worked in part-
nership  with  the  scientific  community  and  its  partner  agencies  to  put  forward  the 
U.S.’s successful bid to host the 2008 International Coral Reef Symposium, the larg-
est international gathering of coral reef scientists and managers. 

NOAA  continues  to  play  an  active  role  in  the  U.S.  Coral  Reef  Task  Force 
(USCRTF).  The  USCRTF  was  established  by  Executive  Order  13089,  and  is  com-
posed of twelve Federal agencies, seven states and territories, and the three Freely 
Associated States. Biannual meetings bring members together to discuss key issues, 
propose  new  actions,  present  progress  reports,  and  update  the  coral  community  on 
past  accomplishments  and  future  plans.  These  USCRTF  meetings  provide  a  valu-
able  venue  for  the  exchange  of  information  in  which  members  can  voice  concerns 
about  their  coral  reef  conservation  efforts  and  collaborate  to  find  more  effective  al-
ternatives.  Many  of  NOAA’s  coral  reef  conservation  efforts,  such  as  the  coral  eco-
system  research  plan,  are  developed  in  partnership  with  the  various  Federal  agen-
cies, and state and territory governments on the USCRTF. 

As  I  have  outlined,  the  authority  provided  to  NOAA  under  the  Act  has  yielded 
many  benefits  to  coral  reef  management  and  protection.  The  Administration  recog-
nized  the  importance  of  conserving  corals  in  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  released 
on  December  17,  2004.  The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  includes 
$27.2  million  for  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Program,  including  the  $1.5  million 
in  new  funding  to  further  implement  LAS  mentioned  earlier.  NOAA’s  continuing 
coral  reef  conservation  efforts  will  include  forming  new  international  partnerships 
and  fostering  coral  protection  by  recreational  interests.  NOAA  is  coordinating  with 
partner  agencies  on  the  recently  re-established  marine  debris  committee  to  address 
this  critical  issue.  In  addition,  NOAA  is  continuing  the  process  to  designate  the 
Northwestern  Hawaiian  Islands  Coral  Reef  Ecosystem  Reserve  as  the  fourteenth 
National Marine Sanctuary. 

Recent  accomplishments  represent  only  intermediate  steps  toward  achieving  the 
goals  of  the  National  Coral  Reef  Action  Strategy.  Much  remains  to  be  done  to  halt 
the degradation of coral reefs and to sustain these valuable marine ecosystems and 
the economies that depend on them. Reauthorization of the Coral Reef Conservation 
Act  is  an  important  step  in  continuing  this  work  to  protect  and  restore  coral  reefs 
in  the  United  States  and  abroad.  Reauthorization  would  allow  continuation  of  im-
portant  NOAA-sponsored  mapping,  monitoring,  research,  and  management  efforts 
through  the  CRCP  national  and  grants  programs,  and  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation 
Fund partnership with NFWF. 

While the Act has allowed NOAA to develop an effective coral program, there are 
some limitations to the current Act that if addressed could significantly advance ef-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

forts to reduce threats and conserve our valuable coral reef resources. Some limita-
tions and hurdles posed by the current Act language are described below. 

Every  year  many  boats  run  aground  on  coral  reefs  causing  significant  damage  to 
these fragile ecosystems. These vessel groundings are not well documented in all re-
gions,  but  where  recorded  the  numbers  are  astounding.  For  example,  over  seventy 
boat  groundings  occur  annually  in  the  Florida  Keys  National  Marine  Sanctuary 
alone,  of  which  approximately  four  cause  significant  damage  to  the  reefs  and  con-
sequently  require  major  damage  assessments  and  restoration  activities.  Although 
the  Federal  Government  has  authority  to  address  coral  reef  damage  from 
groundings  in  designated  protected  areas,  such  as  national  parks  and  national  ma-
rine sanctuaries, no similar authority exists to respond to any grounding that occurs 
outside of designated protected areas. Appropriate authority in the Act would enable 
NOAA,  or  other  appropriate  agencies,  to  respond  to  events,  and  recover  from  the 
responsible  party,  the  costs  for  both  this  response  and,  where  warranted,  com-
prehensive damage assessment and restoration activities. 

The  Administration  and  Congress  have  recognized  the  value  of  the  CRCP.  It 
would  be  appropriate  to  recognize  this  support  by  authorizing  the  Act  at  the  Presi-
dent’s Fiscal Year 2006 request level of $27.2 million, and ensure that an adequate 
portion  of  this  funding  is  available  for  effective  program  administration.  Further, 
the  current  language  allocating  the  appropriations  between  the  grant  and  the  na-
tional programs is confusing and contradictory. This language requires clarification, 
which  could  be  accomplished  by  either  outlining  how  funding  should  be  allocated 
across  all  sections  of  the  Act,  or  by  providing  NOAA  the  discretion  to  make  alloca-
tion decisions. 

NOAA would like to work with the Committee to find an appropriate way to pro-
vide Congress updates and information on the coral programs, without diverting too 
many  resources  from  accomplishing  the  core  missions  of  these  programs.  Also,  al-
though  the  Act  provides  the  authority  for  NOAA  to  give  emergency  grants  for  ad-
dressing  unforeseen  or  disaster-related  circumstances,  we  have  never  implemented 
this  provision  and  are  potentially  restricted  from  doing  so.  Due  to  the  amount  of 
time that it takes to process a grant, this is not an appropriate vehicle for respond-
ing to an emergency situation. 
S. 363, Ballast Water Management Act of 2005 

Nonindigenous species are affecting habitats and species on all of our coasts, and 
introductions  of  new  species  can  alter  both  physical  habitat  and  impact  native  spe-
cies and ecosystem productivity. For example, last year, the State of Ohio shut down 
its  Great  Lakes  smallmouth  bass  fishery  for  the  months  of  May  and  June—two  of 
the  largest  months  for  their  recreational  fishery.  The  closure  surprised  the  public 
because  the  cause  was  a  fish  much  smaller  than  the  smallmouth  bass—the  round 
goby,  a  ballast  water  introduction.  The  male  smallmouth  bass  protect  the 
smallmouth bass nests from predators. When the males are removed, large numbers 
of  round  gobies  move  in  and  prey  on  the  eggs—jeopardizing  the  smallmouth  bass 
fishery. 

Another  example  of  direct  predation  is  the  introduction  of  the  green  crab.  When 
the green crab moved into the Gulf of Maine in the 1940s and 1950s, it contributed 
to the collapse of the soft-shell clam fishery. It was recently introduced to the West 
Coast, where it might affect Dungeness crab populations and shellfish aquaculture. 
Initial studies have already shown declines in abundance of native crab and bivalve 
populations in areas where the green crab has been established. 

Introduction of an invasive species can cause disruption of a food chain and have 
cascading impacts. In the northern portion of San Francisco Bay, a very small clam 
species—Potamocorbula  amurensis—has  become  so  abundant  and  is  such  an  effi-
cient filter feeder that phytoplankton are no longer abundant. The next step up the 
food  chain  is  the  zooplankton  that  feed  on  the  phytoplankton.  Significant  declines 
in  the  abundance  of  zooplankton  and  mysid  shrimp  have  now  been  documented.  In 
turn, these organisms are prey for juvenile fish species. 

NOAA’s Great Lakes Environmental Research Laboratory has documented a simi-
lar  food  chain  disruption  in  the  Great  Lakes.  In  some  areas,  up  to  75  percent  of 
the  benthic  biomass  is  made  up  of  Diporeia  species,  small  amphipod  crustaceans 
that are a primary prey-source for fish species such as the whitefish. In areas where 
zebra  mussels  are  present,  Diporeia  have  virtually  disappeared  and  whitefish  are 
showing signs of nutritional distress. 

I would like to update the Subcommittee on our progress in addressing the ballast 
water issue. During the 1996 reauthorization, NOAA and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife 
Service  (FWS)  were  charged  with  sponsoring  research  to  develop  new  technologies 
for ballast water management. Although primary responsibility for this program lies 
with FWS and NOAA, a number of different Federal agencies have been cooperating 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

on ballast water issues. The U.S. Department of Transportation Maritime Adminis-
tration  (MARAD)  deserves  particular  recognition.  Despite  not  being  mentioned  in 
the  existing  statute,  MARAD  has  volunteered  testing  platforms  for  research 
projects. Each year NOAA, FWS, and MARAD put out a joint request for proposals 
for  ballast  water  technology  development  projects  with  a  joint  peer-review  process 
for  selection.  In  addition  to  this  process,  other  Federal  agencies  involved  in  evalu-
ating technologies and setting priorities include the USCG, the Environmental Pro-
tection  Agency  (EPA),  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey,  and  the  Department  of  Defense. 
Since  1998,  54  research  projects  have  been  sponsored  under  the  Ballast  Water 
Demonstration Program. Sixteen additional ballast water-related projects have been 
sponsored  through  the  National  Sea  Grant  College  Program  aquatic  nuisance  spe-
cies competition. Among the technologies that have been tested are filtration, ultra-
violet  radiation,  ozone  injection,  sonic  bombardment,  heat  treatment,  and  oxidizing 
and non-oxidizing biocides. We are well beyond proof of concept with many of these 
technologies, and there are some promising results. 

Even  as  we  have  begun  to  address  the  development  of  new  technologies,  new 
issues have arisen concerning ballast water. In the Great Lakes region, there is con-
siderable concern over vessels with no ballast onboard (NOBOB). While fully loaded 
vessels  may  declare  no  ballast  onboard,  organisms  may  still  be  present  in  residual 
water  and  sediments  at  the  bottom  of  the  tank.  These  organisms  may  be  resus-
pended  as  cargo  is  unloaded  and  ballast  water  is  added  to  compensate.  In  2001, 
NOAA’s  Great  Lakes  Environmental  Research  Laboratory  identified  NOBOB  ships 
as a high priority research need. They organized a large multi-institutional research 
project  with  multiple  sponsors  to  directly  characterize  and  assess  the  invasion  risk 
from  ballast  water  discharges  associated  with  NOBOB  vessels  operating  in  the 
Great  Lakes.  In  addition  to  looking  at  the  NOBOB  issue,  the  program  also  looked 
at the efficacy of ballast water exchange. 

The final report of the NOBOB Assessment program found that ballast water ex-
change  can  be  highly  effective  for  reducing  concentrations  of  organisms  entrained 
with coastal ballast water, and although it remains imperfect, it is generally a bene-
ficial  management  practice  in  the  absence  of  more  effective  management  tools.  The 
assumption that ‘‘salinity shock’’ is an additional advantage for protecting the Great 
Lakes  ecosystem  from  invasive  species  must  be  viewed  with  some  caution  and  re-
quires  further  examination.  The  effectiveness  of  ‘‘salinity  shock’’  in  eliminating 
freshwater-tolerant  organisms  varied  widely  depending  on  the  types  and  forms  of 
organisms  that  are  present  in  ballast  tanks,  including  whether  the  organism  is  in 
a  resting,  larval,  or  adult  stage.  While  ‘‘salinity  shock’’  may  be  a  useful  tool,  like 
ballast water exchange, it is imperfect. 

As you can see, the introduction of non-indigenous species is an issue of great im-
portance. The 1990 NANPCA initially focused on ballast water and the Great Lakes. 
The  1996  National  Invasive  Species  Act  provided  voluntary  guidelines  for  the  rest 
of  the  country  with  provision  for  regulatory  action  if  the  voluntary  guidelines  were 
not  effective.  As  you  know,  the  USCG  made  a  formal  finding  that  the  voluntary 
guidelines were not effective and issued regulations requiring ballast water manage-
ment  for  vessels  entering  U.S.  ports  from  beyond  the  Exclusive  Economic  Zone 
(EEZ).  Currently,  the  only  practical  method  of  management  is  ballast  water  ex-
change, but all stakeholders recognize that this is an interim solution until methods 
for treating ballast water are developed. 

NOAA supports the goal of S. 363, which is to reduce the risk of introducing new 
invasive species by ballast water. While S. 363 addresses the issues associated with 
ballast  water,  NOAA  is  concerned  that  it  only  amends  section  1101  of  NANPCA. 
While NOAA notes that the entire NANPCA is due for reauthorization, we acknowl-
edge  that  ballast  water  is  a  highly  time-sensitive  issue,  and  therefore,  understand 
the need for narrowing the focus of legislation such as S. 363. 

I would like to focus on a few of the sections of S. 363 that we feel warrant special 
attention.  S.  363  includes  two  separate  administrative  procedures  for  determining 
acceptable  exchange  zones.  The  bill  provides  for  ballast  water  exchange  in  water 
that  is  at  least  50  nautical  miles  from  land  and  200  meters  in  depth.  The  USCG— 
in  consultation  with  NOAA  and  EPA—is  responsible  for  issuing  limitations  on  bal-
last water exchange in these areas. However, the designation of alternate exchange 
zones  within  50  nautical  miles  from  land  and  200  meters  in  depth  is  the  responsi-
bility of NOAA, in consultation with USCG and EPA. Because the USCG is the pri-
mary regulatory authority for ballast water exchange and will be responsible for en-
forcement, NOAA recommends the USCG be the lead for both procedures after con-
sultation with NOAA and EPA. 

NOAA  also  would  like  to  express  concern  over  one  of  the  definitions  in  Section 
3(b)(5). This section proposes a new paragraph 13 for Section 1003 of the NANPCA 
defining ‘‘harmful aquatic organisms and pathogens.’’ Under the proposed definition, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

these  are  organisms  determined  by  the  Secretary  to  cause  an  adverse  impact  if  in-
troduced. Such determinations and creation of a list of organisms would not be use-
ful  in  the  context  of  ballast  water  management  and  could  require  significant  re-
sources.  In  the  case  of  ballast  water,  literally  thousands  of  species  could  be  intro-
duced, and the biological information for many is insufficient to assess whether they 
will  become  invasive  or  cause  adverse  impacts.  To  put  this  in  context,  James 
Carlton,  one  of  the  leading  theorists  on  invasion  biology,  once  said  that  zebra  mus-
sels would not have been an obvious choice for a list of potential invaders. He point-
ed out that prior to the late 1980s they probably had been carried in ballast water. 
However,  only  when  a  combination  of  ecological  conditions  and  concentration  of  or-
ganisms was present did they become established. Because of the difficulties of dis-
tinguishing  harmful  organisms  from  benign  ones,  virtually  all  treatment  and  man-
agement options are designed to remove or inactivate all aquatic organisms, and we 
therefore recommend revision of the definition to reflect this reality. 

Considerable  progress  has  been  made  in  addressing  the  ballast  water  problem 
since the 1996 reauthorization, but much work remains. The Fiscal Year 2006 Presi-
dent’s budget requests $7.9M to continue NOAA’s valuable work to prevent invasive 
species through programs such as the Aquatic Invasive Species Program, Sea Grant, 
the  Great  Lakes  Environmental  Research  Lab,  and  National  Center  for  Coastal 
Ocean Science. This includes augmenting research to significantly advance the tech-
niques available to stop invasive species transfer through ship ballast water. I urge 
you to support this request. As we learn more, new issues will arise. The emerging 
issue  of  coastwise  traffic,  which  involves  ships  that  never  move  out  of  the  200-mile 
EEZ  and  are  not  required  to  exchange  ballast  water,  magnifies  the  importance  of 
new  treatment  technologies.  However,  with  a  strong  commitment,  I  think  that  we 
will be able to significantly reduce the risks associated with ballast water as a vec-
tor for the introduction of new species. 
Conclusion 

That concludes my testimony, Mr. Chairman. I would be happy to respond to any 

questions that the Subcommittee may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Mr. Keeney. Our next witness is Kim 
Hum, the Coastal Marine Program Director at The Nature Conser-
vancy of Hawaii. Welcome. 

STATEMENT OF KIM HUM, DIRECTOR, COASTAL MARINE 

PROGRAM, THE NATURE CONSERVANCY OF HAWAII 

Ms. HUM. Thank you. Chairman Sununu, Senator Boxer, Senator 
Inouye. Aloha. My name is Kim Hum. I’m the Coastal Marine Pro-
gram Director for The Nature Conservancy of Hawaii’s Program. If 
any of you have ever read a self-improvement book, you know that 
they  tell  you  to  take  risks  and  get  out  of  your  comfort  zone,  so  I’d 
like to thank you for this opportunity to get out of my comfort zone 
and  testify  before  you  today  on  reauthorization  of  Coral  Reef  Con-
servation  Act  of  2000.  I’m  not  here  as  a  scientific  expert  but  as  a 
practitioner;  as  someone  who’s  responsible  for  implementing  coral 
reef  conservation  in  the  field  in  Hawaii.  And  I’m  honored  to  have 
this  opportunity  to  talk  with  you  about  the  work  we’ve  been  doing 
in  Hawaii  and  what  more  needs  to  be  done  with  support  from 
NOAA under the Coral Reef Conservation Act. 

The Hawaiian archipelago and associated reefs stretch more than 
1,500  miles  from  the  island  of  Hawaii  in  the  southeast,  to  Kure 
Atoll  in  the  Northwest  Hawaiian  Islands.  Hawaii  is  the  most  iso-
lated  landmass  on  earth,  2,500  frequent  flyer  miles  away  from  the 
mainland  U.S.  This  geographic  isolation  has  resulted  in  one  of  the 
highest levels of endemism in the world. Twenty-five percent of the 
marine  species  found  in  Hawaii  are  found  nowhere  else  on  earth. 
This means that if we lose them in Hawaii, they are gone from the 
world  forever.  And  yet  Hawaii’s  reefs  face  many  of  the  threats 
faced  by  reef  systems  around  the  world;  over-harvesting,  coastal 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

development,  polluted  runoff,  invasive  species,  bleaching,  and  dis-
ease.  Combining  these  threats  have  led  to  a  75  percent  reduction 
in  near-shore  fisheries  in  the  Hawaiian  islands  over  the  past  100 
years. 

Our  job  in  Hawaii,  across  the  Nation,  and  around  the  globe,  is 
to work with our partners to reverse this trend and ensure that our 
coral  reefs  and  associated  near-shore  fisheries  are  sustainable  for 
generations to come. So while I am going to speak today about our 
work  in  Hawaii,  I  hope  you  will  be  thinking  about  how  this  work 
can serve as a model in your states and other coastal states around 
the country. 

With the support of NOAA’s coral reef program, The Nature Con-
servancy  launched  a  marine  program  in  2002,  to  begin  to  address 
the  most  urgent  threats  to  Hawaii’s  coral  reefs.  Over  the  past  3 
years we’ve initiated a marine GAP program to collect and manage 
information  about  the  location  and  status  of  Hawaii’s  marine  re-
sources, identify the top three coral reef priority sites for protection 
on each of the main Hawaiian islands, brought together more than 
80 community members from 15 local communities to share strate-
gies  for  coral  reef  conservation  in  annual  workshops,  developed  a 
Makai  Watch  program  focused  on  training  local  community  mem-
bers  to  provide  education  and  outreach  to  marine  resource  users, 
surveillance  and  enforcement  of  marine  resource  protection  laws, 
and monitoring of coral reef resources. We’ve established reef funds 
on two islands with local dive and snorkel operators who solicit vol-
untary  donations  from  their  clients  for  private  coral  reef  conserva-
tion efforts. And we supported more than 15 other local community 
efforts  to  understand  and  manage  reef  resources,  including  the  re-
establishment of traditional Hawaiian opelu fishing in a traditional 
coastal  fishing  village  on  the  Big  Island  of  Hawaii,  and  interviews 
with  kupuna,  Hawaiian  elders,  around  the  state  about  the  status 
and  decline  of  near-shore  fisheries.  And  we’ve  been  able  to  accom-
plish all of this with $125,000 in annual funding from NOAA which 
has leveraged more than $350,000 annually in private sources and 
hundreds  of  hours  of  community  volunteer  time  for  coral  reef  con-
servation in the islands. 

While  we’re  proud  of  these  accomplishments  and  the  partner-
ships we have built over the past 3 years and grateful for the sup-
port from NOAA and our Congressional delegation, it’s clear there’s 
a great deal more to be done. Over the next 5 years we will expand 
on our past work with NOAA, with state, and our community part-
ners in three main areas: moving from three priority sites on each 
island  to  developing  a  resilient  network  of  marine  managed  areas 
encompassing at least 20 percent of near-shore waters, building on 
the success of our Makai Watch program to engage coastal commu-
nities  throughout  the  network  in  coral  reef  conservation,  and  ex-
panding the reef funds to include a larger sector of the tourism in-
dustry on each of the main islands with the goal of raising $1 mil-
lion  annually  in  private  funding  for  coral  reef  conservation  on  the 
islands. 

In  our  written  testimony,  we  have  provided  recommended  addi-
tions  to  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  to  support  these  efforts 
and  efforts  like  them  around  the  country.  While  all  of  the  rec-
ommendations are important, I would like to highlight the need for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

increased funding authorization. NOAA has done a tremendous job 
implementing  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  with  the  funding 
they  have  had  over  the  past  5  years.  They  have  exponentially  ad-
vanced  our  understanding  of  the  extent  and  health  of  U.S.  coral 
reefs  and  built  unprecedented  interagency  cooperation  through  the 
Coral Reef Task Force. 

However, additional funding is needed for them to continue their 
good  work  and  build  state  and  NGO  capacity  for  local  reef  con-
servation efforts, including a new $10 million grant program to en-
gage local community members in reef management in a meaning-
ful  way.  Increased  funding  should  also  support  state  efforts  to  de-
velop  resilient  networks  of  scientifically-designed  marine-managed 
areas  which  have  been  shown  to  increase  the  health  of  coral  reefs 
and  near-shore  fisheries  in  about  80  places  around  the  world.  We 
believe that these and the other changes recommended in our writ-
ten  testimony  will  enable  NOAA  and  their  partners  to  make  tre-
mendous strides toward protecting our Nation’s coral reefs. Mahalo 
for the opportunity to testify. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Hum follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KIM HUM, DIRECTOR, COASTAL MARINE PROGRAM, 

THE NATURE CONSERVANCY OF HAWAII 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  aloha  and  mahalo  for  the  oppor-
tunity  to  testify  on  the  reauthorization  of  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  of  2000. 
My  name  is  Kim  Hum,  and  I  am  the  Director  of  the  Coastal  Marine  Program  for 
The Nature Conservancy of Hawaii. I am honored to have this opportunity to inform 
you  of  the  work  we’ve  been  doing  with  our  partners  in  Hawaii  to  conserve  coral 
reefs,  what  more  needs  to  be  done,  and  what  it’s  going  to  take  to  ensure  that  our 
reef resources are sustainably managed for generations to come. 

The  mission  of  The  Nature  Conservancy  is  to  preserve  the  plants,  animals,  and 
natural  communities  that  represent  the  diversity  of  life  on  Earth  by  protecting  the 
lands  and  waters  they  need  to  survive.  With  the  support  of  more  than  1  million 
members,  The  Nature  Conservancy  has  protected  more  than  120  million  acres  and 
5,000  river  miles  around  the  world.  We  currently  have  more  than  100  marine  con-
servation  projects  in  21  countries  and  22  U.S.  states.  Through  its  work  with  both 
freshwater  and  marine  species  and  habitats,  the  Conservancy  helps  to  connect  ter-
restrial,  freshwater,  and  marine  conservation  efforts  by  building  on  the  Conser-
vancy’s  network  of  partners  and  innovative  approaches  developed  at  sites  around 
the world to pursue integrated coastal conservation. 

I  would  like  to  start  by  commending  NOAA  for  the  incredible  progress  they  have 
made  identifying,  mapping,  and  protecting  coral  reefs  throughout  the  U.S.  over  the 
past 5 years. They have exponentially advanced our understanding of the extent and 
health of U.S. coral reefs, and built unprecedented interagency cooperation through 
the Coral Reef Task Force in our efforts to protect and restore coral reefs. They de-
serve our respect and continued support for their work. 
Coral Reef Conservation Efforts in Hawaii 

NOAA  has  a  big  job  in  Hawaii.  The  Hawaiian  archipelago  and  associated  reefs 
stretch  more  than  2,500  kilometers  (1,500  miles)  from  the  island  of  Hawaii  in  the 
southeast, to Kure Atoll in the northwest. Hawaii’s geographic isolation has resulted 
in one of the highest levels of marine endemism in the world—25 percent of the ma-
rine  species  found  in  Hawaii  are  found  nowhere  else  on  Earth—so  if  we  lose  them 
in Hawaii, they are gone from the world forever. This isolation also means that the 
Hawaiian  reefs  are  almost  exclusively  self-dependent  for  replenishment.  They  are 
not  repopulated  from  other  reefs  following  depletion  of  their  fish  stocks  or  damage 
from  storms  and  other  large  scale  catastrophes.  This  raises  the  stakes  on  the  need 
to fortify the resilience of our reefs and to manage them exceptionally well through 
a series of integrated conservation and management actions. 

Hawaii’s coral reefs are essential for our islands’ physical and economic survival— 
they  protect  us  from  storm  waves,  create  our  world  famous  surf  and  beaches,  pro-
vide  food  and  recreation  for  our  residents,  and  are  the  basis  for  the  state’s  $11  bil-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

lion 1 tourism  industry,  including  $800  million  annually  in  marine  tourism  alone. 
And  yet,  Hawaii’s  reefs  face  many  of  the  threats  faced  by  reef  systems  around  the 
world—over  harvesting,  coastal  development,  polluted  runoff,  invasive  species, 
bleaching, and disease. NOAA, indeed, has a big job in the islands. 

With  the  support  of  NOAA’s  Coral  Reef  Program,  The  Nature  Conservancy 
launched  a  Marine  Program  in  2002,  to  begin  to  address  the  most  urgent  threats 
to Hawaii’s coral reefs. We began by commissioning a study of the status of private 
conservation efforts in Hawaii, and learned that the three biggest needs are to: 

1. Identify the most important coral reef systems in Hawaii, 
2. Build community capacity to protect and manage reef resources, and 
3. Develop sustainable private funding mechanisms to ensure the long term via-
bility of community-based coral reef conservation programs. 

These  three  strategies  have  guided  our  program  development  over  the  past  3 
years,  and  with  support  from  NOAA’s  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Program,  we  have: 
• Worked  with  NOAA  and  the  State  to  initiate  a  marine  GAP  program  to  collect 
and  manage  information  about  the  location  and  status  of  Hawaii’s  marine  re-
sources. 
• Identified  the  top  three  action  sites  on  each  island  through  a  rapid  strategic 
planning  process  that  included  a  comprehensive  literature  review,  information 
gathered from the marine GAP database, and extensive expert interviews. 
• Brought together more than 80 community members from 15 local communities 
who  are  actively  engaged  in  marine  conservation  projects  into  a  learning  net-
work with annual workshops focused on sharing strategies for marine conserva-
tion. 
• Developed  and  piloted  a  Makai  Watch  Program  focused  on  training  local  com-
munity  members  to  provide  (1)  education  and  outreach  to  marine  resource 
users, (2) surveillance and enforcement of marine resource protection laws, and 
(3)  monitoring  of  coral  reef  resources.  Makai  Watch  is  now  a  priority  of  the 
state  Department  of  Land  and  Natural  Resources  (DLNR)  because  they  recog-
nize the power of an engaged community committed to natural resource protec-
tion. 
• Established  ‘‘Reef  Funds’’  on  two  islands  with  local  dive  and  snorkel  operators 
who  solicit  voluntary  donations  from  their  clients  to  support  private  coral  reef 
conservation efforts. To date, these funds have supported the repair and instal-
lation  of  mooring  buoys  on  the  islands  of  Lanai  and  Maui,  staffing  for  the  Big 
Island  Reef  Fund,  and  development  of  an  educational  website  designed  to  in-
form  ocean  users  of  laws  and  best  practices  governing  their  use  of  coral  reefs 
and other marine resources. 
• Supported more than 15 local community efforts to understand and manage reef 
resources,  including  human-use  surveys  on  Kauai  and  the  Big  Island  to  deter-
mine  human-based  threats  to  the  resources,  surveys  of  the  offshore  islets  sur-
rounding  the  main  Hawaiian  Islands,  reestablishment  of  traditional  opelu  fish-
ing  methods  at  a  local  community  on  the  Big  Island,  interviews  with  kupuna 
(Hawaiian  elders)  around  the  state  about  the  status  and  decline  of  near-shore 
fisheries, and many other community-based projects. 

We have been able to accomplish all of this with $125,000 each year from NOAA, 
which  has  leveraged  more  than  $350,000  annually  from  private  sources,  and  hun-
dreds  of  hours  of  community  volunteer  time  for  coral  reef  conservation  in  the  is-
lands. 

While we are proud of the record of accomplishment and the partnerships we have 
built over the past 3 years, and grateful for the support from NOAA and our delega-
tion,  it  is  clear  that  there  is  a  great  deal  more  to  be  done.  Over  the  next  5  years, 
the  Conservancy  plans  to  expand  on  our  past  work  with  partners  into  three  main 
areas: 

work for expanding our conservation efforts; 

• Complete  an  eco-regional  assessment  for  marine  areas  in  Hawaii  as  a  frame-
• Building on the success of the Makai Watch, and the results of our eco-regional 
plan to enhance community engagement in resource conservation, and to broad-
en our partnership with the state. 

• Identify opportunities to increase resources for coral reef conservation. 

1 Department  of  Business,  Economic  Development  &  Tourism—Research  and  Economic  Anal-

ysis Division. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Currently,  the  Conservancy  has  identified  priority  marine  sites  on  each  island 
where  we  will  focus  the  majority  of  our  efforts.  However,  we  are  currently  devel-
oping  a  comprehensive  eco-regional  assessment  that  will  more  thoroughly  review 
the  status  and  threats  to  coral  communities  in  Hawaii.  While  we  have  seen  some 
success in coral conservation on a site by site basis—the survival of coral reefs relies 
upon  their  health,  resilience,  and  ability  to  repopulate.  This  will  only  be  achieved 
through a series of integrated conservation and management actions. Based on this 
we  plan  to  work  with  NOAA  and  the  state  to  expand  our  strategic  plan  from  three 
sites  on  each  island  to  develop  a  network  of  Marine  Managed  Areas  in  the  main 
Hawaiian  Islands.  We  will  address  unique  threats  at  each  network  site  as  appro-
priate. 

The  Conservancy  sees  its  partnerships  with  the  state  and  local  communities  as 
the  most  effective  means  to  achieve  our  conservation  objectives.  We  anticipate  that 
the  strategies  to  address  threats  identified  through  our  science  efforts  will  be  suc-
cessful only if implemented in partnership with communities. We will work to build 
upon the success of Makai Watch at developing community capacity to protect coral 
reefs  by  implementing  it  in  high-priority  coastal  communities  around  the  state  in 
partnership with DLNR. 

Finally, while we are grateful for Federal support for these efforts, and have good 
success  at  raising  funds  from  private  sources—the  challenge  of  paying  for  these  ef-
forts  is  daunting.  We  will  work  to  develop  additional  funding  sources  including  ex-
panding  the  Reef  Funds  to  include  a  larger  sector  of  the  tourism  industry  on  each 
of the main islands, with the goal of raising $1 million annually in private funding 
for coral reef conservation. 
Coral Reefs Are a Priority for The Nature Conservancy 

Across  the  oceans,  The  Nature  Conservancy  is  promoting  a  worldwide  effort  to 
conserve coral reefs and the rich diversity of life in tropical waters. By helping cre-
ate  networks  of  ecologically-connected  protected  areas  that  are  resilient  in  the  face 
of  growing  local  and  global  stresses,  we  can  ensure  the  survival  and  long-term  via-
bility of Earth’s invaluable coral reefs. 

The  Conservancy’s  marine  program  in  Hawaii  is  part  of  a  broader  effort  across 
the  Conservancy  to  address  threats  to  coral  reefs.  Drawing  on  input  from  the 
world’s experts on coral reefs, The Nature Conservancy has created a vision for trop-
ical marine conservation that enhances the prospect of survival for coral reefs. This 
vision will catalyze efforts to: 

Areas; and 

• Expand the area of coral reef and related habitats that is protected; 
• Improve  the  effectiveness  and  financial  security  of  tropical  Marine  Managed 
• Build the principles of resilience into design and stewardship of managed areas. 
In  the  Pacific,  together  with  local  communities,  non-governmental  partners  and 
local,  regional,  state  and  Federal  governments,  the  Conservancy  is  currently  work-
ing  to  identify  and  help  to  manage  biologically-important  marine  areas,  not  only  in 
Hawaii,  but  in  the  Freely  Associated  States—Federated  States  of  Micronesia  and 
Palau,  the  Republic  of  the  Marshall  Islands—as  well  as  Papua  New  Guinea,  Indo-
nesia,  and  the  Solomon  Islands.  Coral  reefs  in  the  Pacific  are  essential  to  the  food 
security  of  the  region’s  coastal  population  today,  and  their  hope  for  a  better  future 
for  tomorrow—a  future  in  which  reefs  continue  to  provide  the  fish  for  protein,  and 
a  resource  that  can  form  the  basis  for  the  increasingly  important  tourism  sector  so 
important to many Pacific nations. The Conservancy and other international NGO’s 
are  developing  partnership  agreements  with  national  governments  to  assist  these 
countries  in  developing  networks  of  managed  areas,  to  help  assure  the  health  and 
resilience of their coral reef resources. 

These  efforts  have  yielded  not  only  conservation  results,  but  have  improved  our 
understanding  and  provide  insights  to  managers  in  other  jurisdictions  about  the 
science  of  coral  reef  conservation.  They  have  also  taught  important  lessons  about 
the  need  to  work  closely  with  communities  to  ensure  conservation  strategies  sup-
port,  and  are  informed  by,  socio-economic  realities.  The  Conservancy  has  worked 
closely  with  the  Coral  Reef  Task  Force  so  that  these  experiences  may  inform  their 
efforts, but also to lend our science, capacity, and resources to address shared prior-
ities in the U.S. states and territories. 
Recommendations 

The  Conservancy  supports  a  strong  reauthorization  of  the  Coral  Reef  Conserva-
tion  Act.  NOAA’s  work  under  this  Act  has  been  essential  to  the  progress  made  to 
date.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee  on  reauthorization  and  are 
pleased to offer some general recommendations today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Increased  funding.  Authorization  for  appropriations  under  the  Act  should  be  in-
creased  and  the  purposes  expanded.  Increased  funding  for  grants  to  support  map-
ping,  planning,  implementation,  and  monitoring  is  essential.  Additionally,  the  Act 
should be expanded to include a specific authorization for the Department of the In-
terior—both through the Office of Insular Affairs, which supports work in the terri-
tories and Freely Associated States, and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife, which manages 
coral reefs under several of its maritime National Wildlife Refuges. 

Marine  Managed  Areas  Network.  Networks  of  scientifically-designed  managed 
areas  have  been  shown  to  increase  the  health  of  coral  reefs  and  associated  near- 
shore fisheries in more then 80 places around the world. Development of such a net-
work  throughout  the  United  States  should  be  a  top  priority  for  NOAA’s  coral  pro-
gram, and funding priority should be given to states and territories for development 
and  implementation  of  a  NOAA-approved  Managed  Areas  plan,  and  management 
and enforcement of existing managed areas that are part of a NOAA-approved Man-
aged Areas plan. 

Interagency Cooperation. No one agency has the ability to abate all of the threats 
to  coral  reef  ecosystems  in  all  of  the  places  where  they  happen.  For  example,  the 
Fish  and  Wildlife  Service  (FWS)  is  responsible  for  managing  more  than  700,000 
acres  of  coral  reefs  in  10  refuges  throughout  Hawaii  and  the  Pacific,  with  minimal 
funding  from  the  Department  of  the  Interior.  Therefore,  interagency  cooperation  is 
essential to successful implementation of the strategies outlined in this Act, and the 
Coral Reef Action Strategy, and all of the agencies that are responsible for coral reef 
management  should  be  eligible  for  funding  under  the  Act.  Mechanisms  for  inter-
agency cooperation, like the Coral Reef Task Force, should be supported through the 
Act,  and  include  national  and  international  NGO’s  like  The  Nature  Conservancy, 
which  bring  a  unique  perspective  and  global  experience  to  coral  reef  conservation. 
Regional  Coordination  and  Cooperation.  In  addition  to  the  national  planning  and 
cooperation necessary for successful protection of our Nation’s reef resources, NOAA 
should  be  given  the  authority  to  coordinate  with  states,  territories,  and  NGO’s  for 
regional,  ecosystem-based  planning  that  builds  upon  the  national  coral  reef  action 
strategy,  and  addresses  multiple  threats  to  coral  reefs,  such  as  over-harvesting, 
coastal runoff, invasive species, and vessel impacts. 

With  these  changes,  we  believe  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  will  enable  us 

to make tremendous strides toward protecting our Nation’s coral reefs. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  input  on  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation 

Act. I would be happy to answer any questions. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  And  our  final  witness  is 
Maurya  Falkner  of  the  Marine  Invasive  Species  Program  within 
the  California  State  Lands  Commission.  Welcome,  and  thank  you 
for your testimony. 
STATEMENT  OF  MAURYA  B.  FALKNER,  PROGRAM  MANAGER, 
MARINE  INVASIVE  SPECIES  PROGRAM,  CALIFORNIA  STATE 
LANDS COMMISSION (CSLC) 
Ms. FALKNER. Good morning and thank you, Mr. Chairman, and 
members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  am  the  Program  Manager  for  the 
Marine  Invasive  Species  Program  in  California  State  Lands  Com-
mission and have been asked to provide testimony this morning on 
our  efforts  to  manage  ballast  water  in  the  State  of  California,  and 
based  on  those  experiences,  some  recommendations  for  developing 
any  national  ballast  water  management  program.  California  State 
Lands  Commission  has  significant  experience  working  to  prevent 
and control the establishment of non-indigenous species via ballast 
water discharges. The 1999 Ballast Water Management for Control 
of Non-indigenous Species Act, Assembly bill 703, charged the com-
mission  with  oversight  of  the  state’s  first  mandatory  program  to 
prevent non-indigenous species introductions through ballast water 
discharged  by  commercial  vessels.  Upon  the  sunset  of  the  Act,  the 
Marine  Invasive  Species  Act,  Assembly  bill  433,  was  passed  in 
2003, revising and widening the scope of the Commission’s program 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

to  more  effectively  address  the  non-indigenous  species  threat.  Due 
to our continued and expanded intensive outreach by staff and uti-
lization  of  technical  advisory  groups,  a  monthly  electronic  notifica-
tion  system  along  with  daily  interactions  with  maritime  industry 
and  the  potential  for  civil  and  criminal  penalties,  compliance  with 
the  California  Act  has  continued  to  improve,  exceeding  95  percent 
in all components. The program’s success and relatively weak Fed-
eral  program  supports  the  continuation  of  the  California  Marine 
Invasive Species Program. 

My  written  testimony  provides  a  great  deal  more  detail  on  the 
California  program  and  the  successes  that  we’ve  had,  so  now  I’m 
going  to  turn  my  attention  to  some  of  the  experiences  that  we’ve 
had  in  California  and  our  recommendations  for  the  Federal  law-
makers. 

First,  we  believe  that  ballast  water  management  requirements 
should  apply  to  all  voyages  including  those  operating  inside  the 
U.S.  EEZ.  It’s  widely  recognized  that  transport  of  non-indigenous 
species is not restricted to voyages arriving simply from outside the 
EEZ.  For  example,  on  the  West  Coast,  a  highly  invaded  area  such 
as San Francisco Bay, can serve, and does serve, as a hub for non- 
indigenous  species  transport  to  other  Pacific  Coast  region  ports 
such as Los Angeles and Portland. So we recommend that the law-
makers  consider  all  voyages  and  not  just  those  from  outside  the 
EEZ. 

Ballast  water  exchange  is  also  widely  considered  an  interim 
management  tool  and  as  the  Admiral  mentioned  it’s  going  to  be 
phased-out  eventually  with  the  IMO  standards.  We  are  mandated 
under  our  Act  put  forward  performance  standards  recommenda-
tions for our legislature to consider, and we have developed a panel 
that  spends  a  significant  amount  of  time  evaluating  the  standards 
adopted by the IMO Convention and discharge standards that have 
been  proposed  in  U.S.  legislation,  specifically,  the  Ballast  Water 
Management Act of 2005. We applaud IMO’s steps forward on this 
issue  by  focusing  on  a  concentration-based  performance  standard, 
however,  the  standard  that’s  being  proposed  provides  very  little 
protection,  if  any,  beyond  unmanaged  ballast.  Work  that’s  been 
done  looking  at  unmanaged  ballast  water  indicates  that—suggests 
that  the  IMO  standard  is  only  at  very  best  going  to  decrease 
zooplankton  concentrations  by  one  order  of  magnitude  and  will  do 
nothing 
for 
unmanaged  ballast  water,  so  it  doesn’t  consider  exchanged  ballast 
water. We believe that the Ballast Water Management Act of 2005, 
is  as  we  know  a  much  stricter,  concentration-based  standard,  and 
we  believe  that  this  should  be  adopted  at  least  in  the  interim,  or 
at  least  as  an  interim  standard  while  other  technologies  are  im-
proving that performance. 

for  phytoplankton  concentrations,  and 

We  also  believe  that  national  legislation  should  look  at  ship  me-
diated  non-ballast  water  vectors,  for  example,  hull  fouling.  There 
are  several  recent  papers  out  suggesting  that  hull  fouling  may  be 
as  important  if  not  more  so  than  ballast  water  in  at  least  certain 
estuaries. And there’s very little work that’s been done on hull foul-
ing  and  we  need  to  develop  a  better  understanding  of  the  risks  of 
hull  fouling  and  housekeeping  practices  that  can  minimize  intro-
ductions via that route. 

this 

is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

All  of  the  things  that  I  have  been  talking  about  under  the  addi-
tional items in my written testimony cost money, and so we believe 
that the legislation, whatever is put forward, needs to provide dedi-
cated and secure funding for any kind of a national program. Cali-
fornia chose to use a fee-based program. That works great in Cali-
fornia.  It  may  not  be  the  answer  nationally,  but  it  does  work  and 
pays for all of our programs in California. 

Finally, I’d just like to say that as the regulations are developed, 
the  legislature  should  strongly  consider  the  continued  success  of 
programs  like  the  California  Marine  Invasive  Species  Program. 
Our  program  not  only  exemplifies  the  potential  of  state  programs, 
but  will  complement  and  reinforce  any  Federal  regulations  on  bal-
last  water  management.  So  preemption  provisions  may  be  bene-
ficial in specific areas such as performance standards for treatment 
of ballast water, however, broad preemption language for state pro-
grams  would  be  detrimental  to  the  overall  goal  of  controlling  NIS 
introductions via commercial shipping. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  comments  on  this  act 
and  we  look  forward  to  working  with  the  legislators  in  the  future 
on this. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Falkner follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MAURYA B. FALKNER, PROGRAM MANAGER, MARINE 
INVASIVE SPECIES PROGRAM, CALIFORNIA STATE LANDS COMMISSION (CSLC) 

Introduction 

Good  morning,  my  name  is  Maurya  Falkner,  and  I  am  the  Program  Manager  for 
the  Marine  Invasive  Species  Program  at  the  California  State  Lands  Commission.  I 
have  been  asked  to  provide  testimony  today  on  state  efforts  to  control  the  transfer 
of  non-native  species  through  ballast  water  management  as  well  as  on  efforts  to 
meet or exceed the standards and timetables agreed upon in the International Mari-
time Organization’s recently adopted Convention on Ballast Water Management. 

California State Lands Commission (CSLC) has significant experience working to 
prevent  and  control  the  establishment  of  nonindigenous  species  via  ballast  water 
discharges. The 1999 Ballast Water Management for Control of Non-indigenous Spe-
cies  Act  (Assembly  Bill  703)  charged  the  CSLC  with  oversight  of  the  state’s  first 
mandatory  program  to  prevent  non-indigenous  species  (NIS)  introductions  through 
the  ballast  water  of  commercial  vessels.  Upon  the  sunset  of  the  Act,  the  Marine 
Invasive Species Act (AB 433) was passed in 2003, revising and widening the scope 
of  the  CSLC  program  to  more  effectively  address  the  NIS  threat.  Under  the  new 
Act,  the  expanded  Marine  Invasive  Species  Program  (MISP)  continues  to  monitor 
compliance with the requirement to manage ballast water of foreign origin. In addi-
tion, the program has initiated administration of the following efforts: 

• Adopt reporting and ballast water management requirements for all voyages in 

the Pacific Coast Region. 

management technologies. 

• Develop  a  program  that  supports  the  development  of  ballast  treatment  and 

• Initiate  discussions  and  develop  policy  recommendations  for  ballast  treatment 

system performance standards. 

• Evaluate  the  risk  of  commercial  vessel  fouling  as  a  means  of  NIS  introduction, 

and formulate recommendations to reduce this risk. 

• Coordinate  and  consult  with  sister  agencies  that  administer  other  components 

of the Act (esp. Department of Fish and Game and Board of Equalization). 

The stated purpose of the Marine Invasive Species Act is to move the state expe-
ditiously  toward  elimination  of  the  discharge  of  nonindigenous  species  into  the 
waters  of  the  state,  or  into  waters  that  may  impact  the  waters  of  the  state,  based 
on the best available technology economically achievable. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Overview 

35 

Non-indigenous  species  (NIS)  are  organisms  that  have  been  transported  through 
human  activities  into  regions  where  they  did  not  occur  in  historical  time,  and  suc-
cessfully  reproduce  in  the  wild  at  their  new  location  (Carlton  2001).  Once  estab-
lished, such species can create negative economic, ecological, and human health im-
pacts  in  their  new  environs.  For  marine  and  estuarine  environments,  the  ballast 
water  of  ships  is  considered  one  of  the  major  pathways  through  which  foreign  spe-
cies are transported and spread (Stemming the Tide, 1996). 

In  response  to  this  threat,  the  California  Legislature  passed  Assembly  Bill  (AB) 
703,  the  Ballast  Water  Management  for  Control  of  Nonindigenous  Species  Act  in 
1999.  The  law  required  that  vessels  originating  from  outside  the  United  States  Ex-
clusive Economic Zone (EEZ) carry out mid-ocean exchange or use an approved bal-
last  water  treatment  method,  before  discharging  in  California  State  waters.  The 
California  State  Lands  Commission’s  (CSLC)  Ballast  Water  Management  Program 
was tasked with several specific responsibilities: 

mitted reports. 

ing to California State waters from outside the EEZ. 

• Receive and process ballast management reports submitted by all vessels arriv-
• Monitor  ballast  management  and  discharge  activities  of  vessels  through  sub-
• Inspect and sample vessels for compliance with the law. 
• Assess vessel reporting rates and compliance with the law. 
In  recognition  of  the  uncertainties  surrounding  the  development  of  an  effective 
ballast  water  management  program  for  the  State,  AB  703,  specified  a  sunset  date 
of  January  1,  2004.  During  the  2003  Legislative  session,  the  act  was  revised  and 
recast  as  AB  433,  the  Marine  Invasive  Species  Act  (Act).  Several  recommendations 
identified  during  the  administration  of  AB  703  and  detailed  in  the  program’s  first 
biennial  report  (Falkner  2003)  were  incorporated  into  the  2003  law.  In  accordance 
with the Act, the State program was renamed the Marine Invasive Species Program 
(MISP),  and  charged  with  several  expanded  responsibilities.  Key  among  these  are: 
• Authorization to pursue criminal and/or civil penalties for violations to the law. 
• Adopt ballast water management regulations for vessels originating from within 
• Adopt  regulations  for  the  evaluation  and  approval  of  experimental  shipboard 
• Sponsor a pilot program that will evaluate the feasibility of ballast water treat-
• Recommend  performance  standards  for  ballast  treatment  systems,  in  consulta-
• Evaluate  the  risk  of  non-ballast  ship-based  vectors  for  spreading  NIS  and  rec-
ommend actions to prevent associated introductions, in consultation with a tech-
nical advisory group. 

tion with an advisory panel. 

ballast treatment systems. 

the Pacific Coast Region. 

ment technologies. 

Shipping  Vectors—Also  know  as  ‘‘introduced,’’  ‘‘invasive,’’  ‘‘exotic,’’  ‘‘alien,’’  or 
‘‘aquatic  nuisance  species,’’  non-indigenous  species  (NIS)  in  marine,  estuarine,  and 
freshwater  environments  may  be  transported  to  new  regions  through  numerous 
human  activities.  Intentional  and  unintentional  introductions  of  fish  and  shellfish, 
aquaculture,  illegal  releases  from  the  aquarium  and  pet  industries,  floating  marine 
debris, bait shipping, and accidental release through research institutions are some 
of the mechanisms, or ‘‘vectors,’’ by which organisms are transferred (U.S. Commis-
sion  on  Ocean  Policy  2004).  In  coastal  environments,  commercial  shipping  is  the 
most  important  vector  for  invasion,  in  one  study  accounting  for  one  half  to  three- 
quarters  of  introductions  to  North  America  (Fofonoff  et  al.  2003).  Vessels  transport 
organisms through two primary sub-mechanisms: ballast water and fouling. 

Ballast  water  is  necessary  for  many  functions  related  to  the  trim,  stability,  ma-
neuverability,  and  propulsion  of  large  seagoing  vessels  (Stemming  the  Tide  1996). 
Vessels  may  take  on,  discharge,  or  redistribute  water  during  cargo  loading  and  un-
loading,  as  they  encounter  rough  seas,  or  as  they  transit  through  shallow  coastal 
waterways. As ballast is transferred from ‘‘source’’ to ‘‘destination’’ ports, so are the 
many  organisms  taken  into  its  tanks  along  with  the  port  water.  In  this  fashion,  it 
is estimated that some 7,000 plus organisms are moved around the world on a daily 
basis (Carlton 1999). 

Fouling  organisms  are  associated  with  hard  surfaces  that  are  exposed  to  water. 
These include organisms that physically attach to vessel surfaces, such as barnacles, 
algae,  and  mussels,  and  also  includes  mobile  organisms  that  associate  with  fouling 
communities, such as worms, juvenile crabs, and amphipods (small shrimp-like ani-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

mals).  Vessels  that  spend  long  periods  in  port  or  move  at  slow  speeds,  such  as 
barges  and  floating  dry  docks,  appear  to  accumulate  more  extensive  and  diverse 
fouling communities (Godwin et al. 2004, Minchin and Gollasch 2003, Godwin 2003). 
In  some  circumstances,  fouling  organisms  have  been  observed  to  be  in  spawning 
condition at arrival ports (Coutts et al. 2003, Apte et al. 2000). 

NIS Impacts—The rate, and thus the risk, of invasion has increased significantly 
during  recent  decades.  The  rate  of  reported  invasions  in  North  America  increased 
exponentially  over  the  last  200  years  (Ruiz  et  al.  2000a).  In  the  San  Francisco  Bay 
Estuary  alone,  a  new  species  is  believed  to  become  established  every  14  weeks 
(Cohen  and  Carlton  1998).  One  of  the  primary  factors  contributing  to  this  increase 
is the expansion of global trade, and the technologies, which enable commodities to 
be transported swiftly and efficiently throughout the world. Along with goods, orga-
nisms are moved over land, air, and sea in larger numbers to more widespread loca-
tions,  and  are  better  able  to  survive  the  shortening  excursions  (Ruiz  and  Carlton 
2003). 

Once  established,  NIS  can  have  severe  ecological,  economic,  and  human  health 
impacts to the receiving environment. The most infamous example is the zebra mus-
sel (Dreissena polymorpha) introduced to the Great Lakes from the Black Sea. They 
attach to hard surfaces in dense populations that clog municipal water systems and 
electric generating plants, resulting in costs of approximately a billion dollars a year 
(Pimentel  et  al.  2004).  The  Asian  clam  (Potamocorbula  amurensis)  spread  through-
out the San Francisco Bay and its tributaries 2 years after its introduction, and ac-
counts  for  up  to  95  percent  of  living  biomass  in  some  shallow  portions  of  the  bay 
floor  (Nichols  et  al.,  1990).  Like  its  Great  Lakes  counterpart,  the  Asian  clam  fouls 
power  plant  structures,  costing  approximately  a  billion  dollars  per  year  during  the 
early  80s  for  control  and  losses  (Lovell  and  Stone  2005).  The  Chinese  mitten  crab, 
(Eriocheir  siensis)  was  first  sighted  in  the  San  Francisco  Bay  in  1992,  and  quickly 
spread through the system, clogging pumping stations and riddling levies with bur-
rows (Rudnick et al. 2000). Costs for control and research were $1 million in 2000– 
2001  (Carlton  2001).  The  European  green  crab  (Carcinus  maenas),  thought  to  have 
caused  the  crash  of  the  Maine  softshell  clam  fishery,  arrived  in  California  during 
the  mid-1990s  (Grosholz  and  Ruiz  1995).  There  are  fears  that  it  will  compete  for 
food  with  the  valuable  Dungeness  crab  (Cancer  magister)  threatening  the  West 
Coast  fishery.  The  microorganisms  that  cause  human  Cholera  (Ruiz  et  al.  2000b) 
and  paralytic  shellfish  poisoning  (Hallegraeff  1998)  have  also  been  found  in  the 
water and sediments in ballast tanks. 

Prevention  Through  Ballast  Water  Management—Attempts  to  eradicate  NIS  after 
they  have  become  widely  distributed  are  typically  unsuccessful  and  costly  (Carlton 
2001). Control is likewise extremely expensive. For example, approximately $10 mil-
lion is spent annually to control the sea lamprey (Petromyzon marinus) in the Great 
Lakes (Lovell and Stone 2005); $2.3 million was spent to control the Mediterranean 
green seaweed (Caulerpa taxifolia) in southern California during 2000–2001, and $2 
million  was  spent 
(Spartinia 
alterniflora) between 1999–2001 (Carlton 2001). Prevention is, therefore, considered 
the most desirable way to address the issue. 

in  Washington  to  control  Atlantic  cordgrass 

For  the  vast  majority  of  commercial  vessels,  open-ocean  ballast  exchange  more 
than  200  nm  offshore  is  the  primary  method  of  ballast  water  management.  Cur-
rently,  it  is  the  best  compromise  of  efficacy,  environmental  safety,  and  economic 
practicality.  The  vast  majority  of  vessels  are  capable  of  conducting  exchange,  and 
the  management  practice  does  not  require  any  special  structural  modification  to 
most  of  the  vessels  in  operation.  Scientific  research  indicates  that  offshore  ballast 
exchange  typically  eliminates  70–95  percent  of  the  organisms  originally  taken  into 
a tank while at or near port (Zhang and Dickman 1999, Parsons 1998, Cohen 1998). 
Ballast  water  exchange,  however,  is  widely  considered  an  interim  ballast  water 
management  tool  because  of  its  variable  efficiency,  and  due  to  several  operational 
limitations.  In  the  future,  a  vessel  would  ideally  utilize  alternative  ship-  based  or 
shore-based  treatment  systems  that  reduce  organisms  in  ballast  water  as  well  as, 
or better than open-ocean exchange. 

Rules  Governing  Ballast  Water  Management—The  ballast  water  regulations  and 
guidelines  of  the  nations  and  U.S.  states  that  regulate  ballast  water  share  several 
similar  components.  All  allow  ballast  water  exchange  as  an  acceptable  method  of 
ballast  water  management,  and  provide  some  type  of  exemption  should  a  vessel  or 
its  crew  become  endangered  by  the  exchange  process.  All  accept  approved  alter-
native ballast water treatments in anticipation that an effective technology is devel-
oped.  All  but  the  International  Maritime  Organization,  require  the  completion  and 
submission of forms detailing ballast management and discharge practices. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

International Regulations—The International Maritime Organization (IMO) adopt-
ed  the  International  Convention  for  the  Control  and  Management  of  Ships’  Ballast 
Water and Sediments in February of 2004, which becomes effective 1 year after rati-
fication  by  30  countries  representing  35  percent  of  the  world  shipping  tonnage 
(International  Maritime  Organization).  Vessels  must  conduct  exchange  at  least  50 
nm  from  shore  in  waters  at  least  200  meters  deep,  though  it  is  preferred  exchange 
be  conducted  200  nm  offshore.  Vessels  can  forgo  these  exchange  requirements  if 
compliance would result in undue delay or deviation from the vessels’ intended voy-
age.  In  anticipation  of  the  improvement  and  installation  of  ballast  water  treatment 
systems,  the  Convention  also  calls  for  a  gradual  phase-out  of  ballast  water  ex-
change.  Depending  on  construction  date  and  ballast  water  capacity,  vessels  will  in-
stead  be  expected  to  meet  a  ballast  water  discharge  standard  according  to  fixed 
dates.  Finally,  a  significant  provision  of  the  Convention  is  the  provision  that  recog-
nizes  the  right  of  member  states  to  take  more  stringent  measures  to  prevent  NIS 
introductions. As of spring 2005, the United States has not signed onto the conven-
tion. 

Canada,  Australia,  and  New  Zealand—Canada  adopted  voluntary  guidelines  in 
2001, and vessels are requested to conduct exchange in waters 200 nm offshore and 
2,000  meters  or  deeper.  The  ports  of  Vancouver,  Nanaimo,  and  Fraser  River  make 
these voluntary guidelines mandatory, though vessels arriving from Alaska and U.S. 
West Coast ports north of Cape Mendocino are exempted (Transport Canada 2001). 
Australia  requires  ballast  water  exchange  outside  of  the  12  nm  Australian  limit  in 
waters  greater  than  200  m  deep,  and  ballast  water  from  ‘‘high-risk’’  areas  are  pro-
hibited  (Australian  Quarantine  and  Inspection  Service).  In  New  Zealand,  vessels 
must conduct mid-ocean exchange in waters at least 200 nm offshore, and must ob-
tain permission before discharging, even if ballast water has been exchanged. Abso-
lutely  no  discharge  is  allowed  if  vessels  contain  water  from  the  ‘‘high-risk’’  ports  of 
Tazmania  and  Port  Philip  Bay,  both  in  Australia  (New  Zealand  Ministry  of  Fish-
eries). 

Federal  Regulations—In  September  of  2004,  the  United  States  Coast  Guard 
adopted mandatory ballast water management regulations for vessels entering from 
outside the EEZ. Exchange is required to be conducted more than 200 nm offshore, 
however,  vessels  that  experience  undue  delay  are  exempted.  There  is  no  manage-
ment  requirement  for  vessels  traveling  ‘‘coastally,’’  or  wholly  within  the  200  nm 
EEZ. 

Several pieces of Federal legislation that address NIS introductions are currently 
moving  through  Congress.  One,  S.  363,  the  ‘‘Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of 
2005,’’ addresses the National Invasive Species Act’s ballast water management pro-
gram  (16  U.S.C.  Section  4711),  and  would  provide  a  national  system  for  imple-
menting ballast treatment control technologies over time. 

Mainland U.S. Pacific Coast—With the exception of Alaska, all U.S. mainland Pa-
cific states have adopted ballast water management regulations that are more com-
prehensive  than  the  Federal  requirements.  Oregon  began  requiring  ballast  water 
management  in  2002.  Vessels  of  foreign  origination  are  required  to  conduct  ex-
change at least 200 nm offshore. However, for vessels traveling within 200 nm and 
entering  Oregon  from  areas  north  of  50°  N,  or  south  of  40°  S,  a  ‘‘coastal’’  exchange 
of unspecified distance offshore is required (Flynn and Sytsma 2004). Legislation re-
quiring  coastal  exchange  at  50  nm  offshore  was  passed  in  the  Oregon  Legislature 
and  goes  into  effect  at  the  end  of  2005.  Washington’s  year  2000-exchange  require-
ment  for  foreign  vessels  is  identical  to  Oregon’s.  Coastally  transiting  vessels  are 
generally  required  to  conduct  exchange  at  least  50  nm  offshore,  with  the  exception 
that exchange is not required if the water is common to the state, and has not been 
mixed  with  waters  outside  of  the  Columbia  River  system  (Washington  Department 
of Fish and Wildlife 2003). 

California—California’s  initial  legislation,  Assembly  Bill  703  (AB  703),  addressed 
the ballast water invasion threat at a time when national regulations were not man-
datory.  The  Ballast  Water  Management  for  Control  of  Nonindigenous  Species  Act, 
passed  in  1999,  established  a  statewide  multi-agency  program  to  prevent  and  con-
trol NIS in state waters. In addition to the CSLC, the California Department of Fish 
and  Game  (CDFG),  the  State  Water  Resources  Control  Board  (SWRCB)  and  the 
Board of Equalization (BOE) were charged to direct research, monitoring, policy de-
velopment, and regulation, and to cooperatively consult with one another to address 
the  problem  (Falkner  2003).  AB  703  required  that  vessels  entering  California  from 
outside  the  EEZ  manage  ballast  before  discharging  into  state  waters.  Vessels  were 
required  to  exchange  ballast  water  200  nm  offshore  or  treat  ballast  water  with  an 
approved shipboard or shore-based treatment system. There was, however, no man-
agement  requirement  for  vessels  transiting  between  ports  wholly  within  the  EEZ, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

despite  evidence  that  ‘‘intra-coastal’’  transfer  may  facilitate  the  spread  of  NIS  from 
a location where it is firmly established, San Francisco Bay for example, to an adja-
cent port where it is not (Lavoie et al. 1999, Cohen and Carlton 1995). The Legisla-
ture, sensitive to the uncertainties surrounding the development of an effective bal-
last  water  management  program  for  the  State,  included  a  sunset  date  of  January 
1,  2004,  in  AB  703.  In  2003,  Assembly  Bill  433  was  passed,  reauthorizing  and  en-
hancing  the  1999  legislation  to  include  many  of  the  recommendations  of  the  pro-
gram’s first biennial report (Falkner 2003). 
California’s Marine Invasive Species Program 

The California Legislature passed Assembly Bill 433 during the 2003 regular ses-
sion,  and  was  signed  by  the  Governor  in  October  2003.  The  bill  reauthorized,  en-
hanced,  and  renamed  the  State’s  ballast  water  management  program,  creating  the 
Marine  Invasive  Species  Act  (Act).  The  Act  applies  to  all  U.S.  and  foreign  vessels, 
over  300  gross  registered  tons  that  arrive  at  a  California  port,  or  place,  after  oper-
ating outside of California waters. All vessels arriving at a California port, or place, 
must  have  a  ballast  water  management  plan  and  ballast  tank  logbook  specific  to 
the vessel. Each vessel is required to pay a fee of $500 at its first port call in Cali-
fornia. Additionally, each vessel is required to submit a ballast water reporting form 
upon departure from each port call in California waters detailing their ballast water 
management practices. However, only vessels arriving from outside the EEZ are re-
quired  to  manage  their  ballast  water  as  prescribed  in  the  Act.  The  Act  does  direct 
the CSLC to adopt regulations for vessels transiting within the Pacific Coast Region 
and the rulemaking process currently underway will require coastal exchange at 50 
nm  offshore  for  such  voyages.  The  effective  date  of  the  regulation  is  anticipated  in 
late 2005. 

In  addition  to  regulatory  directives,  the  Act  included  mandates  to  address  gaps 
identified during the beginning years of the program that would improve the ability 
of  the  program  to  prevent  NIS  introductions.  The  Commission’s  Marine  Invasive 
Species  Program  (MISP)  has  formed  several  Technical  Advisory  Groups  (TAG)  that 
discuss  policy  and  regulatory  matters  related  to  general  NIS  management  and  the 
implementation  of  legislative  mandates.  In  January  2000,  a  general  TAG  was  con-
vened to discuss regulatory matters and continues to meet periodically. In 2005, two 
specialized advisory group were assembled to formulate recommendations for ballast 
treatment performance standards and vessel hull fouling. TAGs include representa-
tives  from  the  maritime  industry,  ports,  state  agencies,  environmental  organiza-
tions,  and  research  institutions,  and  serve  several  critical  outreach  functions.  They 
serve  as  a  forum  through  which  information  and  ideas  can  be  exchanged,  and  en-
sure  that  rulemaking  decisions  consider  the  best  available  science  as  well  as  the 
concerns  of  affected  stakeholders.  TAG  members  also  relay  information  to  their  re-
spective constituencies, keeping them abreast of CSLC actions and activities. 

The  Marine  Facilities  Division  of  the  CSLC  administers  the  State’s  Marine 
Invasive  Species  Program  (MISP).  The  MISP  staff  are  active  members  in  several 
ballast  water  related  groups  including:  the  Ballast  Outreach  Advisory  Team,  Sea 
Grant  Extension;  Oregon’s  Ballast  Water  Management  Task  Force;  Aquatic  Nui-
sance  Species  Task  Force;  and  the  Pacific  Ballast  Water  Working  Group.  Wherever 
possible,  staff  works  with  the  scientific  community,  other  West  Coast  state  rep-
resentatives, Federal agencies, and the international maritime community to stand-
ardize ballast water management programs. This coordination has improved support 
and compliance by the maritime industry, and has enhanced understanding and the 
development of solutions to NIS introductions. 

The CSLC MISP Inspection Program consists of an extensive monitoring program 
to  ensure  compliance  and  facilitate  communication,  and  is  implemented  by  field  of-
fices located in Northern and Southern California. All vessels are required to submit 
to compliance inspections, which include sample collection of ballast water and sedi-
ments, examination of documents, and any additional appropriate inquiries. The Act 
specifies that inspections be conducted on at least 25 percent of the arriving vessels, 
with  enforcement  administered  through  the  imposition  of  administrative  civil  and 
criminal  penalties.  In  addition  to  verifying  compliance  with  the  management  re-
quirements of the Act, the Inspection Program plays a key role in outreach and edu-
cation for the maritime industry. 

Assembly Bill 703 created the Exotic Species Control Fund (the Fund) to support 
each  agency’s  program  (Section  71215).  All  vessels  subject  to  the  law  are  required 
to submit a fee at its first port call in California. The State’s fee-based program has 
been  cited  as  an  important  reason  for  the  program’s  success  (Vinograd  &  Sytsma 
2002). Reauthorization of the State’s Program under AB 433 included the reauthor-
ization and renaming of the Fund to the Marine Invasive Species Control Fund. The 
amount  of  the  fee  is  based  on  agency  budgets  approved  by  the  State’s  Legislature 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

and  totals  $16.1  million  over  6  years.  Budgets  cover  the  CSLC’s  ballast  water  in-
spection  and  monitoring  program,  the  development  and  implementation  of  regu-
latory packages, research on alternative treatment technologies, hull fouling vectors, 
and performance standards. The budget also covers the biological surveys conducted 
by the CDFG to track the extent of NIS introductions in State waters, costs for fee 
assessment by the BOE, and consultation by SWRCB. CSLC was given the author-
ity to establish the fee amount, up to the maximum of $1,000 per voyage. In Janu-
ary  2000,  a  TAG  was  formed,  made  up  of  members  of  the  maritime  industry  and 
state  agencies.  The  TAG  has  proved  beneficial  for  determining  the  appropriate  fee 
amount  and  for  addressing  issues  related  specifically  to  the  implementation  of  the 
California Act. The TAG meets regularly to assess the effectiveness of the Program 
and the status of the Fund. Currently the Fee is $500/voyage, but will be decreased 
to $400/voyage in mid-2005. 
Outreach and Education 

Coastal Exchange Stakeholder Workshops—Two stakeholder workshops were held 
in  2002  and  2003,  to  address  and  inform  coastal  ballast  water  management  in  the 
Western Pacific Coast Region. As a result of these meetings and a subsequent stake-
holder meeting in July 2004, CSLC submitted a rulemaking package in April 2005, 
to  the  State’s  Office  of  Administrative  Law,  proposing  to  govern  the  ballast  water 
management of vessels operating within the Pacific Coast Region. 

Outreach to Maritime Industry—One of the key components for the success of the 
program  continues  to  be  the  close  communication,  coordination,  and  outreach  that 
occurs  between  the  CSLC,  the  maritime  industry,  and  other  state  agencies.  The 
CSLC  facilitates  this  communication  through  several  specific  avenues  including 
monthly  late  form  notifications,  vessel  inspections,  advisory  groups,  a  website,  and 
through  participation  in  pubic  and  scientific  workshops,  and  public  speaking  en-
gagements. 

During the first year of the program, a dramatic increase in reporting compliance 
(submission  of  ballast  water  reporting  forms)  was  observed  following  the  initiation 
of  a  monthly  notification  system  and  issuance  of  warning  letters  (Falkner  2003). 
These  activities  have  subsequently  become  an  integral  part  of  the  program.  Each 
month  a  list  of  ballast  water  reporting  forms  received  by  the  CSLC  is  reconciled 
with  a  list  of  vessel  arrivals  reported  by  the  Maritime  Exchanges.  Qualifying  voy-
ages that appear on the Marine Exchanges report, but have not submitted reporting 
forms  to  the  CSLC  are  flagged.  On  or  about  the  fifth  of  every  month,  individual 
agents  are  then  sent  a  master  list  of  vessels  under  their  purview,  indicating  which 
have punctually sent forms and which have not. If a delinquent form is not received 
within 60 days, a warning letter is sent to the agent. Subsequent enforcement action 
is taken as necessary. 

Though  this  notification  process  is  time  intensive,  it  assures  direct,  periodic  com-
munication  with  more  than  60  shipping  agents  and  has  been  well  received  by  the 
maritime  industry.  Ship  owners  and  agents  also  contact  CSLC  personnel  directly 
with questions or concerns. Monthlies and warning notifications have resulted in re-
porting  compliance  rates  that  have  increased  from ∼60  percent  in  early  2000,  to  93 
percent by June 2002, to over 98 percent in 2004. 

CSLC  inspectors  serve  as  an  important  direct  conduit  of  information  to  vessel 
crews, particularly in an industry where vessels often change ownership, routes, and 
crew  composition.  During  vessel  visits,  inspectors  verbally  explain  paperwork,  re-
porting,  ballast  management  obligations,  and  point  out  where  a  vessel  may  be  fall-
ing  short  of  compliance.  For  vessels  that  call  at  a  California  port  for  the  first  time, 
inspectors distribute informational packets that include a summary of the California 
law, instructions on completing the ballast water form, and contacts for more infor-
mation on West Coast ballast regulations. 

CSLC  staff  actively  continues  to  facilitate  communication  among  stakeholder 
groups  through  several  additional  vehicles.  A  website  contains  programmatic  back-
ground  information,  downloadable  forms  and  reports,  and  rulemaking  and  public 
hearing  announcements.  Attended  events  have  ranged  from  those  sponsored  by  in-
dustry,  and  by  Federal  and  state  organizations.  CSLC  has  also  initiated  or  collabo-
rated  on  numerous  workshops,  conferences,  and  speaking  engagements  to  further 
enhance outreach efforts. 

Compliance—Vessel  compliance  with  the  requirement  to  report  ballast  manage-
ment  and  discharge  practices  is  very  high,  and  has  risen  dramatically  since  the  in-
ception  of  the  program.  In  2003,  97  percent  of  vessels  submitted  reports,  up  from 
approximately  60  percent  observed  during  the  first  6  months  of  the  program  in 
2000.  In  2004,  even  with  the  new  requirement  that  voyages  between  Pacific  Coast 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ports,  or  places,  were  required  to  submit  reports,  compliance  exceeded  98  percent, 
with 82 percent submitting reporting forms on time (Figure 1). 

40 

During  2004,  all  vessels  were  required  to  submit  a  reporting  form  for  each  port 
call in California. The change in QV to include domestic voyages is readily observed 
in  the  data.  The  percentage  of  arrivals  originating  from  Asian  ports  dropped  from 
over 50 percent in 2003, to less than 30 percent in 2004 (Figure 2). It also becomes 
apparent  that  a  large  proportion  of  vessels  arrive  to  California  ports  from  other 
California ports. 

Of the 10,074 reporting forms received for Year 2004, 83 percent retained all bal-
last  water  onboard,  while  17  percent  reported  discharges  in  State  waters.  Over  95 
percent  of  all  ballast  water  discharged  in  State  waters  complied  with  the  law.  Of 
the unexchanged ballast water that was discharged during 2004, the majority origi-
nated  from  coastal  Mexican  waters  (Figure  3).  This  pattern  highlights  the  need  for 
intense  targeted  compliance  monitoring  and  enforcement  action  as  necessary  by 
CSLC.  Additionally,  it  reinforces  the  need  for  the  development  of  environmentally 
safe  shipboard  treatment  systems,  as  well  as  the  identification  of  alternative  ex-
change zones within coastal waters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
k
a

l

f

s
p
e
.
1
k
a
f

l

41 

Likewise, vessel-reported compliance with the requirement to manage ballast orig-
inating  from  waters  outside  the  U.S.  EEZ  continues  to  exceed  90  percent.  In  2004, 
7.8  million  metric  tons  of  ballast  water  was  reported  to  have  been  discharged  in 
state  waters,  only  4  percent  did  not  comply  with  the  mid-ocean  exchange  require-
ments (Table1). 

Table 1.—Year 2004 Volume (MT) of Ballast Water Discharged by Port 

Port 

Compliant 

(MT) 

Not 

Compliant 

(MT) 

Total 

Discharged 

Compliance 

(percent) 

Non- 

Compliance 

(percent) 

Avalon 
Carquinez 
El Segundo 
Hueneme 
Humboldt 
LA-LB 
Monterey 
Oakland 
Redwood 
Richmond 
Sacramento 
San Diego 
San Francisco 
Santa Barbara 
Stockton 

24,123 
469,037 
66,212 
7,045 
48,699 
3,643,580 
6 
424,965 
59,998 
1,129,114 
1,028,443 
38,982 
317,584 
23,219 
149,398 

0 
20,893 
0 
2,587 
1,484 
215,129 
0 
3518 
20,702 
12,222 
15,804 
3,015 
30,489 
0 
23,763 

24,123 
489,930 
66,212 
9,632 
50,183 
3,858,709 
6 
428,483 
80,700 
1,141,336 
1,044,247 
41,997 
348,073 
23,219 
173,161 

Statewide Totals 

7,430,405 

349,606 

7,780,011 

100 
96 
100 
73 
97 
94 
100 
99 
74 
99 
98 
93 
91 
100 
86 

96 

0 
4 
0 
27 
3 
6 
0 
1 
26 
1 
2 
7 
9 
0 
14 

4 

Vessel  inspections  conducted  by  CSLC  staff  revealed  similarly  high  compliance 
rates.  During  the  2003–2004  period,  2,318  inspections  were  completed.  Less  than  5 
percent  of  the  noted  violations  were  associated  with  operational  aspects  of  the  law, 
which  includes  improper  ballast  water  management  (Table  2).  In  late  2003,  CSLC 
initiated  a  procedure  to  ensure  that  any  violations  identified  during  inspections 
were corrected in advance of the vessel’s next visit to California waters. A letter de-
tailing  any  violations  noted  during  inspections  and  appropriate  corrective  action  is 
sent  to  the  registered  ship  owner.  The  response  from  vessel  owners  has  been  over-
whelmingly positive. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
k
a
f

l

42 

The high compliance rates observed in the California Program are attributable to 
the multi-pronged outreach and communication activities undertaken by the CSLC. 
Inspectors  distribute  information  verbally  and  in  print  to  crews  on  regulations. 
Agents  are  notified  monthly  of  their  vessels’  reporting  compliance  or  non-compli-
ance.  Multi-agency,  multi-interest  advisory  groups  are  continually  convened  and 
consulted  regarding  evolving  policy  considerations.  These  efforts  serve  to  maintain 
well-informed  stakeholders,  build  working  relationships  with  affected  parties,  and 
ensure that regulations are wisely developed. 

Fee  Submission—While  the  CSLC  has  authority  to  establish  the  fee  amount;  as-
sessment  of  the  fee  is  the  responsibility  of  BOE.  The  BOE  receives  daily  reports 
from the Los Angeles/Long Beach Marine Exchange listing actual arrivals from the 
following  ports:  Los  Angeles/Long  Beach,  Port  Hueneme,  San  Diego,  and  El 
Segundo.  In  addition,  the  Board  receives  two  daily  reports  from  the  San  Francisco 
Marine Exchange. An electronic and paper record of this information is maintained 
for reference and use by the BOE staff. The reports are reviewed to determine which 
arrivals  are  qualifying  voyages  and  thus  subject  to  the  fee.  In  2001,  a  return  (self- 
reporting)  process  was  initiated  by  BOE  to  reduce  the  overall  number  of  billings, 
though  not  the  amount  of  revenue  collected.  With  the  assistance  of  industry  rep-
resentatives, a return form was developed allowing the larger owner/operator/agents 
to self-report their vessel voyages. 

There  are  currently  2,508  ballast  accounts  representing  6,449  vessels  registered 
with  the  BOE.  On  average,  120  new  Ballast  Registrations  are  added  per  month.  In 
addition,  an  average  of  115  account  maintenance  items  (address  changes,  adding 
vessels to existing accounts, etc.) are processed per month. An average of 25 ballast 
accounts  are  closed  out  each  month,  and  an  average  of  470  ballast  water  billings 
are mailed per month. Compliance rate for fee submission exceeds 98 percent. 
Collaborative Projects/Research/Technology Development 

Treatment Technologies—Though ballast water exchange is by far the most widely 
used  ballast  water  management  tool,  the  eventual  goal  is  to  manage  ballast  water 
through  ship-based  or  shore-based  treatment  systems.  Ballast  exchange  can  expose 
vessels  to  some  risk  and  may  delay  voyages.  As  described  above,  exchange  can  ex-
pose vessels to some risk and may delay voyages. The efficiency of exchange is also 
quite  variable,  and  can  depend  on  a  vessel’s  configuration  or  age.  Though  no  alter-
native  treatment  technologies  are  available  for  widespread  installation,  several 
promising enterprises are under development. 

The  Ballast  Water  Management  Act  of  1999,  directed  CSLC  to  evaluate  and  ap-
prove alternative treatment technologies designed to remove and/or inactivate orga-
nisms  in  ballast  water.  The  Marine  Invasive  Species  Act  of  2003,  authorized  the 
CSLC to sponsor a pilot program for the purpose of evaluating alternatives for treat-
ing and otherwise managing ballast water, and also authorizes the CSLC to sponsor 
other  research  related  to  the  transport  and  release  of  non-indigenous  species  into 
California waters. 

CSLC  staff  collaborates  with  other  agencies  and  organizations  to  identify  alter-
native  methods  for  ballast  water  management.  In  the  past  18  months,  the  CSLC 
has  reviewed  and  considered  for  funding  two  alternative  treatment  technologies. 
The  Venturi  Oxygen  Stripping  System  and  the  Ecochlor  Ballast  Water  Treatment 
System  have  each  shown,  through  initial  studies  that  shipboard  applications  may 
be effective. Further research is needed, and CSLC will be funding at least one, pos-
sibly both of these proposed projects. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
k
a
f

l

43 

West  Coast  Ballast  Water  Demonstration  Project—In  August  2000,  the  California 
State  Lands  Commission  was  awarded  a  $150,000  grant  from  the  U.S.  Fish  and 
Wildlife  Service  (USFWS)  to  implement  the  West  Coast  Regional  Applied  Ballast 
Management  Research  and  Demonstration  Project  (West  Coast  Demonstration 
Project). The West Coast Demonstration Project was an inter-agency pilot project to 
acquire  and  distribute  information  regarding  applied  alternatives  for  ballast  water 
management.  In  December  2000,  the  Port  of  Oakland  agreed  to  match  the  USFWS 
funds,  doubling  the  funds  available  for  this  project,  making  it  possible  to  evaluate 
the efficacy of treatment systems onboard at least two vessels. The SWRCB received 
$150,000 from the Exotic Species Control Fund to evaluate alternatives for treating 
and  managing  ballast  water.  Total  funding  provided  by  the  USFWS,  SWRCB  and 
the  Port  of  Oakland  for  the  West  Coast  Demonstration  Project  combined  to  a  total 
of $450,000. 

Ballast Water Exchange Verification—In October 2003, the Commission, acting as 
Trustee for the Kapiloff Land Bank Fund (the Fund), accepted funds in the amount 
of $200,000 from Carnival Cruise Lines, a division of Carnival Corporation, and de-
posited  in  the  Fund  as  settlement  for  certain  questions  regarding  compliance  with 
ballast  water  management  requirements  under  Public  Resources  Code  Sections 
71200  et  seq.  These  funds  were  designated  for  projects  relating  to  ballast  water 
management  under  Public  Resources  Code  Section  71200  through  71271  and  suc-
cessor statutes. 

Utilizing  the  aforementioned  Kapiloff  Land  Bank  Funds,  CSLC  has  entered  into 
an agreement with the Smithsonian Environmental Research Center (SERC) to test 
explicitly  the  application  of  Ballast  Water  Exchange  verification  (BWEv)  method-
ology  on  vessel  traffic  arriving  to  ports  along  western  North  America.  In  previous 
experiments, the BWEv methodology showed strong potential for discriminating be-
tween  near  coastal  or  port  water.  A  refined  methodology  could  therefore  be  used  to 
develop  a  rigorous  test  for  discerning  exchanged  ballast  water  from  unexchanged 
ballast  water  on  a  vessel.  The  proposed  research  is  intended  to  ‘‘demonstrate’’  the 
application  of  the  BWEv  methodology  to  a  specific  region,  as  well  as  expand  the 
overall scope of our ongoing analyses and possible application on a global basis. This 
work  builds  upon  significant  national  and  international  efforts  to  implement  a  reli-
able,  affordable,  and  easy-to-use  method  for  BWEv.  The  CSLC–SERC  project  will 
begin  June  2005  and  June  2007.  Sampling  events  will  be  scheduled  to  occur  on  a 
quarterly basis, beginning in June 2005. 

Hull  Fouling—With  funding  from  the  MISP,  the  Aquatic  Bioinvasion  Research 
and Policy Institute (ABRPI), which combine the SERC’s marine expertise and Port-
land  State  University’s  freshwater  expertise,  will  conduct  a  study  to  examine  the 
potential for invasions to California through the fouling vector. Using data on vessel 
dimensions and arrivals, SERC will estimate the total vessel surface area on a vari-
ety of vessel types that: (1) Arrive to port systems in California, Oregon, and Wash-
ington,  and  (2)  Have  the  potential  to  be  colonized  by  fouling  organisms.  The  study 
will  also  include  a  pilot  project  that  will  utilize  Remotely  Operated  Vehicle  (ROV) 
collected  videos,  still  images,  and  diver  collected  samples  to  estimate  the  amount 
and types of organisms attached to exposed surfaces. These complimentary analyses 
will  move  toward  creating  a  broad  understanding  of  the  overall  risk  fouling  poses 
for  NIS  introductions  to  California.  The  CSLC–ABRPI  project  will  begin  June  2005 
and conclude July 2007. 
Summary of Other Research 

In addition to research fully or partially funded by CSLC, two studies highly rel-
evant  to  the  prevention  and  management  of  NIS  in  California  have  been  funded  or 
directed by CSLC collaborators. Both were extensive, multi-agency, multi-institution 
enterprises, for which the MISP provided some assistance with logistics or document 
review.  The  first  was  a  three  part  study  on  local  container  vessels,  funded  by  the 
Port  of  Oakland,  evaluating  the  effectiveness  of  ballast  exchange  for  removing 
planktonic  organisms,  and  examining  the  biota  that  arrive  to  the  port  in  ballast 
tanks  and  in  fouling  communities.  The  second,  directed  by  the  California  Depart-
ment  of  Fish  and  Game,  sought  to  characterize  the  distribution  of  estuarine  and 
coastal invasives in California. 

CDFG  Invasive  Species  Survey—Under  the  1999  legislation,  the  California  De-
partment  of  Fish  and  Game  (CDFG)  was  the  primary  agency  required  to  conduct 
a  study  to  determine  the  location  and  geographic  range  of  non-indigenous  species 
in  California  estuaries  and  coastal  areas.  The  study  focused  on  areas  where  intro-
duced species from ballast were most likely to occur. Biological sampling took place 
for  infaunal  and  epifaunal  areas,  as  well  as  for  fish  and  plankton.  Biological  data 
collected during this study will provide the basis for a more comprehensive analysis 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

of  impacts  from  non-indigenous  species  and  will  serve  as  a  baseline  to  determine 
effectiveness of future management efforts to control species introductions. 
Moving Forward 

Improving  Compliance—Although  California’s  Program  continues  to  be  very  suc-
cessful, resulting in high compliance with all requirements of the Act; data indicate 
a  persistent  yet  small  percent  of  vessels  violating  the  ballast  water  management 
mandates.  Specifically,  those  vessels  arriving  from  Mexican,  Central  and  South 
American  ports  account  for  85  percent  of  the  volume  of  ballast  water  discharged 
that does not comply with the law. Further analysis shows that many of these ves-
sels are conducting some form of an exchange, but not to the prescribed legal stand-
ards  set  in  the  Act  (i.e.,  exchange  at  >200  nm  from  land).  Because  of  this  analysis, 
CSLC  has  refocused  the  intensive  compliance  monitoring  of  reporting  forms,  the 
education and outreach to vessels owner/operators and as necessary pursue enforce-
ment  actions  on  offending  vessels.  Additionally,  CSLC  continues  to  aggressively  ex-
plore  and  support  research  addressing  shipboard  treatment  technologies  and  alter-
native exchange zones within coastal waters. 

Regulations Governing Coastal Voyages—Current California law requires that ves-
sels  originating  from  places  outside  of  the  EEZ  manage  ballast  water,  however, 
there  is  no  ballast  management  requirement  for  vessels  that  arrive  to  California 
ports  from  places  within  the  EEZ.  The  transfer  of  NIS  from  an  invaded  port  to  an 
adjacent port poses a significant risk for introducing and spreading species through-
out  a  region  (Lavoie  et  al.  1999,  Cohen  and  Carlton  1995).  On  the  West  Coast  in 
particular,  a  highly  invaded  area,  such  as  the  San  Francisco  Bay,  can  serve  as  a 
hub  for  NIS  to  spread  to  other  Pacific  Coast  Region  ports,  such  as  Los  Angeles  or 
Portland.  In  recognition  of  this  vulnerability,  the  Marine  Invasive  Species  Act  of 
2004,  directs  the  CSLC  to  adopt  ballast  management  regulations  for  transits  be-
tween ports within the Pacific Coast Region, defined as the region 200 nm offshore, 
from  154  degrees  W  longitude  and  north  of  25  degrees  N  latitude,  exclusive  of  the 
Gulf of California. 

Based on recommendations from the two Coastal Exchange workshops, the CSLC 
Technical Advisory Group came to the consensus for ballast water exchange at least 
50  nm  offshore  for  voyages  within  the  Pacific  Coast  Region.  The  50  nm  limit  incor-
porated several key issues of concern. Although ballast water exchange at distances 
more than 200 nm offshore is considered the most biologically prudent, vessels trav-
eling  within  the  Pacific  Coast  Region  could  be  diverted  more  than  100  nm  offshore 
from  their  normal  route.  For  most  voyages,  the  50  nm  distance  would  require  no 
course  deviation  for  some  vessels  and  a  minor  deviation  for  many.  Exchange  at  50 
nm avoids ballast discharge in coastal ‘‘retention zones’’ and at the mouths of estu-
aries,  where  currents  and  tides  can  carry  organisms  to  shore  or  sweep  them  into 
bays  and  estuaries.  The  limit  also  lies  beyond  the  boundaries  of  sensitive  protected 
areas,  such  as  National  Marine  Sanctuaries.  Further,  the  maritime  industry  re-
quested that California’s regulation be consistent with other U.S. state, Federal and 
international  regulations,  in  order  to  avoid  confusion  that  would  occur  should  ves-
sels  encounter  a  patchwork  of  varying  regulations  as  they  traveled  across  jurisdic-
tions.  The  50  nautical  mile  limit  addressed  this  request,  as  Washington  and  the 
International  Maritime  Organization  have  similar  requirements,  and  Oregon  has 
adopted legislation that mandates the same. 

An  exemption  was  included  for  voyages  between  ports  within  the  San  Francisco 
Bay/Delta  region,  and  for  voyages  within  the  Los  Angeles/Long  Beach/El  Segundo 
Port  Complex.  In  the  absence  of  such  a  designation,  the  50  nm  requirement  would 
pose  an  operational  and  economic  burden  for  vessels  transiting  between  ports  con-
tained  within  a  single  port  region.  Scientific  experts  consulted  agreed  that,  bio-
logically,  the  designation  was  reasonable  given  the  current  knowledge  of  NIS  dis-
persal within an estuary, and given the logistical realities of vessel voyage patterns 
(Cohen pers com., Crooks pers com., Kimmerer pers com., Weisberg pers com.) 

Rulemaking documents for the regulation were submitted to the Office of Admin-
istrative  Law  in  April  2005,  and  the  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  was  published 
April 15, 2005. Following public hearings and consideration of public comments, the 
final regulation is anticipated to be approved in June 2005, with an implementation 
date in late 2005. 

The  Commission  staff  held  two  public  hearings.  The  first  on  June  2,  2005,  in 
southern  California,  and  the  second  on  June  8,  2005,  in  Northern  California.  For 
the vast majority of commercial vessels that fall under this regulation, near-coastal 
ballast  exchange  will  be  the  primary  method  of  ballast  water  management.  Cur-
rently, it is the best compromise of efficacy, environmental safety, and economically 
practicality.  According  to  industry  representatives,  the  vast  majority  of  vessels  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

capable of conducting exchange, and the management practice does not require any 
special structural modification to most of the vessels in operation. 

The shipping industry has expressed concern that a small minority of vessels and/ 
or  commercial  shipping  routes  may  be  significantly  impacted  by  the  proposed  regu-
lations.  Commission  staff  recognizes  this  possibility.  These  vessels  and/or  commer-
cial  shipping  routes  can  be  categorized  in  two  ways.  The  first  are  vessels  that,  due 
to special safety circumstances, are unable to perform ballast water management as 
described  in  the  proposed  regulation.  For  example,  ballast  water  exchange  as  out-
lined  in  the  regulations  may  pose  a  serious  personnel  safety  concern  for  tugs  and 
barges. Safely moving a crew from a small boat to a barge could pose a serious safe-
ty  risk.  To  address  this  issue,  a  provision  is  included  in  the  regulation,  ensuring 
that  the  safety  of  the  vessel,  its  crew,  or  its  passengers  is  not  compromised  by  the 
management requirements specified in the regulation. 

The second general concern relates to a minority of vessels, for which compliance 
with the proposed ballast water management requirements may present some hard-
ship not related to safety. To address this issue, a petition process has been included 
in the rulemaking package that would allow impacted entities to present individual 
hardship  cases  and  associated  alternative  ballast  management  proposals  to  the 
Commission.  This  section  is  necessary  to  provide  flexibility  for  the  Commission  to 
consider  special  hardship  cases  from  the  maritime  industry,  and  associated  alter-
native  management  proposals,  on  a  case-by-case  basis,  while  providing  a  formal 
public notification and/or review process. 

A  broader  concern,  related  to  the  ‘‘shared  water’’  designation,  was  expressed  by 
the  industry.  It  has  been  suggested  that  the  proposed  regulations  should  include 
geographically-extensive, shared-water designations similar to those used in Oregon 
and Washington. For example, for transits between Los Angeles and San Diego, and 
for  voyages  between  the  San  Francisco  Bay-Delta  to  Eureka,  the  industry  has  re-
quested  various  relaxations  to  the  requirement  for  exchanging  ballast  at  locations 
50 nm offshore and 200 m depth. 

In  consideration  of  these  concerns,  staff  subsequently  contacted  several  scientific 
experts,  reviewed  relevant  scientific  literature,  and  completed  preliminary  analyses 
to  address  the  issue.  In  summary,  the  best  available  information  strongly  indicates 
that estuarine (bay/port) ballast water should not be transported between California 
ports,  and  this  includes  voyages  between  the  specifically  mentioned  short-haul  voy-
ages. 

absence of human activity. 

condition, maximizing chance for establishment in a new area. 

• Natural transport of organisms between estuaries appears to be very low, in the 
• Short  coastal  voyages  are  more  likely  to  transport  organisms  in  good  physical 
• The  San  Francisco  Bay  estuary  is  one  of  the  most  highly  invaded  areas  of  the 
world,  and  is  likely  to  act  as  a  ‘‘hub’’  from  which  non-indigenous  species  can 
spread to other areas of California. 
• Many  non-indigenous  organisms  found  in  one  of  the  aforementioned  ports  are 
not  yet  found  in  the  other.  The  potential  for  their  continued  spread  should  be 
minimized. 
• Some  non-indigenous  species  in  San  Francisco  Bay  are  clearly  problematic  or 
are found in very high numbers, and have not yet been found in Humboldt Bay 
(Table 3). Examples include the Chinese mitten crab and the Asian clam. 
• The region between San Diego and Point Conception is an oceanographic ‘‘reten-
tion zone’’ where water re-circulates for extended periods. These zones have the 
capacity to retain organisms released in them, and oceanographers have explic-
itly recommended avoiding ballast exchange in them. 

Finally,  several  commenters  suggested  the  inclusion  of  language  stating  that  a 
vessel  should  not  be  required  to  deviate  from  its  intended  voyage  or  unduly  delay 
its voyage to comply with ballast water management requirements. Without further 
contingencies and definition, a small deviation or minor delay in an intended voyage 
could  easily  be  claimed,  exempting  those  voyages  and  significantly  weakening  the 
ability  of  this  regulation  to  effectively  prevent  or  minimize  the  introduction  and 
spread of NIS. Furthermore, the inclusion of this language puts the decision to com-
ply  in  the  hands  of  the  regulated  community,  not  the  regulatory  agency.  Addition-
ally,  it  is  believed  that  without  sufficient  definition,  this  language  would  not  meet 
the ‘‘Clarity Standard’’ required in the California Administrative Procedures Act. As 
an alternative, staff has included a petition process that would allow impacted enti-
ties to present individual hardship cases and associated alternative ballast manage-
ment proposals to the Commission. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

Performance  Standards  Advisory  Panel  Description—The  CSLC  is  required,  in 
consultation  with  SWRCB,  and  in  consideration  of  the  advisory  panel  (Panel),  to 
submit  to  the  legislature  a  report  that  recommends  specific  performance  standards 
for  the  discharge  of  ballast  water  into  the  waters  of  the  state.  The  performance 
standards  will  be  based  on  best  available  technology  economically  achievable,  and 
be designed to protect the beneficial uses of state waters. 

In  late  2004,  the  CSLC  invited  participation  from  the  stakeholder  community  to 
develop  recommendations  for  performance  standards.  The  Panel  was  first  convened 
early in 2005, with meeting dates scheduled through June 2005. The Panel includes 
participants  from  the  SWRCB,  the  Regional  Water  Quality  Control  Board,  the 
CDFG,  and  the  U.S.  Fish  and  Wildlife  Service,  as  well  as  representation  from  Uni-
versity  experts,  research  groups,  shipping  agencies,  ports,  and  environmental  orga-
nizations. 

Issues  identified  thus  far  include  appropriate  regulatory  monitoring  methods  and 
impacts  to  coastal  voyages  versus  oceanic  voyages.  Documents  for  review  include, 
but  are  not  limited  to,  publications  on  biological  criteria,  engineering  feasibility, 
physical/biological/chemical  characteristics  of  fresh  and  saline  water,  efficacy  of  re-
ducing viable organisms under vessel operating conditions, economic costs of instal-
lation and operation of equipment, appropriate parameters for measuring treatment 
efficacy, and/or appropriate experimental designs for efficacy tests. 

The  Panel  has  spent  significant  time  evaluating  the  discharge  standards  adopted 
by the IMO Convention to assess it potential effectiveness at preventing or reducing 
NIS introductions from ships’ ballast water and the discharge standard proposed in 
U.S. legislation (e.g., S. 363—The Ballast Water Management Act of 2005). 

The  IMO  Convention  calls  for  ships  to  meet  a  ballast  water  discharge  standard 
according  to  a  schedule  of  fixed  dates.  While  the  IMO  Convention  is  an  important 
step  forward  in  the  effort  to  combat  NIS  introduced  by  ships’  ballast  water,  the 
standard  adopted  represented  only  a  slight  decrease  in  the  concentration  of 
zooplankton and no reduction of phytoplankton from the observed median value for 
unmanaged  ballast  water,  allowing  1,000  organisms  of  the  same  size  in  100  cubic 
meters.  An  analysis  by  the  International  Council  for  Exploration  of  the  Seas  of 
known concentrations of organisms in ballast tanks observed the median concentra-
tion  for  zooplankton  was  400/m 3 and  the  observed  mean  concentration  for 
phytoplankton  was  13.3/ml.  This  same  group  recommended  a  three  orders  of  mag-
nitude  reduction  below  the  observed  median  concentration  for  zooplankton,  and  an 
equivalent  or  higher  level  of  reduction  for  phytoplankton.  The  IMO  Convention 
standard  represents  only  a  1-order  magnitude  reduction  in  concentration  of 
zooplankton from the median observed values for unmanaged ballast and no reduc-
tion  of  phytoplankton  from  the  observed  median  value  for  unmanaged  ballast.  For-
tunately, the IMO Convention explicitly recognizes the right of a party to take more 
stringent  measures  to  prevent  NIS  introductions.  The  Ballast  Water  Management 
Act  of  2005  (S.  363),  contains  many  of  the  provisions  of  the  IMO  Convention,  how-
ever  the  concentration-based  standard  is  100  times  more  stringent  than  that  found 
in the IMO Convention. 

Panel recommendations will be provided to CSLC staff on or before July 1, 2005. 
CSLC is required to submit to the legislature, a final report including recommenda-
tions for performance standards by January 31, 2006. 

Non-Ballast,  Ship-Mediated  Invasion  Vectors—The  Act  directs  the  CSLC,  in  con-
sultation  with  a  technical  advisory  group,  to  analyze  the  risk  of  invasion  though 
fouling  on  commercial  vessels,  and  present  management  recommendations  to  pre-
vent  such  introductions.  The  legislation  further  specifies  that  the  advisory  group 
will  include  (but  may  not  be  limited  to)  representatives  from  the  shipping  and  port 
communities, the USCG, state resource agencies, Federal resource agencies, and the 
scientific research community. 

A  jointly  administered  workshop  with  California  Sea  Grant  Extension  on  vessel 
hull  fouling  was  held  in  May  2005.  The  workshop  examined  management  perspec-
tives  and  experiences  from  other  states  and  countries  (Hawaii,  New  Zealand),  the 
risks  and  impacts  from  hull-born  invasives  to  the  West  Coast,  and  options  for  pre-
vention  and  management.  Attendees  represented  the  commercial  shipping  and  rec-
reational  boating  communities,  ports,  vessel  cleaning  technology  groups,  state  and 
Federal  resource  agencies,  environmental  organizations,  and  scientific  experts. 
CSLC staff is currently summarizing the results from that workshop. 

The  CSLC  will  hold  two  additional  advisory  meetings  with  a  subset  of  the  work-
shop attendees. These meetings are planned for September and December 2005, and 
will  serve  to  solidify  findings  and  recommendations  with  regard  to  commercial  ves-
sels. The final report will be completed for the state legislature and public by March 
1, 2006. As mentioned previously, CSLC will be funding the Aquatic Bioinvasion Re-
search  and  Policy  Institute  (ABRPI)  to  conduct  a  study  examining  the  potential  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

invasions  to  California  through  the  fouling  vector.  The  CSLC–ABRPI  project  will 
begin June 15, 2005 and concludes July 31, 2007. 
Needed Research 

Ballast  Water  Treatment  Technology  Development—Efforts  to  identify  effective 
treatment  technologies  continue  to  progress  slowly.  The  effort  to  develop  effective 
technologies  should  be  one  of  integrated  phases,  including  R&D  on  basic  and  inno-
vative technologies, prototype development, shipboard applications, and certification 
and implementation. CSLC continues its relationship with the USCG, National Oce-
anic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  and  SERC  to  ensure  continuity  at 
the state, national, and international level. 

Standardized Analysis of Shipboard Treatment Technologies—Evaluating the per-
formance  of  ballast  water  treatment  technologies  onboard  ships,  under  realistic 
operational  conditions,  is  a  requirement  of  most  ballast  water  management  pro-
grams. The evaluation of treatment systems is difficult and costly. 

Various  approaches  have  been  proposed  making  comparisons  across  technologies 
and  even  within  the  same  technology  difficult.  The  lack  of  standardization  creates 
significant  confusion  about  the  criteria  needed  for  evaluation  and  approaches  to  be 
used  to  determine  compliance,  allowing  official  approval  for  particular  treatment 
systems. The USCG, Aquatic Bioinvasion Research and Policy Institute, and Pacific 
States  Marine  Fisheries  Commission,  and  CSLC  are  involved  in  the  formative 
stages  of  this  issue.  CSLC  continues  its  relationship  with  these  entities  to  ensure 
continuity at the state, national, and international level. 
Conclusions 

Due  to  continued  and  expanded  intensive  outreach  by  CSLC  staff,  the  utilization 
of technical advisory groups and a monthly electronic notification system, along with 
daily  interactions  with  maritime  industry,  and  the  potential  for  civil  and  criminal 
penalty  action,  compliance  with  the  California  Act  has  continued  to  improve  (>95 
percent). The Program’s success and the relatively weak Federal program, supports 
the continuation of the California Marine Invasive Species Program. 

CSLC  has  worked  to  coordinate  with  other  states  and  the  Federal  Government 
on ballast water and hull fouling management issues. Wherever possible, California 
works  with  the  scientific  community,  other  West  Coast  states,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment,  and  the  international  community  to  standardize  ballast  water  and  hull  foul-
ing management programs. This coordination has resulted in improved support and 
compliance  by  the  maritime  industry  and  has  enhanced  the  understanding  and  de-
velopment of solutions to NIS introductions. 

As  discussed  above,  there  is  a  significant  amount  of  momentum  in  the  Pacific 
Coast Region to prevent the introduction NIS. The existing framework in California 
has  taken  many  years  of  stakeholder  collaboration.  The  continued  and  increasing 
level  of  compliance  within  California’s  Marine  Invasive  Species  Program  reinforces 
stakeholder approval. 

As Federal regulations are developed, the legislature should strongly consider the 
continued  success  of  California’s  Marine  Invasive  Species  Program.  California  not 
only  exemplifies  the  potential  of  state  programs,  but  will  compliment  and  reinforce 
Federal  regulations  for  ballast  water  management.  Preemption  provisions  may  be 
beneficial  in  specific  areas  such  as  performance  standards  for  the  treatment  of  bal-
last  water;  however,  broad  preemption  language  for  state  programs  would  be  detri-
mental  to  the  overall  goal  of  controlling  NIS  introductions  via  commercial  shipping 
in the United States. 

The control of NIS via commercial shipping is a highly complex process requiring 
not  only  outreach  and  education  in  the  maritime  community,  but  most  of  all,  regu-
latory  consistency.  Among  other  state  programs,  California  has  worked  hard  to  es-
tablish a framework for the proper management of ballast water. The existing regu-
latory  framework  in  California  can  be  modified  in  conjunction  with  Federal  regula-
tions, which could provide an excellent foundation for the implementation of Federal 
rules. 
References Cited 
Apte,  S.M.,  B.S.  Holland,  S.L.  Godwin,  and  J.P.A.  Gardner.  2000.  Jumping  ship:  A 
Stepping  Stone  Event  Mediating  Transfer  of  a  Non-indigenous  Species  via  a 
Potentially Unsuitable Environment. Biological Invasions. 2 (75–79). 

Australian  Quarantine  and  Inspection  Service.  ‘‘Australian  Ballast  Water  Manage-
ment Requirement’’. Marine Awareness Kit. Accessed 24 March 2005. Website: 
http://www.affa.gov.au/corporateldocs/publications/html/quarantine/bal-
lastlwater/AustralianlBWlRequirements.pdf. 

Carlton,  J.T.  1999.  The  scale  and  ecological  consequences  of  biological  invasions  in 
the  world’s  oceans.  In  Invasive  Species  and  Biodiversity  Management.  O. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

Sandulund,  P.  Schei,  and  A.  Viken,  Eds.  Kulwer  Academic  Publishers. 
Dordrecht, Netherlands. 195–212 pp. 

Carlton,  J.T.  2001.  Introduced  Species  in  U.S.  coastal  waters:  Environmental  im-
pacts and Management Priorities. Pew Oceans Commission. Arlington, VA. 28 
pp. 

Cohen,  A.N.  1998.  Ships’  Ballast  Water  and  the  Introduction  of  Exotic  Organisms 
into  the  San  Francisco  Estuary.  Current  status  of  the  problem  and  options 
for management. San Francisco Estuary Institute, Richmond, CA. 81 pp. 

Cohen, A.N. (personal communication, 12/13/2004). 
Cohen,  A.N.  and  T.J.  Carlton.  1998.  Accelerating  invasion  rate  in  a  highly  invaded 

estuary. Science. 279 (555–558). 

Coutts,  D.M.,  K.M.  Moore,  and  C.  Hewitt.  2003.  Ships’  sea-chests:  An  overlooked 
transfer mechanism for non-indigenous marine species? Marine Pollution Bul-
letin. 46 (1504–1515). 

Crooks, J. (personal communication, 12/14/2004). 
Falkner,  M.B.  2003.  Report  on  the  California  Ballast  Water  Management  Program. 

California State Lands Commission, Marine Facilities Division. 82 pp. 

Fofonoff,  P.W.,  G.M.  Ruiz,  B.  Steves,  and  J.  Carlton.  2003.  In  ships  or  on  ships? 
Mechanisms  of  transfer  and  invasion  for  nonnative  species  to  the  coasts  of 
North  America.  Pp.  152–181.  In  Invasive  species,  vectors  and  management 
strategies.  G.M.  Ruiz  and  J.T.  Carlton  Eds.  Island  Press,  Washington,  D.C. 
Godwin, S.L. 2003. Hull fouling of maritime vessels as a pathway for marine species 

invasions to the Hawaiian Islands. Biofouling. 19 (123–131). 

Godwin,  S.L.,  L.G.  Eldredge,  and  K.  Gaut.  2004.  The  assessment  of  hull  fouling  as 
a mechanism for the introduction and dispersal of marine alien species in the 
main  Hawaiian  Islands.  Bishop  Museum  Technical  Report  No.  28.  Honolulu, 
HI. 114 pp. 

Grosholz, E.D. and G.M. Ruiz. 1995. Spread and potential impact of the recently in-
troduced  European  green  crab,  Carcinus  maenas,  in  central  California.  Ma-
rine Biology. 122(2):239–247. 

Hallegraeff,  G.M.  1998.  Transport  of  toxic  dinoflagellates  via  ships’  ballast  water: 
Bioeconomic  risk  assessment  and  efficacy  of  possible  ballast  water  manage-
ment strategies. Marine Ecology Progress Series. 168 (297–309). 

International Maritime Organization. Global Ballast Water Management Program— 
The  New  Convention.  Accessed  3/25/2005.  Website:  http://globallast.imo.org/ 
index.asp. 

Kimmerer, W. (personal communication, 12/15/2004). 
Lovell, S.J. and S.F. Stone. 2005. The economic impacts of aquatic invasive species: 
A  review  of  the  literature.  Working  Paper  No.  05–02.  U.S.  Environmental 
Protection Agency. Washington, D.C. 64 pp. 

Minchin,  D.,  and  S.  Gollasch.  2003.  Fouling  and  ships’  hulls:  How  changing  cir-
cumstances  and  spawning  events  may  result  in  the  spread  of  exotic  species. 
Biofouling. 19 (111–122). 

National  Research  Council.  1996.  Stemming  the  Tide:  Controlling  Introductions  of 
Nonindigenous  species  by  ship’s  ballast  water.  National  Academy  Press, 
Washington, D.C. 141 pp. 

New  Zealand  Ministry  of  Fisheries.  A  guide  to  New  Zealand  ballast  water  controls. 
Accessed  24  March  2005.  Website:  http://www.fish.govt.nz/sustainability/ 
biosecurity/ballastwater.html. 

Nichols, F.H., J.K. Thompson, and L.E. Schemel. 1990. Remarkable invasion of San 
Francisco  Bay  (California,  USA)  by  the  Asian  clam  Pomtamocorbula 
amurensis. II. Displacement of a former community. Marine Ecology Progress 
Series. 66 (95–101). 

Parsons,  M.G.  1998.  Flow-through  ballast  water  exchange.  Society  of  Naval  Archi-

tects and Marine Engineers, Transactions. 106 (485–493). 

Pimentel,  D.,  R.  Zuniga,  and  D.  Morrison.  2004.  Update  on  the  environmental  and 
economic costs associated with alien-invasive species in the United States. Ec-
ological Economics. In Press. 

Phyre  Technologies  Inc.  March  2005.  Proposal  Number:  N051–039–1267.  Topic 
Number: N05–039. Draft Proposal for the California State Lands Commission. 
Rudnick, D.A., K.M. Halat, and V.H. Resh. 2000. Distribution, Ecology and Potential 
Impacts of the Chinese Mitten Crab (Eriocheir sinensis) in San Francisco Bay. 
University of California Water Resources Center. Riverside, CA. Contribution 
No. 206. 74 pp. 

Ruiz, G.M., P.W. Fofonoff, J.T. Carlton, M.J. Wonham, and A.H. Hines. 2000a. Inva-
sion  of  coastal  marine  communities  in  North  America:  Apparent  patterns, 
processes,  and  biases.  Annual  Review  of  Ecology  and  Systematics.  31  (481– 
531). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

Ruiz,  G.M.,  T.K.  Rawlings,  F.C.  Dobbs,  L.A.  Drake,  T.  Mullady,  S.  Schoenfeld,  A. 
Hug, and R.R. Colwell. 2000b. Global spread of microorganisms by ships. Na-
ture. 408 (49–50). 

Ruiz,  G.M.  and  T.J.  Carlton.  2003.  Invasion  vectors:  A  conceptual  framework  for 
management.  In  Invasive  species,  vectors  and  management  strategies.  pp. 
459–498. G.M. Ruiz and J.T. Carlton Eds. Island Press, Washington D.C. 

Transport  Canada.  2001.  Guidelines  for  the  control  of  ballast  water  discharge  from 
ships  in  waters  under  Canadian  Jurisdiction.  Accessed  24  March  2005. 
Website: http://www.tc.gc.ca/marinesafety/TP/Tp13617/Tp13617Erev1.pdf. 
U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy.  2004.  An  Ocean  Blueprint  for  the  21st  Century. 

Final Report. Washington, D.C. 520 pp. 

Vinograd,  J.  and  M.  Sytsma.  December  2002.  Draft  Report  on  the  Oregon  Ballast 
Water Management Program in 2002. Center for Lakes and Reservoirs. Port-
land State University. 

Washington  Department  of  Fish  and  Wildlife.  2003.  Washington  state  ballast  water 
program.  Accessed  25  March  2005.  Website:  http://www.wdfw.wa.gov/fish/ 
nuisance/ballast.htm. 

Weisberg, S. (personal communication, 12/14/2004). 
Zhang,  F.  and  M.  Dickman.  1999.  Mid-Ocean  exchange  of  container  vessel  ballast 
water.  1:  Seasonal  factors  affecting  the  transport  of  harmful  diatoms  and 
dinoflagellates. Marine Ecology Progress Series. 176 (243–251). 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Ms.  Falkner.  We’ll  begin 

the questioning with Senator Boxer. 

Senator  BOXER.  Thank  you  so  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have  a 
number  of  questions,  but  due  to  the  time  constraints  I  would  like 
to  submit  them  to  our  panel  for  the  record.  I  do  have  one  or  two 
that I’d like to do now—if that is all right with you? 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You  have  a  full  5  minutes.  We  gave  all  of  these 

witnesses at least 5 minutes. 

Senator BOXER. That is very kind of you. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  wouldn’t  be  doing  my  job  if  I  didn’t  give  you 

at least the same time. 

not take time off of my—— 

Senator  BOXER.  I  appreciate  that.  And  I  hope  this  banter  does 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  BOXER.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  you.  This  has 
been  a  terrific  panel  in  terms  of  learning  about  the  new  tech-
nologies,  where  the  Commerce  people  have  their  red  flags  up  and 
scientists are going, our Coast Guard and, of course, our state peo-
ple who are, I wouldn’t say on the ground, but really on the water 
here.  So  here’s  the  thing,  I  was  telling  the  Chairman,  I  didn’t  get 
a  chance  to  read  this  in  my  statement,  but,  you  know,  I  want  to 
ask  Ms.  Falkner,  if  this  is  her  understanding,  my  staff  tells  me 
that  more  than  175  invasive  species  threaten  to  overwhelm  native 
fish and other wildlife in the San Francisco Bay alone. Is that your 
understanding? 

Ms.  FALKNER.  Based  on  the  data  that  has  been  collected  by  the 
Department of Fish and Game as well as others, there are over 175 
non-indigenous species that are pretty much unique to the bay that 
have not been found in other embayments in California or the West 
Coast. 

Senator  BOXER.  And  my  understanding  is  that  nationally,  Mr. 
Chairman,  the  damage,  the  economic  damage  of  invasive  species 
throughout  the  whole  country  is  $137  billion  a  year.  I  mean,  this 
is extraordinary, if this is true, and that’s why, Senator Inouye, I’m 
so grateful to you for your bill on this particular matter. We cannot 
turn  away  from  this.  This  doesn’t  make  any  sense.  We  need  to  do 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

something.  So  just  for  the  record,  Ms.  Falkner  and  Ms.  Hum, 
maybe, because in your states you see this, what’s the type of dam-
age  that  we’re  already  seeing  here  and  what  can  we  expect  if  we 
do nothing about this problem? 

Ms.  FALKNER.  The  type  of  damage  in  the  bay  area  has  included, 
for example, the Chinese mitten crab shut down the water munici-
palities  for  several  days  in  September  1998.  That  impacted  the 
coho  salmon  run  occurring  at  that  time,  it  impacted  the  agricul-
tural  and  municipal  water  users.  I  also  found  out  that  these  orga-
nisms  burrow  into  the  levy,  so  they  are  substantially  potentially 
weakening the levy system throughout the Bay delta. It’s very hard 
to  estimate  or  to  calculate,  determine  which  organisms  are  going 
to  be  problematic  and  which  are  not,  but  there  is  a  long  laundry 
list  of  organisms  and  the  cost  involved  in  controlling  them.  Basi-
cally, once they’re established, they’re our ‘‘friends.’’ 

Senator BOXER. Ms. Hum? 
Ms.  HUM.  In  Hawaii,  our  work  has  been  focused  on  alien  algae, 
an invasive species, and the primary troubles caused by alien algae 
are habitat destruction, and that’s been part of what has led to the 
decline in our near-shore fisheries. So, again, 75 percent decline in 
near-shore  fisheries,  in  part  because  of  habitat  destruction  caused 
by invasive species. 

Senator  BOXER.  Seventy-five  percent  species  decline.  That’s  in-

credible. 

Inouye. 

Ms. HUM. Decline in near-shore fisheries. 
Senator BOXER. I’m going to just submit the rest of my questions 
for  record.  But,  again,  I  want  to  thank  you  all  and  we  are  hopeful 
we can see some action. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Boxer.  Senator 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Mandelman,  your 
technology  seems  very  simple  and  up-front.  What’s  the  cost  esti-
mate? 

Mr. MANDELMAN. The cost estimate, and I want to emphasize at 
this  point  we’re  still  dealing  with  prototypes,  the  equipment  that 
will  be  installed  this  September  on  the  Prince  William  Sound, 
which  is  a  140,000-ton  oil  tanker,  is  approximately  three-quarters 
of  a  million  dollars.  Now,  this  is  a  prototype  system.  It  has  been 
custom  designed.  We  strongly  expect  that  once  this  goes  into  full 
scale  production  that  the  cost  of  building  it  will  drop  significantly 
once  it’s  coming  off  a  production  line.  Ultimately,  this  will  be  pro-
duction-line  technology.  So  we  could  see  another  20  percent  de-
crease. 

The  second  part,  to  answer  your  question  fully,  unlike  the  origi-
nal  equipment  that  we  installed  on  the  Tonsina,  this  work  on  the 
Prince  William  Sound  will  be  done  with  a  riding  crew.  The  ship 
will  not  have  to  go  into  dry  dock.  Much  of  the  work—not  all  of  it, 
but  much  of  it  can  be  done  while  the  ship  is  in  actual  operation 
except  for  the  time  when  they’re  doing  some  welding.  So,  a  ship 
doesn’t  have  to  be  taken  out  of  service  for  more  than  a  couple  of 
days  at  most  so  the  financial  cost  to  the  ship  owner  of  having  to 
take  the  ship  out  of  service  is  reduced  to  almost  nothing.  It’s  not 
zero, but it would be very low. We expect that most ships could be 
outfitted for under half a million dollars. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

problem. 

Senator  INOUYE.  The  standards  of  the  IMO,  as  set  forth  by  Ms. 

Metcalf have five criteria. Will your device meet those needs? 

Mr.  MANDELMAN.  We  think  it  meets  all  of  them  without  any 

Senator INOUYE. You think it will? 
Mr. MANDELMAN. I think it will meet all of the IMO criteria. It’s 
safe, it’s affordable, it’s easily installed—it will meet the standards, 
I think there won’t be any difficulty with that at all. 

Senator INOUYE. What are your thoughts, Ms. Metcalf? 
Ms.  METCALF.  I’m  an  optimist,  Senator,  so  I’d  like  to  jump  up 
and  agree  with  Mr.  Mandelman  and  from  what  we  have  been  told 
through  the  tests  on  the  Tonsina  and  the  Prince  William  Sound, 
studies  that  will  be  coming  up,  I  see  very  little  problem  with  four 
of the five, but I’ve not yet seen—and what I might add, I have not 
yet  seen  from  any  of  the  other  technologies  that  have  been  tested, 
is peer-reviewed data which shows the achievement of the 10 orga-
nisms  per-unit-volume  above  and  below  50  microns.  The  biological 
effectiveness  is  still  a  question,  and  if  I  might  add,  next  month  at 
the International Maritime Organization, the Marine Environment 
Protection  Committee  will  be  conducting  their  pre-review  process, 
which  is  their  reality  check,  that’s  required  3  years  prior  to  the 
first  implementation  date  in  2009.  So  far  the  papers  that  I  have 
seen submitted are woefully inadequate in proving that technology 
is  now  available.  That  is  not  to  say  that  it  won’t  be  available  in 
2009,  but  the  data  we’ve  seen  thus  far  is  not  one  that  let’s  me  go 
to sleep easily in the evening. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Admiral,  the  principal  agency  to  monitor  these 
bills if they become law is the Coast Guard. Do you have sufficient 
personnel and equipment? 

Admiral  GILMOUR.  Sir,  we  certainly  have  sufficient  personnel  to 
successfully  carry  out  the  ballast  water  management  program  we 
have  now.  I  think  in  the  area  of  where  we  go  with  it,  with  a  dis-
charge  standard  which  we  do  think  is  important,  we’re  also  going 
to  have  to  develop  the  technology  to  measure  the  effectiveness 
which  is  one  of  the  things  I  talked  about  in  my  statement.  And  I 
think  some  of  what  was  said  that  we’ll  come  up  with  different 
means  to  measure  that  technology,  whether  it  be  chemical,  ozone, 
or  other  types  of  systems.  So  I  hope  that  when  we  come  up  with 
a way to verify the effectiveness it will not have a significant addi-
tional  workload  on  our  personnel.  We’re  looking  for  technology  so-
lution  in  that  area.  Right  now  we’re  going  to  have  people  looking 
at  all  ballast  water  management  that  comes  into  the  U.S.,  so  we 
can do that through our port state control program, yes, sir. 

Senator  INOUYE.  What  about  NOAA?  Do  you  have  enough  per-

sonnel and equipment? 

Mr.  KEENEY.  Senator,  we  did  not  request  specific  funding  in  the 
budget for 2006 for ballast water, however, we do have several pro-
grams  that  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony,  including  Great  Lakes 
Environmental  Research  Laboratory  and  Sea  Grant  that  do  work 
on  ballast  water  on  discretionary  basis,  so  we  believe  we  do  have 
sufficient funds. 

Senator  INOUYE.  I’m  very  happy  with  the  work  that  Ms.  Hum  is 
doing in Hawaii. It is a program that I think should be looked into 
by all communities. So, congratulations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

Ms. HUM. Thank you, Senator, very much. 
Senator  INOUYE.  But  I’m  concerned  about  costs.  In  the  last  5 
years  we  have  spent  $121  billion  for  space  exploration,  and  for  all 
ocean programs we have spent $34 billion. Of that $34 billion, $30 
million were spent on ocean exploration. That’s the difference. $121 
billion  for  space  exploration,  but  only  $30  million  for  ocean  explo-
ration, even though the ocean covers 70 percent of the planet’s sur-
face.  Somewhere  we  have  missed  priorities.  I  hope  that  the  meas-
ures  that  we  have  submitted  will  do  something,  but  without  ade-
quate  funding  I  don’t  know  how  far  we’ll  get.  But  I’m  concerned 
about  the  cost  of  equipment  because  only  4  percent  of  American 
bottoms carry international trade goods, 96 percent are foreign bot-
toms,  and  if  we  add  costs  for  construction  and  equipment  it  might 
be  less,  and  I’m  concerned  about  that.  So  you  think  you’ll  come 
down from the prototype’s half a million? 

Mr.  MANDELMAN.  Yes.  Yes,  we  do,  and  something  that  Ms. 
Metcalf mentioned, we expect to have peer-reviewed studies on the 
original  installation  on  the  Tonsina  within,  oh,  I  hope  the  middle 
of  July,  and  because  we  will  be  more  in  control  of  the  scientists 
when  the  Prince  William  Sound  work  is  done,  we  hope  to  have 
peer-reviewed  articles  published  early  next  year  on  the  final  set  of 
tests.  We  have  a  report  that  we  issued—it  was  issued  3  years  ago 
but  it  wasn’t  peer-reviewed.  That  process  has  now  been  completed 
and  we  hope  to  have  more  peer-reviewed  studies  sooner  this  time 
around. 

Senator INOUYE. I’ve spent more time than allocated. Thank you 

very much. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator.  Admiral 
Gilmour,  the  Coast  Guard  led  the  delegation  to  the  IMO  Con-
ference on Ballast Water Management. There’s obviously a discrep-
ancy on the treatment standard, difference of opinion on the treat-
ment standard. Are there any other areas where the IMO Conven-
tion fell short of what your expectations or the delegation’s expecta-
tions were? 

Admiral GILMOUR. Well, sir, as you know when we go to IMO it’s 
the  ultimate  in  negotiations  on  not  only  this  front,  but  any  other 
front.  In  some  places  we  negotiate  positions  that  we  know  are  not 
going  to  be  met  and  end  up  in  the  middle.  I  think  the  important 
parts  of  the  IMO  Convention  that  I  talked  about  in  my  statement 
are  the  fact  that  ballast  water  management  is  sunsetted,  which  I 
think is very important. Also, that we do have a ballast water dis-
charge standard to work from, which I also think is important. And 
whatever  discharge  standard  we  do  eventually  come  up  with,  I 
think it would be important to have some sort of relief valve, if you 
will,  from  that  system  that  we  can  later  go  back  to  if  we  set  a 
standard  that  is  too  high.  And  I  think  as  time,  as  we  develop  sys-
tems  from  prototype  to  actual  installation,  our  Shipboard  Tech-
nology  Evaluation  Program  will  help,  but  certainly  the  Environ-
mental  Technology  Verification  Program  that  we  were  starting  to 
verify  protocols  to  have  consistent  measurements,  not  only  of  the 
equipment,  but  of  ways  to  measure  the  effectiveness  of  the  equip-
ment, are all things that will help us come up with solutions. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Ms.  Metcalf,  it’s  my  understanding  that  Cana-
dian officials have announced an approach to ballast water regula-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

tion that relies on exchange. If we go forward with a program that 
focuses  on  treatment,  how  will  U.S.  shippers  be  able  to  adapt  to 
different regimes and does it create an insurmountable conflict? 

Ms.  METCALF.  Well,  I  would  add,  I  didn’t  specifically  mention 
when  I  said  the  waters  of  the  U.S.,  the  Lake  Carriers  Association 
is  also  a  member  of  our  Coalition,  so  we  have  brought  their  posi-
tions  in  on  the  positions  of  the  Coalition.  What  the  Canadians  are 
feeling compelled to do right now is the very reason we need a glob-
al  system  to  implement  a  ballast  water  management  program. 
Now, we can argue about whether IMO is the floor from which we 
need  to  rise  above,  but  for  the  initial  control  strategy  we  need  a 
global  program  just  for  that  reason.  So  that  a  vessel  that  calls  in 
Canada or the Great Lakes where you’ve got two sets of waters, the 
U.S.  and  Canada,  or  going  to  four  other  countries,  it  is  not  strug-
gling  with  the  prospect  of  dealing  with  four  different  programs. 
That  also,  likewise,  is  the  very  reason  we  need  a  strong  Federal 
program  that  convinces  the  states  that  that  Federal  program  is 
good  enough  for  their  state  waters.  And,  in  fact,  with  other  state 
folks  that  I’ve  spoken  to  they  are—I  can’t  speak  for  them  offi-
cially—but they are begging for a strong Federal program that will 
allow  shipping  the  knowledge  and  the  consistency  of  knowing  that 
if  they  meet  that  program  they’ve  met  the  program  wherever  they 
may call. 

The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Falkner, you talked about hull fouling. What 
has California done to address that particular problem, and what’s 
your  estimate  as  to  how  significant  a  problem  it  is  in  contributing 
to invasive species relative to ballast water? 

Ms. FALKNER. In California, where the law requires us to put for-
ward  a  report  to  the  legislature  next  year.  So  we  had  a  workshop 
with  Sea  Grant  in  San  Francisco  in  April,  brought  together  com-
mercial  and  recreational  vessel  interests  as  well  as  academicians, 
ship  owners,  and  builders,  to  discuss  what  the  current  status  is, 
what we know. We’re going to be holding a series of meetings with 
stakeholders  beginning  next  month  and  kind  of  get  a  better  idea 
of  what  the  risks  are.  Much  of  the  work  that’s  been  done  recently 
on hull fouling has been done by, there’s a very small group of peo-
ple,  gentlemen  out  of  Hawaii,  Dr.  Gregory  Ruiz  from  Smithsonian. 
We are contracting with Smithsonian and Dr. Ruiz to do some hull 
fouling  work  for  us.  We’re  not  sure  where  that’s  going  to  take  us. 
The  industry  at  the  commercial  side  is,  I  think,  interested  in  hav-
ing  a  standard  best  management  practices  guidelines  developed. 
It’s  going  to  be  a  difficult  issue  to  address.  Some  think  it’s  more 
difficult  than  ballast  water,  but  we  have  a  hard  time  imagining 
that  at  this  point.  In  California  ballast  water  is  probably  a  bigger 
risk  than  hull  fouling  but  it  may  be  too  early  to  say.  There  are 
some systems like Hawaii where hull fouling appears to be a more 
significant problem than maybe ballast water is. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  thank  you,  and  thank  you  again  to  all  the 
witnesses for a great deal of information and focus on an important 
issue  that  I  think  is  very  appropriate  for  us  to  begin  with,  on  the 
Policy  Study  on  both  the  coral  reef  reauthorization  and  ballast 
water  issue.  I  imagine  that  we  will  continue  to  deal  with  these 
issues,  but  specifically,  I  look  forward  to  dealing  with  both  pieces 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

of legislation, hopefully, before the end of the year. So I thank you 
for your testimony and your patience. The Committee is adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 10:37 a.m., the hearing adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN, U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  want  to  thank  you  for  your  leadership  in  scheduling  this  hearing  regarding  the 
impact  of  Ballast  Water  Invasive  Species  Management  and  Threats  to  Coral  Reefs. 
This is an important environmental issue and one that can be remedied through in-
novative technology as we will be learning about today. Our role in this process, as 
members  of  this  Committee,  is  to  craft  a  regulatory  environment  that  effectively 
deals  with  problems  without  hampering  the  innovation  of  the  private  sector.  One 
of my constituents from Virginia, Mr. Joel Mandelman, will be speaking before this 
Committee later today. I want to take this opportunity to thank him for his appear-
ance  and  for  the  innovative  work  that  his  company  Nutech  is  doing  in  its  efforts 
to  treat  ballast  water  so  the  impact  of  invasive  species  on  the  environment  can  be 
controlled.  Invasive  species  cause  significant  economic  impact  and  are  a  major 
threat to public health and the environment. It is estimated that damage from these 
organisms causes over $6 billion in damages to the United States annually. The in-
dustries  most  affected  include  power  plants,  municipal  water  treatment  systems, 
ships  and  fishing.  In  particular,  the  vitality  of  the  shellfish  industry  is  greatly  im-
pacted. 

It is my understanding that Nutech has developed a treatment system for ballast 
water  that  both  reduces  the  spread  of  invasive  species  and  reduces  operating  costs 
for  ship  owners.  This  process  involves  treating  ballast  water  with  ozone  gas  to  de-
contaminate  the  water.  Ozone  gas  has  been  shown  to  be  very  effective  in  dis-
infecting  drinking  water,  swimming  pools  and  aquariums.  Testing  of  ozone  gas 
treatment aboard ships in Alaska in 2000, showed that this form of water treatment 
greatly  reduced  the  number  of  unwanted  organisms  found  in  ballast  water.  I  am 
told  that  this  innovative  technology  works  in  both  fresh  and  salt  water  because 
ozone gas quickly degrades and reverts back to oxygen. Therefore, ozone has the po-
tential to fulfill the requirements that the National Aquatic Invasive Species Act (S. 
363)  places  on  the  discharge  of  ballast  water  in  the  Great  Lakes.  This  technology 
also  speeds  up  the  timeline  for  when  ships  can  comply  with  the  requirements  set 
forth in the International Maritime Organization (IMO) Treaty. 

However,  to  encourage  new  technology  that  will  improve  our  environment,  any 
legislative approaches must be mindful of the needs of companies like Nutech to en-
sure  they  have  the  tools  they  need  to  successfully  test  and  implement  their  tech-
nology. In September of this year, another test will be conducted where Nutech will 
install  an  advanced  version  of  its  technology  on  an  oil  tanker.  Because  of  improve-
ments  in  the  technology,  this  version  will  cost  65  percent  less  than  the  equipment 
for the first test and will be able to be installed without taking the ship out-of-serv-
ice. 

According  to  the  shipping  industry,  deep  ocean  ballast  water  exchanges  cost  a 
ship  owner  between  $16,000  and  $80,000  per  exchange  (which  must  occur  every 
month).  For  this  technology  to  be  implemented,  several  changes  must  be  made  to 
induce ship owners to participate. Therefore, Nutech suggests that the implementa-
tion  period  in  S.  363  be  shortened  so  ships  currently  in  service  will  have  to  treat 
their  ballast  water  once  the  Coast  Guard  approves  a  treatment  technology.  Nutech 
believes this change ensures that ballast water treatment continues to evolve along 
with technology. Second, to speed up the implementation date of the legislation the 
Committee should expand the scope of the Coast Guard’s Shipboard Evaluation and 
Testing  Program  (STEP)  to  allow  more  ships  of  the  same  owner  to  participate  in 
experimental technology program. In addition, we should consider grandfathering in 
owners who install approved technology prior to the mandatory implementation date 
to  current  standards.  Third,  in  terms  of  complying  with  Coast  Guard  regulations, 
ship captains must be able to prove that they have been treating their ballast water. 
For  more  effective  testing,  it  is  suggested  that  conducting  microbe  counts  at  every 
port is not an effect way to measure the quality of the ballast water. Total Residual 
Oxidant  testing  should  be  the  main  test  of  ballast  water  with  microbe  testing  done 

(55) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

on a periodic basis. Finally, any Congressional action should be the exclusive legisla-
tive  authority  for  mandating  methods  of  treatment  and  discharge  of  ballast  water. 
This  provision  will  prevent  conflicting  regulation  of  discharges  under  the  Clean 
Water Act. 

It is vital that we on this committee work with companies such as Nutech to cre-
ate an efficient regulatory environment that fosters innovation. By developing incen-
tives  that  allow  ship  owners  to  invest  in  new  technology,  we  will  be  able  to  better 
protect  the  environment  with  a  lower  cost  to  business  owners.  I  hope  that  during 
this  hearing  we  will  consider  the  best  way  to  remedy  this  significant  problem  im-
pacting our oceans and lakes. I again would like to thank the Chairman for his lead-
ership  on  this  issue  and  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee  as  we  figure 
out the best legislative approach for dealing with this problem. Thank you. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CARL LEVIN, U.S. SENATOR FROM MICHIGAN 

I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Sununu  and  Ranking  Member  Boxer  for  holding  to-
day’s  hearing  on  the  important  issue  of  ballast  water  and  aquatic  invasive  species. 
I also want to thank the full Committee Chairman, Chairman Stevens and Ranking 
Member  Inouye,  who  have  been  strong  advocates  in  this  area  and  who  have  intro-
duced S. 363, the Ballast Water Management Act of 2005. 

The  problem  of  aquatic  invasive  species  is  very  real  to  coastal  and  inland  water-
ways.  Invasive  species-microorganisms,  pathogens,  plants,  fish,  and  animals—were 
introduced into the United States and have become established and self-sustaining, 
since  the  days  of  colonization.  Yet  modern  transportation  technology  and  the  fast 
pace of global trade have greatly increased the rate and severity of these invasions. 
The results are often ecologically and economically disastrous. 

As  a  Senator  from  Michigan,  a  Great  Lakes  State,  I  have  seen  the  consequences 
of allowing aquatic invasive species to enter our waters. Some of my colleagues may 
remember that back in the late eighties and nineties, the zebra mussel was released 
into  the  Great  Lakes  through  ballast  water.  At  that  time,  people  considered  the 
zebra mussel to be just a problem for the Great Lakes. The Great Lakes still suffer 
from  zebra  mussels,  but  now,  over  20  states—as  far  west  as  California  and  as  far 
north as New Hampshire—are fighting to control and prevent them. I’m sure Chair-
man Sununu and Ranking Member Boxer can appreciate why a national ballast reg-
ulatory program is needed now. Zebra mussels have fundamentally changed the nat-
ural  dynamics  of  the  Great  Lakes.  They  have  decimated  native  mussels,  allowed 
toxins  to  reenter  into  the  food  chain,  may  be  responsible  for  causing  the  collapse 
in  the  plankton  essential  to  support  sport  fish  and  may  be  responsible  for  creating 
hypoxic conditions or a ‘‘Dead Zone’’ in Lake Erie. Many of our beaches are covered 
by  so  many  zebra  mussel  shells  that  you  must  wear  shoes  to  walk  the  beach,  and 
it  is  estimated  that  electrical  generation,  water  treatment,  and  industrial  facilities 
spend tens of millions of dollars every year combating the zebra mussel. 

The best effort that we have against invasive species is prevention. Because mari-
time  commerce  is  the  largest  and  most  active  pathway  for  new  species  to  be  intro-
duced  into  our  waters,  I  believe  that  we  need  to  enact  legislation  that  will  require 
ballast  water  discharge  management  that  will  result  in  ballast  water  treatment 
technology onboard ships as soon as possible. I believe that technology vendors will 
be able to produce affordable technology that significantly improves on ballast water 
exchange in the very near future. 

I  recognize  the  need  to  put  ballast  technology  onboard  ships  quickly.  Under  cur-
rent  law,  ships  that  enter  the  Great  Lakes  must  conduct  ballast  water  exchange, 
empty their ballast tanks, or use alternative technology to treat their ballast water. 
While  the  Great  Lakes  ballast  water  program  has  probably  decreased  the  number 
of  new  introductions,  a  new  invader  appears  in  the  Great  Lakes  approximately 
every 8 months. Currently, there is no process in place for ships to pursue the statu-
tory  option  to  use  alternative  treatment,  except  for  an  experimental  program  that 
has  onerous  requirements.  Consequently,  ships  carrying  ballast  water  must  ex-
change their ballast water or empty their ballast tanks. Roughly 90 percent of ships 
visiting  the  Great  Lakes  report  no  ballast  onboard  (NOBOB).  Unfortunately,  re-
searchers believe that even when a ship empties its ballast tanks, the small amount 
of  ballast  that  cannot  be  pumped  out  still  carries  viable  organisms.  When  ships  fill 
and empty their tanks in the Great Lakes, these species are flushed into the Lakes. 
While technologies and practices might be used to reduce the risk of those residuals, 
the  best  solution  is  ballast  water  treatment.  Treatment,  even  to  a  level  equivalent 
to  ballast  water  exchange,  would  significantly  improve  the  situation  for  the  Great 
Lakes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

Senator  Collins  and  I  introduced  the  National  Aquatic  Invasive  Species  Act  (S. 
770), which directs the Coast Guard and the EPA to set an environmentally protec-
tive  ballast  water  discharge  standard.  It  requires  ships  to  use  ballast  water  ex-
change  or  a  treatment  which  achieves  the  best  performance  level  available  in  the 
near-term  and  phases  out  ballast  water  exchange  after  2011.  It  also  addresses  the 
risks  associated  with  other  aspects  of  the  ship,  such  as  hull  fouling.  The  benefit  of 
this approach is not limited to the Great Lakes, and the bill will hasten technology 
development. 

In  closing,  I  again  want  to  thank  this  subcommittee  for  today’s  hearing.  Aquatic 
invasive  species  threaten  all  of  our  waters  regardless  whether  they  are  inland  or 
coastal. As the Chairman saw in his own State of New Hampshire, invasive species 
that  enter  into  our  waters  can  easily  be  spread,  and  a  strong  ballast  water  tech-
nology is needed to prevent any new invaders. I urge my colleagues to authorize leg-
islation that does the following. 

• Has  a  comprehensive  scope—Federal  legislation  must  address  the  introduction 
of  invasive  species  from  the  whole  ship  and  address  all  pathways  of  introduc-
tion, rapid response, and research; 

• Focuses  on  prevention—Once  introduced  to  the  United  States,  invasive  species 
are  nearly  impossible  to  eradicate,  and  their  spread  by  other  pathways  is  dif-
ficult  and  costly  to  control  and  eradicate.  Federal  legislation  must  close  the 
loopholes that allow species to invade our waters and prevent them from being 
introduced; 

• Addresses the whole ship as a pathway—Researchers believe that ballast water 
is just one way that ships carry organisms. Therefore, Federal legislation must 
consider  the  whole  ship  as  a  pathway  of  introduction,  and  address  hull  fouling 
and anchor chains; and 

• Mandates  an  environmentally  protective  standard  for  ballast  water  and  facili-
tates  broad  near-term  use  of  best  available  treatments—Federal  legislation 
should  require  ships  to  meet  an  environmentally  protective  and  measurable 
standard  at  a  future  date  certain.  Legislation  should  also  facilitate  the  use  of 
treatments  and  practices  that  yield  the  greatest  reduction  in  risk  by  as  many 
ships as possible. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. SUSAN M. COLLINS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Lakes, ponds, and coastal ecosystems in Maine are under attack. Aquatic invasive 
species  threaten  Maine’s  drinking  water  systems,  recreation,  wildlife  habitat,  lake-
front  real  estate,  and  fisheries.  Plants,  such  as  variable-leaf  milfoil,  are  crowding 
out  native  species.  Invasive  Asian  shore  crabs  are  taking  over  Southern  New  Eng-
land’s  tidal  pools  and  are  advancing  into  Maine  to  the  potential  detriment  of  my 
state’s lobster and clam industries. 

Maine,  and  many  other  states,  are  attempting  to  fight  back  against  these  inva-
sions.  Unfortunately,  states  can  only  do  so  much.  As  with  national  security,  pro-
tecting the integrity of our lakes, streams, and coastlines from invading species can-
not  be  accomplished  by  individual  states  alone.  We  need  a  uniform,  nationwide  ap-
proach  to  deal  effectively  with  invasive  species.  For  this  reason,  Senator  Levin  and 
I  introduced  S.  770,  the  National  Aquatic  Invasive  Species  Act  (NAISA)  of  2005,  to 
reauthorize  the  Nonindigenous  Aquatic  Nuisance  Prevention  and  Control  Act.  This 
bipartisan  legislation  would  create  a  comprehensive  nationwide  approach  to  com-
bating  alien  species  that  invade  our  shores,  whether  these  species  are  hitchhikers 
aboard a ship or carried in the cargo of an airplane. 

I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Sununu  and  Ranking  Member  Boxer  for  holding  a 
hearing  on  ballast  water  management  of  aquatic  invasive  species.  This  issue  is  of 
national  importance.  As  the  Government  Accountability  Office  reported:  ‘‘[I]nvasive 
species  are  one  of  the  most  serious,  yet  least  appreciated,  environmental  threats  of 
the 21st century.’’ 

Federal  legislation  to  address  aquatic  invasive  species  must  have  the  following 
features to effectively protective protect U.S. aquatic ecosystem , and the economies 
they support: 

• Comprehensive  scope—Federal  legislation  must  address  the  introduction  of 
invasive species from the whole ship as well as address other pathways of intro-
duction  such  as  importation  for  the  pet  trade  or  for  food  markets,  rapid  re-
sponse, and research; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

• Focus on prevention—Once introduced to the United States, highly invasive spe-
cies such as the zebra mussel, European green crab, and watermilfoil are often 
impossible  to  eradicate,  and  their  spread  by  secondary  vectors  is  difficult  and 
costly to control; 
• Address the whole ship as a pathway—Current research suggests that hull foul-
ing  is  a  significant  contributor  in  aquatic  invasive  species  introductions;  there-
fore,  Federal  legislation  must  consider  the  whole  ship  as  a  vector  of  introduc-
tion, not just ballast water; 
• Set  environmentally  protective  standard  for  ballast  water,  and  facilitate  broad 
near-term  use  of  best  treatments  available—Federal  legislation  should  require 
ships  to  meet  an  environmentally  protective,  measurable  standard  at  a  certain 
date  in  the  future,  but  meanwhile  facilitate  the  use,  by  as  many  ships  as  pos-
sible, of treatments and practices that yield the greatest reduction in risk from 
aquatic invasive species possible; and, 
• Retain  state  sovereignty—Federal  legislation  should  permit  states  to  take  steps 
to  protect  their  aquatic  resources  from  damage  by  ship-mediated  introductions 
of aquatic invasive species if the Federal program proves ineffective. 
• The  need  for  comprehensive  national  legislation  focused  on  prevention—The 
stakes  are  high  when  invasive  species  are  unintentionally  introduced  into  our 
Nation’s waters. Invasive species endanger ecosystems, reduce biodiversity, and 
threaten  native  species.  They  disrupt  people’s  lives  and  livelihoods  by  lowering 
property  values,  impairing  commercial  fishing  and  aquaculture,  degrading  rec-
reational experiences, and damaging public water supplies. 

In  the  1950s,  European  green  crabs  swarmed  the  Maine  coast  and  literally  ate 
the bottom out of Maine’s soft-shell clam industry by the 1980s. Many clam diggers 
were forced to go after other fisheries or find new vocations. In just one decade, this 
invader  reduced  the  number  of  clam  diggers  in  Maine  from  nearly  5,000  in  the 
1940s,  to  fewer  than  1,500  in  the  1950s.  The  European  green  crab  was  first  docu-
mented on the West Coast in San Francisco Bay in 1989. Since its discovery in Cali-
fornia,  the  European  green  crab  has  spread  northward  to  Oregon  and  Washington. 
If  the  European  green  crab  becomes  established  in  on  the  West  Coast,  it  may  have 
a  significant  impact  on  the  clam,  oyster,  and  mussel  industries,  similar  to  the  im-
pacts  on  Maine.  In  California,  the  green  crab  is  thought  to  have  caused  the  loss  of 
as much as 50 percent of Manila clam stocks and substantial decreases in other crab 
populations.  European  green  crabs  currently  cost  an  estimated  $44  million  a  year 
in damage and control efforts in the United States. 

The  European  green  crab  provides  the  textbook  example  why  the  United  States 
needs  comprehensive  legislation  to  not  only  address  ballast  water,  and  to  improve 
coordination  to  prevent  the  interstate  spread  of  these  species  once  they  reach  U.S. 
shores.  The  European  green  crab  likely  hitched  a  ride  to  the  East  Coast  in  the  dry 
ballast  of  a  ship.  Once  here  it  spread  from  New  Jersey  north  to  Nova  Scotia,  and 
south to the Chesapeake Bay. Its spread to the West Coast could have been caused 
by a number of human factors that are responsible for the spread the species to new 
areas. Among these is ballast water from incoming ships, seaweed packed with lob-
sters,  and  through  bait.  Comprehensive  legislation  would  address  these  various 
pathways  for  the  introduction  of  species  and  will  help  states  coordinate  efforts  to 
prevent the spread of a species once it enters an aquatic ecosystem. 

The National Aquatic Invasive Species Act of 2005, is the most comprehensive ef-
fort ever to address the threat of invasive species. By authorizing $836 million over 
6  years,  this  legislation  would  open  numerous  new  fronts  in  our  war  against 
invasive  species.  The  bill  directs  the  Coast  Guard  to  develop  regulations  that  will 
end  the  easy  cruise  of  invasive  species  into  U.S.  waters  through  the  ballast  water 
of international ships, and would provide the Coast Guard with $6 million per year 
to develop and implement these regulations. 

The  bill  also  would  provide  $30  million  per  year  for  a  grant  program  to  assist 
state  efforts  to  prevent  the  spread  of  invasive  species.  It  would  provide  $12  million 
per year for the Army Corps of Engineers, and Fish and Wildlife Service, to contain 
and control invasive species. Finally, the Levin-Collins bill would authorize $30 mil-
lion annually for research, education, and outreach. 

The  most  effective  means  of  stopping  invading  species  is  to  attack  them  before 
they  attack  us.  We  need  an  early  alert,  rapid  response  system  to  combat  invading 
species  before  they  have  a  chance  to  take  hold.  For  the  first  time,  this  bill  would 
establish  a  national  monitoring  network  to  detect  newly  introduced  species,  while 
providing $25 million to the Secretary of the Interior to create a rapid response fund 
to help states and regions respond quickly once invasive species have been detected. 
This bill is our best effort at preventing the next wave of invasive species from tak-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

ing hold and decimating industries and destroying waterways throughout the coun-
try.  In  Washington,  the  state  does  not  believe  it  can  eliminate  the  European  green 
crab, but it is trying to control the population to the point where it is not disastrous 
to the surrounding ecosystem. NAISA would give the states the tools and resources 
for this effort. 

While  introduction  of  aquatic  invasive  species  through  ballast  water  poses  the 
greatest threat to our waters, non-native species imported for live food, aquaculture, 
or  the  pet  trade  can  escape  and  become  invasive.  The  snakehead  fish  that  invaded 
a  Maryland  pond  and  now  the  Potomac  River  is  one  example.  Currently,  there  is 
no uniform, systematic process for screening or regulating the proposed importation 
of  live  organisms  to  prevent  the  introduction  of  harmful  invasive  species.  The 
NAISA  legislation  creates  a  screening  process  for  planned  introductions  of  non-in-
digenous species not already in trade. The legislation would prohibit the importation 
of  species  that  are  determined  to  pose  a  high  risk  of  becoming  invasive  or  species 
with insufficient information to determine the risk. 

Prevention  is  key,  but  when  it  fails,  we  must  respond  rapidly  to  detect  invasive 
species and stop their spread. This legislation will help states and regional organiza-
tions  detect  and  respond  to  future  invasions  through  early  detection  and  rapid  re-
sponse.  The  bill  provides  funding  to  support  ecological  surveys  to  rapidly  detect  re-
cently-established  aquatic  invasive  species  and  to  develop  and  implement  rapid  re-
sponse plans to eradicate or control aquatic invasive species. 

The legislation also takes precautions to ensure that the methods we use to man-
age and control invasive species do not adversely affect health, public safety, or the 
environment. Ensuring the environmental soundness of our response is critical if we 
are to avoid unintended consequences. In the 1990s, biologists in Maine found DDT 
and other pesticides in the mudflats of Maine. In an attempt to eradicate the green 
crab,  the  state,  and  individuals,  had  applied  pesticides  to  the  flats  about  50  years 
earlier.  We  must  be  careful  that  our  current  attempts  to  remove  invasive  species 
do not cause even more serious problems. 

Ship Mediated Introduction of Aquatic Invasive Species—One of the leading path-
ways  for  the  introduction  of  aquatic  organisms  to  U.S.  waters  from  abroad  is 
through transoceanic vessels. Commercial vessels fill and release ballast tanks with 
seawater as a means of stabilization. The ballast water contains live organisms from 
plankton  to  adult  fish  that  are  transported  and  released  through  this  pathway.  We 
are  still  on  a  steep  learning  curve  regarding  the  best  treatments  to  use  to  address 
this  problem.  However,  while  a  perfect  treatment  still  eludes  us,  many  possible 
treatments would improve substantially on ballast water exchange, our current fall-
back.  The  best  approach  to  resolving  this  situation  is  to  facilitate  use,  by  as  many 
ships as possible, of the best methods available as soon as possible and require im-
provement over time. 

NAISA  provides  a  model  for  a  framework.  Since  the  last  reauthorization  of  this 
legislation  in  1996,  there  has  been  growing  consensus  about  the  value  of  a  manda-
tory  national  program  to  prevent  movement  of  organisms  by  ships.  NAISA  will  re-
quire all ships to prepare Aquatic Invasive Management Plans, carry out best man-
agement  practices,  and  document  all  ballast  operations  and  management  activities 
related  to  this  legislation.  The  legislation  would  require  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  in 
concurrence with the Environmental Protection Agency, to set a protective discharge 
standard  for  ballast  water,  and  require  ballast  water  exchange  or  the  best  treat-
ments possible until 2011. After that date, ballast water exchange expires as an op-
tion.  In  addition,  the  Coast  Guard  and  EPA  must  promulgate  regulations  related 
to  other  ship  operations  that  pose  a  significant  risk  of  introduction  of  aquatic 
invasive  species.  The  legislation  protects  the  investments  of  ship  owners  in  treat-
ments  by  providing  a  10-year  approval  period  for  any  approved  installation.  These 
measures will ensure that the United States is taking the most effective actions pos-
sible to protect our waters, ecosystems, and industries. 

Lastly,  NAISA  does  not  preempt  state  efforts  to  better  control  ballast  water  dis-
charges and other ship-mediated vectors. For too long, the Federal Government has 
taken  little  action  to  address  the  environmental  and  economic  threats  posed  by 
ships,  states  should  be  allowed  to  continue  their  efforts  at  least  until  there  is  a 
strong national program enacted and implemented. 

Nonindigenous  species  infest  and  degrade  U.S.  waterways  and  coastal  areas  in 
virtually  every  region  of  the  United  States.  We  are  losing  the  fight  to  protect  the 
Nation’s waters from expensive and environmentally damaging invasions by aquatic 
nuisance  species.  Every  day  that  passes  without  protections  to  prevent  new  inva-
sions  increases  the  threat  that  another  exotic  species  will  establish  itself,  altering 
the ecosystem in our great waters. 

The  NAISA  legislation  provides  the  framework  for  a  comprehensive  and  coordi-
nated response at the Federal, state, and local levels to prevent the spread of aquat-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

ic  invasive  species.  I  urge  my  colleagues  to  cosponsor  this  legislation  and  work  to 
move the bill swiftly through the Senate. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. CELIA M. SMITH, PROFESSOR OF BOTANY, 

UNIVERSITY OF HAWAI’I 

Regarding the Impacts of Ballast Water and Related Hull-Fouling to Hawaii 
Greetings, Chairman Stevens, Co-Chair Inouye and distinguished members of the 
National Ocean Policy Study Subcommittee of the Commerce Committee. This is the 
testimony for Dr. Celia M. Smith, Professor of Botany at the University of Hawai’i. 
With this testimony, I’d like to argue the significance of impacts from ballast water 
and  hull-fouling  for  invasive,  non-indigenous  species  introductions  to  the  Hawaiian 
archipelago. Thank you for this opportunity to outline mechanisms and threats asso-
ciated with these invasive species, emphasizing our Hawaiian ecosystems. 

I have four points that I would like to make today. First, our islands’ coastal eco-
systems  are  unparalleled  assemblages  of  native  species  of  fish,  invertebrates  and 
marine plants that have evolved for several million years, in relative isolation from 
the U.S. mainland, or any other significant land mass. About 25 percent of our ma-
rine  biota  is  unique  to  the  Hawaiian  Islands.  Consequently,  in  a  pristine  setting, 
our ecosystems are species-rich communities, and highly productive. Our geographic 
isolation brought us one other novelty—the ability to detect when a new species has 
arrived, with relative ease. Since about 1950, these kinds of observations have lead 
to  a  new  awareness  in  a  tropical  setting.  Our  native  marine  flora  and  fauna  are 
under constant pressure from the rising tide of introductions and species extinctions 
arising from human activities. This situation will ultimately homogenize the tropical 
Pacific marine biota unless something is done, now. 

My  second  point  is  borrowed  from  colleague  Dr.  Lucius  Eldredge  (Bishop  Mu-
seum),  and  his  collaborators.  Through  their  efforts,  we  have  learned  that  hundreds 
of invertebrate species have been introduced to the Hawaiian Islands. Worse, is the 
report that over three-quarters of those species introduced by ballast water (over 15 
species), hull-fouling (over 200 species), or solid ballast (over 20 species), have estab-
lished in Hawaiian waters, especially harbors. 

In  the  marine  plant  arena,  we  have  fewer  numbers  of  introductions  associated 
with ballast or hull-fouling. Yet, as my third point, what marine plants lack in num-
bers, they make up for with stunning levels of biomass. At least two algal introduc-
tions quite clearly can be followed back to hull-fouling as the vector for introduction: 
Acanthophora  spicifera,  introduced  about  1950,  and  in  about  10  years  spread  to  all 
the  main  Hawaiian  Islands,  and  Dictyota  flabelliformis,  our  most  recent  arrival  on 
a dry dock from southern California. Acanthophora spicifera is now one of the most 
common  algae  in  the  Hawaiian  Islands.  Hypnea  musciformis,  another  introduction, 
probably  spread  via  hull-fouling  to  our  neighbor  islands.  Biomass  of  this  alga  accu-
mulates  at  a  rate  of  tens  of  tons  per  year  in  Kihei  Maui  and  has  been  tied  to  an 
estimated $20 million per year lost revenue for the county. 

Finally,  while  the  State  of  Hawaii  does  have  occasional  ciguatera  outbreaks,  we 
have  been  spared  large  scale  outbreaks  of  redtides,  brown  tides,  and  other 
phytoplankton  blooms  that  have  dire  consequences  to  coastal  food  chains  and  hu-
mans.  Ballast  water  is  a  known  vector  for  introduction  of  toxic  phytoplankton  to 
areas  in  the  world  where  toxic  species  did  not  occur.  For  my  fourth  point,  I  urge 
this Committee to put in force the strongest possible regulations to protect our state 
from these toxic species. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to comment on the introduction of non-native 

species through the discharge of ballast water and hull-fouling from ships. 
Regarding the Current Threats to Coral Ecosystems in Hawaii 

Greetings, Chairman Stevens, Co-Chair Inouye, and distinguished members of the 
National Ocean Policy Study Subcommittee of the Commerce Committee. This is the 
testimony  for  Dr.  Celia  M.  Smith,  Professor  of  Botany  at  the  University  of  Hawaii. 
With  this  testimony,  I’d  like  to  argue  the  significance  of  threats  to  coral  reefs  and 
coral  reef  ecosystems  in  the  Hawaiian  archipelago.  Thank  you  for  this  opportunity. 
I have three points that I would like to make today. First, as in my earlier testi-
mony, our islands’ coastal ecosystems are unparalleled assemblages of native species 
of fish, invertebrates, and marine plants that have evolved for several million years, 
in  relative  isolation  from  the  U.S.  mainland  or  any  other  significant  land  mass. 
About  25  percent  of  our  marine  biota  is  unique  to  the  Hawaiian  Islands.  Con-
sequently,  in  a  pristine  setting,  our  ecosystems  are  species-rich  communities,  and 
highly  productive.  Our  geographic  isolation  brought  us  one  other  novelty—the  abil-
ity  to  detect  when  a  new  species  has  arrived,  with  relative  ease.  Since  about  1950, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

these kinds of observations have lead to a new awareness in a tropical setting. Our 
native  marine  flora  and  fauna  are  under  constant  pressure  from  the  rising  tide  of 
introductions  and  species  extinctions  arising  from  human  activities.  Perhaps,  sur-
prisingly though, known hull-foulers have jumped from harbors to reef regions, and 
become  ecological  dominants.  These  two  issues,  healthy  reefs  and  alien  species  in-
troductions by whatever vector, are linked in a number of ways. 

My  second  point  goes  to  the  impacts  of  these  alien  species  introductions  to  coral 
reefs.  Intentional  introductions  have  shifted  the  fundamental  competitive  advan-
tages  that  keep  a  coral  ecosystem  poised  with  coral  dominance.  Weedy  cultivars  of 
marine  crop  plants  can  quickly  overgrow  patch  reefs  once  dominated  by  coral, 
produce four times the biomass of our most productive Hawaiian species. Reductions 
in  the  diversity  and  complexity  often  associated  with  coral  reefs  are  some  of  the 
early  costs  that  we’ve  already  observed.  Longer  term  costs  to  us  will  be  being  real-
ized as losses in fisheries, losses in aesthetic values as shorelines turn murky, losses 
in mechanical strength for our islands against hurricane wave forces. 

My  third  point  goes  to  underscore  the  complexity  of  coral  reef  ecosystems  and 
what we might lose. As Lewis and Clark searched the boundaries of our new coun-
try  adding  dozens  of  new  plant  species,  we  are  only  beginning  to  understand  the 
boundaries of a reef ecosystem. In any given day through our deep diving fieldwork, 
we add new plant species to the Hawaiian flora. Are there connections among popu-
lations  of  organisms?  How  might  interactions  among  groups  of  species  change  over 
short  and  long-term  natural  disturbances?  This  is  the  stuff  of  active  research.  The 
scientists working to answer to these questions are pressed by the threats posed by 
vessel  groundings,  overharvesting  and  coastal  run  off—short  and  long-term  human 
disturbances  that  could  change  reef  ecosystems  profoundly  and  in  such  a  way  that 
the reefs might not recover. 

I  urge  this  committee  to  put  in  force  the  strongest  possible  protections  for  these 
vulnerable  and  valuable  ecosystems.  Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  com-
ment on these important issues. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE AMERICAN WATERWAYS OPERATORS (AWO) 

The  American  Waterways  Operators  (AWO)  is  the  national  trade  association  of 
the U.S. tugboat, towboat, and barge industry. It comprises more than 400 member 
companies  that  operate  throughout  the  inland  and  coastal  waters  of  the  United 
States. The barge and towing vessel fleet, the largest single segment of the U.S. do-
mestic vessel fleet, consists of nearly 4,000 tugboats and towboats, and over 27,000 
barges of all types. These vessels transit 25,000 miles of inland and intracoastal wa-
terways, the Great Lakes, and the Atlantic, Pacific, and Gulf coasts. AWO members 
have a long record of safety leadership and environmental stewardship, as evidenced 
by the AWO Responsible Carrier Program, a third-party-audited safety management 
system  with  which  all  AWO  members  must  comply  as  a  condition  of  association 
membership, and the first-of-its-kind Coast Guard-AWO Safety Partnership. 

AWO appreciates the opportunity to submit these comments for the record. AWO 
is  an  active  member  of  the  Shipping  Industry  Ballast  Water  Coalition  (Coalition) 
and strongly supports the statement provided by Ms. Kathy Metcalf at the June 15, 
2005  hearing  on  behalf  of  the  Coalition.  As  a  member  of  the  Coalition,  AWO  sup-
ports  a  comprehensive,  national  strategy  for  ballast  water  management.  AWO  sup-
ports  S.  363  with  several  changes  to  strengthen  the  bill’s  provisions  on  Federal  pre-
emption, Federal exclusivity, and a safety exemption from ballast water exchange re-
quirements for barge and towing vessel operations. 
Tug and Barge Industry Ballast Water Practices 

As  operators  of  small  vessels,  unmanned  barges,  and  vessels  that  are  most  fre-
quently  employed  in  domestic  service,  the  barge  and  towing  industry  has  a  unique 
set of concerns related to ballast water management. Historically, international and 
national  ballast  water  requirements  have  been  designed  for  sea-going  ships  and 
crewed  vessels,  not  unmanned  barges.  Barges  have  typically  not  been  the  focus  of 
ballast water legislation or regulations since most are not manned vessels and were 
not  designed  nor  intended  to  exchange  ballast  at  sea.  However,  barges  and  towing 
vessels  do  engage  in  ballasting  operations,  and  in  many  cases  these  operations  are 
essential  for  safe  operations.  In  order  to  avoid  grafting  ill-fitting  legislative  man-
dates onto small vessels, unmanned barges, and vessels in domestic service, it is im-
portant  to  understand  typical  ballasting  practices  in  the  barge  and  towing  industry 
and  ensure  that  legislation  is  drafted  with  the  operations  and  limitations  of  barges 
and towing vessels in mind. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

While  ballast  water  practices  in  the  barge  and  towing  industry  are  diverse,  it  is 
common to take on or discharge ballast in the harbor to adjust the trim of the vessel 
based  on  specific  characteristics  of  the  cargo  and  how  it  is  stowed  or  loaded  onto 
the  barge.  In  some  operations,  it  is  necessary  to  ballast  and  deballast  at  the  dock 
to keep the barge at the proper freeboard (height above the water) compared to the 
level of the dock. In Hawaii and Alaska, for example, cargo on deck barges is loaded 
and unloaded using ramps between the dock and the deck of the barge. If the barge 
rides  too  high  or  too  low  in  the  water,  the  angle  of  the  ramp  can  be  too  steep  to 
transfer  cargo  safely.  Because  of  tide  changes  and  because  the  docks  at  different 
ports  are  at  different  heights,  a  barge  that  has  the  proper  freeboard  for  loading  in 
one  port  is  often  at  the  wrong  freeboard  for  unloading  in  the  second  port.  In  order 
to  properly  adjust  the  freeboard  to  discharge  cargo  safely,  it  may  be  necessary  to 
discharge ballast water at the dock. 

Ballast water is also used to adjust the trim of a vessel (either a barge or a towing 
vessel) based on the cargo carried and the requirements of a particular voyage. Tug-
boats and towboats make adjustments to their ballast water while underway to com-
pensate for fuel burn-off. These highly technical and voyage-specific adjustments are 
made throughout the waterway system at the discretion of the vessel master to en-
sure that the vessel operates safely within its design parameters. 
Safety Considerations 

Conducting  underway  ballast  water  exchange  on  barges,  as  would  be  required 
under  S.  363,  poses  serious  safety  concerns  for  crewmembers  operating  tugs  and 
barges. Most barges are unmanned, and ballasting at sea would require bringing the 
tug  alongside  a  towed  barge  and  getting  a  crewmember  onboard  the  barge  to  oper-
ate  the  pumps.  Waters  are  rarely  calm  enough  to  allow  the  tug  and  barge  to  stay 
safely  alongside  each  other,  and  even  in  calm  waters,  this  operation  could  pose  a 
potentially  serious  safety  risk.  A  second  option  would  be  to  send  a  crew  member  to 
the  barge  in  a  small  boat.  The  crew  member  would  then  have  to  climb  the  sheer 
wall  of  the  barge  at  sea  and  operate  pumps  from  the  rolling  deck  of  the  barge.  In 
either  scenario,  getting  a  crewmember  on  and  off  the  barge  is  inherently  risky  and 
is  considered  by  most  in  the  barge  and  towing  industry  to  be  a  dangerous,  life- 
threatening operation. 

The Coast Guard, the states, and the shipping industry have all recognized the sig-
nificant  risks  involved  in  conducting  ballast  water  exchange  on  barges.  In  the  pre-
amble to its final rule implementing the National Invasive Species Act of 1996, the 
Coast  Guard  noted,  ‘‘For  example,  in  many  situations,  it  may  be  inherently  unsafe 
to  conduct  an  exchange  of  ballast  by  an  unmanned  barge.’’  (Vol.  66,  Number  225, 
Federal  Register  Nov.  21,  2001.)  The  States  of  Washington  and  Oregon  have  also 
recognized these risks by limiting the scope of state ballast water regulations to self- 
propelled vessels. In the interest of safety, the Shipping Industry Ballast Water Co-
alition has reached the same conclusion and determined that ballast water exchange 
involving unmanned barges is inherently unsafe. 

Safety  concerns  associated  with  ballast  water  exchange  extend  even  to  the  most 
modern  generation  of  tug-barge  units.  Articulated  tug-barge  units  (ATBs)  have  dif-
ferent,  but  significant,  difficulties  with  conducting  ballast  water  exchange  because 
of the way they are configured. An ATB consists of a tug and barge joined together 
as  a  unit.  An  ATB  is  connected  in  a  notch  by  pins  and  the  tug  and  barge  must 
maintain  the  same  draft  in  order  to  stay  locked  into  position.  It  is  impossible  to 
make  adjustments  to  how  the  tug  and  barge  are  connected  while  the  vessel  is  un-
derway.  As  a  result,  accepted  industry  practice  is  generally  not  to  conduct  ballast 
water  exchange  on  ATBs.  (AWO  is  aware  of  one  member  company  that  has  made 
significant  physical  modifications  to  its  four  ATBs  to  be  able  to  conduct  ballast 
water  exchange  while  underway.  However,  this  company  continues  to  research  op-
tions  for  treating  ballast  water  on  the  ATBs  because  it  has  serious  concerns  with 
putting crews onboard barges at sea, and concerns about vessel stress when remov-
ing ballast water from a barge on the open ocean.) 
AWO Recommendations for S. 363 

AWO supports the recommendations of the Shipping Industry Ballast Water Coali-
tion  to  amend  and  improve  S.  363.  Consistent  application  of  Federal  requirements 
for  ballast  water  operations  is  essential  to  the  efficient  operation  of  tugboats, 
towboats,  and  barges.  Patchwork  regulatory  requirements  applied  on  a  state-by- 
state  or  waterway-by-waterway  basis  are  onerous  and  hinder  commerce.  Moreover, 
towing  vessels  and  barges  operate  24  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week,  throughout  U.S. 
waters  and  cannot  operate  efficiently  if  regulated  by  a  mechanism  other  than  a 
strong,  uniform  Federal  program.  AWO  strongly  supports  the  Coalition’s  rec-
ommendation that Federal legislation should preempt state regulation of the manage-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

ment  and  control  of  ballast  water  discharges  in  the  U.S.  AWO  also  urges  Congress 
to specify that enacted ballast water legislation is to be the exclusive Federal program 
that regulates ballast water management and discharges in U.S. waters. 

Safe operation of barges and towing vessels necessitates ballast water uptake and 
discharge.  The  prescriptive  ballast  water  exchange  provisions  in  S.  363  that  do  not 
differentiate between the minimal risks of ballast water exchange on an ocean-going 
ship versus the significant risks on an unmanned, non-self propelled barge are prob-
lematic  for  the  barge  and  towing  industry.  S.  363  should  include  an  express  provi-
sion that exempts barges and towing vessels from the ballast water exchange require-
ments.  As  described  in  the  Coalition’s  statement,  while  the  existing  safety  exemp-
tion  in  the  legislation  would  arguably  cover  barge  and  towing  vessel  operations,  it 
would  be  more  appropriate  for  Congress  to  expressly  state  its  intent  regarding  this 
known hazardous operation, rather than subject barge and towing operators to addi-
tional scrutiny if they invoke the safety exemption. Moreover, the requirements that 
ballast  water  exchange  be  conducted  at  minimum  distances  from  land  and  in  min-
imum depths of water as prescribed in S. 363, would preclude most barges and tow-
ing  vessels  from  conducting  exchange,  even  if  it  were  safe  to  do  so,  because  most 
vessels rarely transit outside the Exclusive Economic Zone (EEZ). 

AWO  members,  because  of  their  deep  commitment  to  marine  safety  and  environ-
mental  protection,  are  currently  exploring  ballast  water  treatment  options  other 
than ballast water exchange which could serve as safer alternatives to ballast water 
exchange  in  the  future.  At  present,  there  are  no  acceptable  means  of  ballast  water 
exchange  nor  any  safe  and  effective  alternative  ballast  water  treatment  technologies 
viable for tug and barge application; however, the establishment of a national ballast 
water treatment standard should serve to accelerate this process. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  our  views  for  the  record.  We  would  be 

pleased to provide any additional information the Subcommittee may require. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL L. HAM, SECRETARIAT, UNITED STATES ALL 

ISLANDS CORAL REEF INITIATIVE COORDINATING COMMITTEE (USAICRICC) 

The  United  States  All  Islands  Coral  Reef  Initiative  Coordinating  Committee 
(USAICRICC) extends our appreciation for this opportunity to present comments to 
the  U.S.  Senate  Commerce  Committee,  on  the  reauthorization  of  the  Coral  Reef 
Conservation Act of 2000 (CRCA). 

The  passage  of  the  CRCA  in  2000,  began  the  process  for  seriously  undertaking 
the  protection  and  conservation  of  the  Nation’s  coral  reefs  and  their  resources.  The 
process for protection and management of coral reefs, which began with Presidential 
Executive  Order  13089  in  1998,  created  not  only  the  U.S.  Coral  Reef  Task  Force, 
but a unique and far reaching partnership between the Federal and the State/terri-
torial/commonwealth governments. This partnership has become the model for envi-
ronmental management. The CRCA supported and expanded on that effort by defin-
ing  the  focused  efforts  of  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration 
(NOAA), and provided the funding mechanism for undertaking the difficult and un-
precedented work of environmental management of these most fragile ecosystems in 
America’s tropical waters. 

The  reauthorization  process  allows  us  to  not  only  provide  for  the  continuation  of 
these efforts, but to build on them and to make the Act more responsive to manage-
ment  needs.  The  following  comments  are  intended  to  support  that  end.  These  are 
presented  as  a  consensus  report  of  the  USAICRICC,  but  do  not  preclude  some  dif-
ferences  of  views  between  the  island  jurisdictions  of  the  United  States.  The 
USAICRICC  is  composed  of  the  designated  Points-of-Contact  for  the  Governors  of 
Hawaii,  Guam,  Puerto  Rico,  American  Samoa,  U.S.  Virgin  Islands,  and  Common-
wealth  of  the  Northern  Mariana  Islands,  but  these  remarks  are  not  intended  to  be 
interpreted as the official comments of those Governors. 

The  coral  reefs  of  the  United  States  provide  many  billions  of  dollars  of  the  Gross 
National Product. Through the Nation’s fisheries, recreation, tourism, shoreline pro-
tection,  medicinal,  and  pharmaceutical  industries,  the  reefs  provide  for  jobs,  prod-
ucts, diet, and health. They help provide for America’s economic, environmental, and 
political security. While most of the Nation never experiences coral reefs first hand, 
all  Americans  are  reliant  on  them  and  benefit  from  their  protection  and  conserva-
tion. 
Specifics on the Draft Bill 

Section  2.  While  we  certainly  agree  with  the  suggested  division  of  resources  in 
this  section,  the  truth  is  that  the  jurisdictions  which  contain  more  than  80  percent 
of the Nation’s coral reefs directly receive no more than 15 percent of the total mon-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

ies  available  under  the  CRCA.  The  Federal  activities  and  structure  that  exists  is, 
generally necessary, and we agree that many of the projects undertaken at the Fed-
eral  partnership  level  do  help  the  jurisdictions.  However,  an  increase  in  the  funds 
available  to  the  jurisdictions  with  the  responsibilities  for  coral  reef  management, 
protection  and  conservation  is  essential  if  we  are  going  to  achieve  the  goals  of  the 
CRCA. Additionally, it is important that funding become programmatic in structure 
within  NOAA,  in  order  to  better  ensure  more  predictable  and  dependable  funding. 
The following language, below, is offered as descriptive of these comments. 

Funding  to  support  wise  management  of  coral  reef  needs  to  be  structured  to 
provide significant support federally at the local level recognizing that 82+ per-
cent of the coral reefs are in local (state, territorial and commonwealth) waters. 
35  percent  of  all  Federal  funds  allocated  to  coral  reefs  shall  be  distributed  to 
island jurisdictions (American Samoa, Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana 
Islands,  Guam,  Hawaii,  Puerto  Rico,  and  United  States  Virgin  Islands.  Out  of 
the  35  percent,  the  Federal  Government  shall  receive  5  percent  (35–5  percent) 
to  administer  the  distribution  of  funds.  Administering  funds  shall  be  accom-
plished through the adoption of Federal eligibility requirements. These require-
ments shall be limited to the following: annual fiscal reporting, annual progress 
reports.  Funds  shall  be  active  up  to  3  years.  Eligibility  requirements  will  also 
define allowable activities and maximize the local authority to define and imple-
ment programs to effectively manage and sustain coral reefs. Activities may in-
clude  but  are  not  limited  to:  development  and  implementation  of  management 
actions,  research,  staffing,  training,  communication,  operational  support,  en-
forcement, and education. These parameters may be revised or updated to make 
the  process  more  effective  with  the  intentions  of  minimizing  administrative 
oversight and maximizing the funding used toward implementation. 

The  approach  utilized  by  the  United  States  Fish  and  Wildlife  Service  (USFWS) 
in  administering  the  Sport  Fish  and  Wildlife  Restoration  Funds,  should  be  used  as 
a model for establishing eligibility requirements and allowing local jurisdictions the 
maximum flexibility in developing programs. 
Section 206. Emergency Assistance 

The All Islands Committee supports this new language. Experience has shown us 
that,  not  only  can  communities  recover  more  quickly  and  more  fully,  but  resource 
damage  can  be  reduced  significantly  with  immediate  attention  to  environmental 
damage following disasters. The mechanism to provide that immediate attention did 
not exist in the disaster recovery process prior to this year, when the Federal Emer-
gency  Management  Agency  (FEMA)  was  given  the  authority  and  responsibility  for 
such  through  Emergency  Support  Function  11  of  the  National  Response  Plan,  but 
the first opportunity to invoke that authority following Hurricane Olaf in American 
Samoa,  they  failed  to  respond  and  unnecessary  damage  to  the  coral  reef  resources 
resulted.  As  provided  for  in  the  National  Response  Plan,  Federal  action  to  support 
natural  resource  recovery  in  all  fifty  states,  the  territories,  and  commonwealths 
would  have  been  possible.  FEMA’s  stated  reasons  for  not  activating  that  responsi-
bility,  (no  funds  to  do  so,  they  saw  no  connection  between  environmental  damage 
and public health, and possible conflicts with the Stafford Act), indicate that FEMA 
would be unlikely to provide for natural resources recovery help to any U.S. jurisdic-
tion after natural disasters, given that two of those reasons would exist after nearly 
every  natural  disaster.  The  language  supplied  in  this  section  and  in  Section  208(4) 
should go far in resolving this problem in regard to coral reef response, but will not 
address  the  problems  other  states  will  face  following  natural  disasters  and  their 
need  to  recover  their  natural  resources  in  order  to  fully  and  quickly  recover  their 
communities. 

There  are  two  issues  which  should  be  included  in  this  section  to  ensure  the  re-
sponse being described is accomplished. First, it is important that NOAA not be the 
only  agency  involved  in  this  response.  We  would  suggest  that  line  24  be  amended 
to  read;  ‘‘The  Secretary  may  [insert  ‘‘shall’’],  undertake  or  authorize  [insert  ‘‘in  part-
nership with the all Federal agencies with responsibilities for disaster relief’’] all nec-
essary. . . .’’ Second, it should include language that would ensure that either reim-
bursement  to  the  agencies  for  their  emergency  expenditures  under  this  section,  or 
provide a fund to be used for this purpose. 
Section 208 Report to Congress 

We  believe  that  the  reports  to  Congress,  as  identified  in  this  section,  will  serve 
a  multitude  of  purposes,  including  providing  information  which  can  help  improve 
management  of  the  coral  reef  resources  at  both  the  Federal  and  local  levels,  and 
better  delivery  of  the  funds  and  support  required  for  undertaking  the  responsibil-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

ities  of  the  Act.  We  would,  however,  caution  that  reporting  requirements  all  too 
often consume personnel time and effort. We would request that, at a minimum, the 
reports dealing with ‘‘health of the reefs’’ be required no more often than once every 
3 years. 

In  short,  we  strongly  support  the  approach  being  taken  in  the  draft  bill  and  be-
lieve  that  the  draft  bill  holds  the  potential  for  greatly  improving  our  ability  to  pro-
vide  for  the  conservation  of  our  fragile  and  important  coral  reef  resources.  We  are 
hopeful  that  new  allocations  identified  in  the  draft  bill  can  resolve  the  current  in-
equities  in  fund  allocations.  While  we  do  not  suggest  reducing  the  Federal  effort, 
any new monies allocated should, first and foremost, be directed to the jurisdictions, 
where  the  day-to-day  responsibility  for  coral  reef  protection  and  conservation  re-
sides. 

We  should  state  that  we  look  forward  to  continuing  to  work  with  the  Senate  on 
this issue as it moves forward, and in developing the mechanisms and possibly other 
legislation that will provide support to the managers who are designated as the re-
sponsible  parties  for  coral  reef  conservation.  We  have,  over  the  past  decade,  devel-
oped  a  process  for  management  in  coordination  with  science  for  these  issues,  a 
unique  and  successful  Federal-state/territory/commonwealth  partnership  for  action, 
and local action strategies supported by a wide and divergent range of stakeholders 
through  an  inclusion  process  of  community  participation  in  the  process,  and  we  be-
lieve that the resources are being served well through this approach. 
Conclusion 

In  closing,  I  want  to  repeat  that  the  efforts  in  coral  reef  management,  protection 
and conservation, and the development of successful partnerships between the state/ 
territorial/commonwealth  and  Federal  governments  and  the  partnerships  between 
management,  science,  and  non-governmental  stakeholders,  which  began  with  the 
U.S. Coral Reef Initiative in 1994, have been more than simply successful up to this 
point.  It  was  far  too  long  before  we,  as  a  Nation  began  understanding  the  impor-
tance  of,  and  expressing  our  appreciation  for  our  Nation’s  coral  reef  resources,  but 
in  the  decade  just  passed,  we  have  made  great  strides  and  the  CRCA  has  been  an 
extremely  important  element  in  that  success.  We  have  a  long  way  to  go  yet,  and 
the CRCA has an important role to play in continuing to move forward. We reiterate 
our  request  that  30  percent  of  the  total  funds  authorized  through  the  CRCA  be 
given directly to the state/territory and commonwealth jurisdictions for implementa-
tion  of  projects  and  programs  that  will  directly  impact  management  and  protection 
of coral reefs and coral reef resources. 

We  appreciate  the  efforts  of  this  committee  and  its  staff  in  developing  this  draft 
bill,  and  once  again  thank  the  Committee  for  providing  us  the  opportunity  to  com-
ment. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

TIMOTHY R.E. KEENEY 

Coral Mapping and Assessment B Progress and Needs 

Question 1. The interagency Coral Reef Task Force identified mapping and assess-
ment as one of the critical needs in coral reef protection, particularly in the Pacific. 
In addition, the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy recommended increased research 
and characterization of coral reefs. Why is mapping and assessment of corals so cru-
cial? 

Answer. Assessment and monitoring through a continued program of surveys, sys-
tematically  undertaken  to  provide  a  series  of  observations  over  time,  is  the  key  to 
understanding  and  reducing  threats  to  coral  reef  ecosystems.  Monitoring  can  also 
be  used  to  evaluate  the  effectiveness  of  specific  management  strategies,  evaluate 
restoration  projects,  and  serve  as  an  early  warning  system  for  identifying  declines 
in  ecosystem  health.  A  combination  of  direct  observations  (e.g.  diver  observations), 
automated sensors (e.g. in situ monitoring buoys), and remote sensing (e.g. satellite 
imagery) provides a suite of environmental indices to inform resource managers and 
policymakers. 

Mapping is crucial for several reasons, including: 

1. Understanding the spatial distribution and assessing the health of coral reef 
ecosystems  helps  managers  better  monitor  changes  in  coral  over  time,  and  im-
proves  understanding  of  coral  reef  ecosystems.  This  understanding  allows  the 
development of informed strategies for more effective conservation efforts. 
2. Maps provide a spatial context for understanding larger-scale ecological proc-
esses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

3. Understanding the spatial distribution of coral reef habitats allows scientists 
to focus studies on particular habitat types and structure research to better un-
derstand functional relationships between habitat types. 
4.  Maps  of  coral  reef  ecosystems  help  differentiate  sensitive  areas  from  areas 
that  are  more  appropriate  for  human  activity.  For  example,  anchoring  of  large 
ships  in  a  sand  patch  is  far  less  destructive  than  anchoring  on  a  reef  or  in  a 
seagrass bed. 
5. For monitoring purposes, coral reef ecosystem maps help scientists track the 
movement  of  fish  and  invertebrate  species  between  habitats  and  determine 
where species are likely to be found at different life stages. This process is also 
helpful in determining the extent of essential fish habitat (EFH) identifications 
and  descriptions  for  species  managed  under  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery 
Conservation and Management Act. 

Question  1a.  How  much  progress  have  we  made  since  we  passed  the  Coral  Reef 

Conservation Act in 2000? What do we know now that we did not know then? 

Answer. By the end of Fiscal Year 2005 NOAA will have completed planned syn-
optic habitat maps for shallow-water coral reefs in the Main and Northwestern Ha-
waiian  Islands,  American  Samoa,  Guam,  the  Commonwealth  of  the  Northern  Mar-
iana  Islands,  Puerto  Rico,  and  the  U.S.  Virgin  Islands.  This  area  includes  approxi-
mately  37  percent  of  U.S.  near-shore  waters  that  contain  shallow  coral  reefs. 
NOAA’s mapping and assessment efforts have greatly increased estimates of the po-
tential  coral  reef  ecosystems  in  Florida.  Currently,  digital  shallow  water  benthic 
habitat  maps  have  been  published  and  distributed  for  over  10,500  km2 of  shallow 
water  coral  reef  habitat.  Coastal  managers,  scientists,  and  educational  groups  are 
using these maps. NOAA’s mapping and characterization activities in deeper waters 
have revealed tropical reefs at greater depths than previously known, and have im-
proved our understanding of the contribution of these habitats to fisheries. 

Our knowledge of coral reefs has increased significantly since the Coral Reef Con-
servation Act was passed in 2000. The U.S. coral reef jurisdictions monitor environ-
mental conditions associated with their coral reefs, including water quality, benthic 
habitats, and associated biological communities. The coral reef jurisdictions have fo-
cused  their  monitoring  efforts  on  these  parameters  because  they:  (1)  are  well-docu-
mented as indicators of specific stressors; (2) are likely to be of concern if measure-
ments change markedly over time; (3) can be used to define a desired biological con-
dition; and (4) may contribute to the development of an index of biotic integrity. As 
a result of these monitoring efforts, managers have obtained a better understanding 
of the threats to their coral reefs; which threats are of most concern or are increas-
ing in concern within each jurisdiction; and the effect(s) each threat is having. 

We have also gained a better understanding of patterns of coral bleaching, the na-
ture  of  coral  diseases,  and  pathways  of  disease  transmission.  NOAA  has  collabo-
rated  with  numerous  Federal,  state,  academic,  and  non-governmental  agencies  to 
create  partnerships  for  coral  reef  conservation.  We  have  determined  where  gaps  in 
information exist and have created a well-established forum of experts. In addition, 
outreach  and  education  efforts  for  coral  reefs  have  increased  and  are  better  coordi-
nated. 

Question  1b.  How  much  do  you  estimate  completing  mapping,  monitoring,  and 

characterization would cost? 

Answer.  The  costs  of  mapping,  monitoring,  and  characterization  depend  on  the 
water depth and desired resolution of mapping, as well as the frequency and spatial 
coverage of monitoring efforts. 

• Mapping:  High-resolution  satellite  imagery  (e.g.,  IKONOS  satellite)  provides 
cost-effective  and  robust  data  with  spectral  and  spatial  resolution  suitable  for 
shallow water (less than 40 meters in depth) benthic mapping. Estimated costs 
to  produce  maps  are  $285/km 2.  It  is  estimated  that  mapping  the  13,000  km 2 
of  priority  shallow  water  areas  in  Florida,  the  last  of  the  seven  U.S.  coral  reef 
jurisdictions to be mapped, will cost $4.4 million. 
Mapping  coral  habitats  in  deeper  water  requires  different  technologies,  pri-
marily  shipboard  multibeam  sonar.  Cost  estimates  for  gathering  and  initial 
shipboard  processing  of  multibeam  and  backscatter  data  are  about  $1,500  per 
km 2 in  depths  between  18–183  meters.  In  contrast  to  our  work  in  shallow 
water, comparatively few of the deeper water tropical coral reefs and associated 
habitats have been mapped in U.S. waters. To date, NOAA has taken a targeted 
approach of mapping only the highest priority deeper water areas. 
• Monitoring and Assessment: NOAA currently expends more than $5 million an-
nually  on  monitoring  coral  reef  ecosystems  in  the  United  States.  This  amount 
complements  important  monitoring  activities  conducted  by  the  states,  terri-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

tories,  and  other  Federal  agencies  (principally  the  Environmental  Protection 
Agency  (EPA)  and  the  Department  of  the  Interior  (DOI)),  and  does  not  include 
fine-scale monitoring that may be conducted in association with specific projects 
or research programs. NOAA’s current goal is to ensure reasonable annual mon-
itoring  coverage  in  priority  high-use  areas  (e.g.,  inside  and  outside  marine  pro-
tected  areas  or  near  major  tourism  and  development  areas)  and  biennial  moni-
toring  of  more  remote  areas.  NOAA  is  also  providing  global  monitoring  of  sea 
surface temperatures and associated coral bleaching alerts. 
• Characterization:  A  cost  estimate  for  characterization  is  not  readily  available. 
Many of the reefs are in remote locations, which greatly increases the cost asso-
ciated  with  conducting  a  baseline  characterization  of  all  U.S.  coral  reefs.  Some 
characterization is included in the mapping cost. 

Question 1c. Is NOAA planning to leverage funds by working with other agencies 

and outside entities? 

Answer. Yes, NOAA plans to continue to leverage funds, and various in-kind con-
tributions,  by  working  with  other  agencies  and  outside  entities.  The  NOAA  Coral 
Ecosystem Mapping Team has worked collaboratively with other Federal, state, and 
territorial government agencies in Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands, and Hawaii 
for many years. The NOAA Coral Ecosystem Mapping Team will continue to identify 
opportunities  to  leverage  investments  made  by  other  Federal  and  state  agencies, 
universities, and other entities to complete the NOAA mapping effort. 

The following examples highlight recent collaborations: 
• The NOAA Coral Ecosystem Mapping Team is working with the Florida Depart-
ment  of  Environmental  Protection  to  identify  matching  funds  to  support  map-
ping  southern  Florida  coral  ecosystems,  as  part  of  their  recently  completed 
Local Action Strategies report. 
• The  NOAA  Coral  Ecosystem  Mapping  Team  is  working  with  the  Florida  Fish 
and  Wildlife  Conservation  Commission  to  identify  hard  bottom  and  seagrass 
characterization  efforts  that  will  require  imagery  collection  and  can  be  used  to 
support southern Florida coral ecosystem mapping efforts. 
• The  NOAA  Coral  Ecosystem  Mapping  Team  working  with  the  U.S.  Geological 
Survey  (USGS)  to  evaluate  imagery  collected  by  the  USGS  Digital  Orthophoto 
map development program, to assess the usefulness of their images for mapping 
coral ecosystems in southern Florida. 
• The NOAA Coral Ecosystem Mapping Team is coordinating with USGS on their 
shallow-water  LIDAR  data  collection  efforts  in  the  Florida  Keys  and  Dry 
Tortugas for characterizing coral ecosystems and evaluating hurricane impacts. 
• The current monitoring and observing activities of NOAA (collectively the Coral 
Reef  Ecosystem  Integrated  Observing  System  (CREIOS))  rely  on  partnerships 
with Federal agencies; state, territorial, and local governments; and nongovern-
mental  organizations  to  continually  implement  a  wide  range  of  monitoring  ac-
tivities. Our partners provide in-kind contributions of time and expertise for the 
sighting, installation, and maintenance of automatic observing systems such as 
the  Coral  Reef  Early  Warning  System  (CREWS)  towers/buoys  in  the  Atlantic/ 
Caribbean and in the Pacific. 
• NOAA,  the  National  Park  Service,  and  the  U.S.  Fish  and  Wildlife  Service 
(USFWS)  regularly  collaborate  and  leverage  resources  to  monitor  National 
Parks  and  Refuges  that  contain  many  of  the  Nation’s  most  pristine  coral  reefs. 
USFWS  personnel  regularly  provide  staff  and  expertise  on  NOAA  research,  as-
sessment  and  monitoring  cruises,  to  the  Northwestern  Hawaiian  Islands  and 
other remote island areas. In addition, USFWS personnel often assist with com-
piling  the  data  obtained  by  the  cruises.  The  first  coral  reef  assessments  of 
Navassa Island have been made possible through cost-sharing between USFWS 
and NOAA. 

Removing and Responding to Vessel Groundings on Coral Reefs 

Question  2.  You  were  very  involved  a  few  years  ago  in  obtaining  Federal  assist-
ance to remove 9 abandoned vessels from Pago Pago harbor, which had been driven 
onto  the  reef,  and  were  responsible  for  both  polluting  the  waters  and  crushing  the 
coral  resources.  It  was  extremely  hard  to  find  a  responsible  program  or  funding 
needed  to  address  the  problem,  but  through  persistence,  you  were  able  to  leverage 
the  help  of  both  NOAA  and  the  Coast  Guard.  Could  you  describe  the  scope  of  the 
problem today, including the various threats they pose? 

Answer. Abandoned and derelict vessels are a significant problem in coastal bays, 
harbors,  and  estuaries.  The  cause  of  abandonment  varies  regionally.  In  certain 
areas, such as South Florida, storm damaged vessels are a major cause of abandon-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

ment.  In  the  Gulf  Coast,  abandoned  barges  and  oil  field  vessels  are  a  problem. 
Abandoned vessels are a hazard to navigation and pose additional threats, including 
pollution  threats  from  fuels,  paints  and  batteries,  as  well  as  entrapment  hazards 
from the vessel or fishing gear aboard. In some cases, the site of an abandoned ves-
sel  can  become  an  area  where  illegal  dumping  of  oils  and  household/industrial  de-
bris occurs. Additional negative impacts associated with abandoned vessels includes 
economic  losses  or  aesthetic  impairment  at  harbors  and  marinas  where  vessels  are 
abandoned;  and  physical  damage  to  coral  reefs  associated  with  vessels  that  are  not 
removed, begin to break apart, and/or release their cargo. 

Question 2a. How many vessels are abandoned, with no owner to respond? 
Answer. Thousands of vessels have been abandoned in U.S. waters. Based on sur-
veys  conducted  in  five  of  the  seven  U.S.  coral  reef  jurisdictions  (Guam,  American 
Samoa,  the  U.S.  Virgin  Islands,  Puerto  Rico,  and  the  Commonwealth  of  Northern 
Mariana Islands), over 200 of these vessels pose significant threats to coral reef eco-
systems. Most of these are smaller vessels (those less than 50 meters in length). 

In many cases, a derelict vessel equals a derelict owner. If the owner doesn’t have 
sufficient  funds  to  maintain  the  vessel,  it  is  unlikely  the  owner  would  have  the 
funds to properly dismantle and dispose of the vessel. In general, tracking down the 
owner  is  difficult.  A  vessel  may  be  sold  several  times  before  it  is  ultimately  aban-
doned, which makes it difficult to identify the responsible party. 

Question  2b.  Which  agencies  could  be  part  of  the  solution,  and  what  could  their 

roles be? 

lem? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  is  engaged  when  abandoned  vessels  present  a 
threat to navigation or could result in pollution. The Army Corps of Engineers could 
engage  when  vessels  are  abandoned  in  navigational  channels.  The  Environmental 
Protection  Agency  is  responsible  for  issuing  ocean  disposal  permits.  Additionally, 
any  Federal  or  state  property/land  manager  would  be  responsible  if  a  vessel  comes 
ashore  (for  example,  the  Department  of  the  Interior  if  the  vessel  comes  ashore  in 
a national seashore; NOAA if the vessel is within a national marine sanctuary). 

Question 2c. What existing authorities and funds are available, and what new au-

thorities would be needed? Are there any models we can turn to? 

Answer.  Clear  legal  authority  is  needed  to  remove  and  properly  dispose  of  aban-
doned  vessels.  Emergency  authority  is  required  to  remove  a  vessel  before  it  breaks 
apart,  while  it  is  less  expensive  to  remove,  and  while  it  may  still  have  some  value. 
Funding  sources  are  fragmented  and  depend  on  location,  type  of  vessel,  size,  and 
type  of  threat  (e.g.,  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  applies  only  when  the  vessel  has  oil  on-
board,  and  the  National  Marine  Sanctuaries  Act  applies  only  in  designated  sanc-
tuaries). Many state laws are also limited in scope (e.g. only applying up to a certain 
tonnage  or  to  certain  types  of  vessels).  Saipan  is  working  on  legislation  that  could 
be effective. 

Question  2d.  Could  a  public-private  funding  approach  help  to  address  this  prob-

Answer.  This  is  a  possibility;  the  State  of  Washington  has  a  potential  model. 
Washington  State  provides  funding  to  authorized  county  and  port  districts.  How-
ever,  the  state  only  pays  for  a  percentage  of  the  cost,  with  local  governments  cov-
ering the remaining cost. The state levies a $2 tax on each boat registered, in order 
to fund this program. 

Question 2e. Do you have an estimate of the cost of removal and response for the 

vessels we know about? 

Answer.  The  cost  of  removal  varies  widely  depending  on  logistics  and  size  of  the 
vessel. Costs vary anywhere from $10,000 to several million dollars for large vessels 
abandoned in remote locations. 
Preventing Vessel Impacts on Coral Reefs 

Question  3.  While  removal  is  a  huge  problem,  it  is  far  more  cost  effective  to  pre-
vent future damage. In the Florida Keys National Marine Sanctuary, NOAA worked 
in collaboration with the Coast Guard to install radar transponder beacons to steer 
passing ships away from ecologically sensitive coral reef areas. Apparently, the bea-
cons  were  purchased  by  the  owners  of  a  ship  that  went  aground  on  a  coral  reef  in 
the lower Keys as part of a damage assessment and restoration agreement. How ef-
fective are transponders in preventing ship collision and groundings on corals? 

Answer.  The  transponders  have  no  role  in  ship  collisions,  but  can  help  reduce 
coral  groundings.  Since  the  radar  beacons  (RACONs)  were  installed  in  the  Florida 
Keys  National  Marine  Sanctuary  (FKNMS),  there  have  been  no  large  ship 
groundings.  There  continue  to  be  smaller  vessel  groundings  (vessels  <50  m),  as 
small  vessels  often  do  not  have  the  technology  required  to  effectively  use  the  bea-
cons, and/or the operators do not know what they mean. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

These  RACONs  have  reduced  the  occurrence  of  groundings  on  coral  reefs  within 
the FKNMS. The RACONs provide unique all-weather radar beacon coverage of 360 
degrees  with  a  range  of  15–25  nautical  miles,  and  can  respond  to  several  hundred 
ships  within  their  individual  service  area.  The  combination  of  a  mandatory  ‘‘Area 
To  Be  Avoided’’  (ATBA),  enforcement  of  the  ATBA,  and  the  RACON  beacons  has 
meant no groundings of a vessel over 50 meters within the FKNMS since February 
1997. Prior to that time there was at least one major event per year. 

Question  3a.  Could  we  take  the  same  approach  for  coral  reefs  outside  National 

Marine Sanctuaries? What are the barriers we would face? 

Answer.  Because  different  regions  face  different  navigational  concerns,  an  anal-
ysis  of  grounding  events  would  have  to  be  done  in  order  to  determine  how  many 
events would be preventable in another region, using this type of system. 

The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  maintains  the  buoys  and  would  need  to  approve  the  loca-
tion  of  additional  buoys,  as  well  as  agree  to  add  these  new  buoys  to  their  mainte-
nance  schedule.  Funding  to  install  and  maintain  the  system  could  be  a  potential 
barrier. 

Question 3b. Are there any ‘‘hot spots’’ in the Pacific, and particularly the North-

western Hawaiian Islands, that could benefit from such transponders? 

Answer.  There  are  hot  spots  for  grounded  vessels  in  the  Pacific,  particularly  at 
the  major  port  areas  such  as  Saipan  and  Apra  Harbor  in  Guam.  Some  of  these  are 
due  to  storm  related  damage.  Apra  Harbor  has  a  lot  of  visiting  foreign  fishing  ves-
sels and improved channel markings might be a potential way to reduce groundings. 
The current investigation into the most recent grounding event in Pearl and Her-
mes  Atoll  may  answer  this  question.  At  this  time,  it  is  unclear  whether  improved 
aids to navigation would have helped prevent this recent grounding. 

Question  3c.  How  much  do  beacons  and  transponders  cost  to  install  and  operate? 
Answer.  According  to  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  each  unit  currently  costs  $36,435, 
and $1,000 per year per unit to maintain. Using the beacons in areas where naviga-
tional  platforms  do  not  already  exist  would  require  additional  cost  to  install  these 
platforms. 

Question  3d.  Do  you  believe  industry  and  non-governmental  organizations  could 
work  with  the  government  to  help  solve  this  problem,  either  through  donations  or 
through in-kind contributions? Are there any models we can look to? 

Answer. Without establishing liability or additional regulation, industry incentive 
to participate in a voluntary system or to make donations is not likely. Most compa-
nies  make  donations  as  a  form  of  marketing;  their  customers  learn  of  their  good 
deeds and increase their business with the company. However, shipping lines do not 
generally  have  the  public  as  their  customers.  Their  customers  are  corporations; 
therefore, they may not be as concerned about donation-type public relations efforts 
and would not have the incentive to voluntarily contribute. 

For  smaller  vessels,  NGO’s  representing  recreational  boaters  may  be  able  to  pro-
vide  incentive  for  these  boaters  to  avoid  vessel  impacts  to  coral  reefs.  There  is  also 
a potential role for NGO’s, or states, that have an interest in using abandoned ves-
sels as artificial reefs. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. BARBARA BOXER TO 

TIMOTHY R.E. KEENEY 

Question.  Your  testimony  emphasizes  the  successes  of  the  Federal  Ballast  Water 
Technology Demonstration Program. Why did the Administration request zero fund-
ing for this in the Fiscal Year 2006 budget? 

Answer. The President’s Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Request reflects the current fis-
cal  climate.  Because  of  the  large  number  of  competing  priorities,  not  all  programs 
can be funded. However, the Administration agrees that aquatic invasive species are 
a  complex  and  pressing  problem,  and  continues  to  include  funding  for  this  issue 
within  the  overall  budget  request.  The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  Budget  Re-
quests includes $7.9M to continue NOAA’s valuable work to prevent invasive species 
through  programs  such  as  the  Aquatic  Invasive  Species  Program,  Sea  Grant,  the 
Great Lakes Environmental Research Lab, and National Centers for Coastal Ocean 
Science.  Based  on  the  history  of  their  past  projects,  these  programs  will  likely  sup-
port some ballast water technology demonstration activities in Fiscal Year 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

TIMOTHY R.E. KEENEY 

70 

Question. Although the coral legislation on today’s agenda does not deal with deep 
sea  coral,  it  is  equally  in  need  of  protection.  How  do  you  believe  the  protection  of 
deep  sea  coral  habitats  would  affect  populations  of  the  many  species  that  depend 
on them for feeding and refuge? 

Answer.  Deep  sea  corals  create  habitats  of  exceptional  biological  diversity.  Along 
with sponges, deep sea corals represent important 3-dimensional vertical relief, pro-
viding  substrate  for  invertebrates  and  spawning,  refuge  and  foraging  areas  for 
fishes.  In  a  number  of  cases,  deep  sea  coral  habitats  have  been  identified  as  essen-
tial  fish  habitat  for  federally-managed  fisheries  species.  Currently,  the  principal 
threat  to  deep  sea  coral  habitats  is  damage  by  fishing  gear,  especially  mobile  bot-
tom-tending gear such as bottom trawls and dredges. Research conducted by NOAA 
has also documented impacts by deep-set gill nets, bottom long lines, and crab pots 
in  U.S.  waters.  Other  potential  threats  include  impacts  associated  with  activities 
that  may  disrupt  bottom  habitat  such  as  oil  and  gas  exploration  and  drilling,  min-
eral mining, and installation of communication cables. As many deep sea corals are 
slow-growing, recovery of habitats from damage is likely to be very slow. 

The  President’s  Ocean  Action  Plan  has  recognized  the  importance  of  protecting 
deep sea coral habitats. NOAA is actively working with each of the Regional Fishery 
Management Councils to address concerns of fishing impacts and encourage protec-
tion of deep-sea corals when developing and implementing regional fishery manage-
ment  plans.  Within  the  last  year,  NOAA  has  approved  the  recommendation  of  the 
New  England  Council  to  close  two  undersea  canyons  to  trawling  for  monkfish,  and 
a  Record  of  Decision  on  the  North  Pacific  Council  essential  fish  habitat  environ-
mental impact statement that includes approximately 280,000 square nautical miles 
of ocean off-limits to bottom trawling, in part to protect deep sea coral habitats. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

REAR ADMIRAL THOMAS H. GILMOUR 

Removing and Responding to Vessel Groundings on Coral Reefs 

Question  1.  You  were  very  involved  a  few  years  ago  in  obtaining  Federal  assist-
ance to remove 9 abandoned vessels from Pago Pago harbor, which had been driven 
onto  the  reef,  and  were  responsible  for  both  polluting  the  waters  and  crushing  the 
coral  resources.  It  was  extremely  hard  to  find  a  responsible  program  or  funding 
needed  to  address  the  problem,  but  through  persistence,  you  were  able  to  leverage 
the  help  of  both  NOAA  and  the  Coast  Guard.  Could  you  describe  the  scope  of  the 
problem today, including the various threats they pose? 

Answer.  The  conditions  that  allowed,  for  example,  the  vessels  in  Pago  Pago  Har-
bor to be abandoned continue to exist today. With the exception of some barges cov-
ered  by  the  Abandoned  Barge  Act,  there  is  no  U.S.  Federal  law  that  expressly  pro-
hibits  the  abandonment  (i.e.,  stranding,  wrecking,  sinking,  or  leaving)  of  a  vessel, 
including as part of search and rescue operations. The Coast Guard and other Fed-
eral, state, and local agencies continue to deal with the threats posed by abandoned 
vessels on a case-by-case basis. The threats posed include pollution threats from on-
board  petroleum  and  hazardous  materials  (paint,  ammonia,  etc.),  and  the  physical 
damage  by  the  hull  to  subsurface  structures  or  marine  organisms.  Rusting  vessel 
hulls may also increase the concentrations of metals in the surrounding waters and 
affect  marine  organisms  and  marine  coral  in  particular.  EPA  and  MARAD  are  de-
veloping guidance recommending environmental best management practices for pre-
paring a vessel for use as an artificial reef. That guidance addresses these and other 
environmental concerns. 

Question 1a. How many vessels are abandoned, with no owner to respond? 
Answer.  The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  last  tracked  abandoned  vessels  (in  all  locations) 

nationwide in 1999, and reported 3,031 abandoned vessels at that time. 

roles be? 

Question  1b.  Which  agencies  could  be  part  of  the  solution,  and  what  could  their 

Answer.  The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  can  remove  or  destroy  a  vessel  if  it  pollutes  the 
environment or poses a substantial threat to pollute. The U.S. Army Corps of Engi-
neers can remove vessels that are abandoned within, or endanger, a Federal naviga-
tion channel. States and localities may have laws against abandonment of property 
and  mechanisms  to  remove  such  property.  The  Department  of  Commerce  and  the 
Department of the Interior often assist the Coast Guard in identifying the type and 
extent  of  pollution  threats  posed  by  vessels  and  any  nearby  threatened  or  endan-
gered species. If the abandoned vessel were to be towed out to sea for disposal, then 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

the  Ocean  Dumping  Act,  which  is  administered  by  the  Environmental  Protection 
Agency, would apply. 

71 

Question 1c. What existing authorities and funds are available, and what new au-

thorities would be needed? Are there any models we can turn to? 

Answer.  Existing  authorities  for  vessel  removal  or  destruction  for  the  U.S.  Coast 
Guard  come  from  the  Federal  Water  Pollution  Control  Act  (FWPCA)  for  petroleum 
threats  and  from  the  Comprehensive  Environmental  Response,  Compensation  and 
Liability Act (CERCLA) for hazardous material threats. Both FWPCA and CERCLA 
have  available  funds  to  remove  pollution  or  pollution  threats,  including  the  entire 
vessel  if  necessary.  The  U.S.  Army  Corps  of  Engineers  uses  existing  agency  funds 
to  remove  Federal  navigation  obstructions.  Possible  new  authorities  may  include  a 
Federal  law  to  make  vessel  abandonment  illegal,  requirements  for  adequate  and 
binding  pollution  insurance  for  all  U.S.  vessels,  and  foreign  vessels  in  U.S.  waters. 
International  pollution  insurance  requirements  may  also  be  sought  via  the  IMO. 
Models  that  may  serve  as  examples  include  the  FWPCA  and  CERCLA  laws  where 
a  particular  community  or  commodity  is  taxed  to  provide  removal  funds  for  irre-
sponsible owners. 

Question  1d.  Could  a  public-private  funding  approach  help  to  address  this  prob-

Answer.  Yes,  a  public-private  funding  approach  could  help  address  this  problem, 

but an optimal solution would be to hold vessel owners directly responsible. 

Question 1e. Do you have an estimate of the cost of removal and response for the 

vessels we know about? 

lem? 

Answer. From past actions, the cost to remove pollutants alone from a vessel can 
run  into  hundreds  of  thousands  of  dollars.  Costs  to  remove  a  grounded  vessel  may 
run from hundreds of thousands of dollars to over a million dollars per vessel. Larg-
er vessels normally contain more petroleum and hazardous materials, and thus are 
generally more costly to clean and remove. 
Preventing Vessel Impacts on Coral Reefs 

Question  2.  While  removal  is  a  huge  problem,  it  is  far  more  cost  effective  to  pre-
vent future damage. In the Florida Keys National Marine Sanctuary, NOAA worked 
in collaboration with the Coast Guard to install radar transponder beacons to steer 
passing ships away from ecologically sensitive coral reef areas. Apparently, the bea-
cons  were  purchased  by  the  owners  of  a  ship  that  went  aground  on  a  coral  reef  in 
the lower Keys as part of a damage assessment and restoration agreement. How ef-
fective are transponders in preventing ship collision and groundings on corals? 

Answer.  Radar  beacons  (RACONs)  would  not  materially  add  to  preventing  ship 
collisions or groundings on coral reefs. RACONs are designed for the following appli-
cations: 

• Ranging and identification on inconspicuous coastlines. 
• Identification of aids to navigation. 
• Indicating navigable spans under bridges. 
RACONs  are  an  aid  to  navigation;  one  of  many  types  that  make  up  our  aids  to 
navigation  system.  With  reefs  marked  on  navigational  charts  (both  electronic  and 
conventional),  current  buoyage,  combined  with  Global  Positioning  System  (GPS) 
navigation,  RACONs  would  be  of  limited  utility.  RACONs  merely  serve  to  identify 
which radar return on a vessel’s display is a specific aid to navigation. Used in con-
junction  with  prudent  navigation,  they  can  be  an  effective  tool  in  an  area  where  it 
is  difficult  to  discern  the  aid  to  navigation  from  other  radar  returns,  but  they  do 
not take the place of proper navigation of a vessel. 

Question  2a.  Could  we  take  the  same  approach  for  coral  reefs  outside  National 

Marine Sanctuaries? What are the barriers we would face? 

Answer. By themselves, RACONs would not prevent ship collisions or groundings. 
RACONs merely serve to identify which radar return on a vessel’s display is a spe-
cific aid to navigation. Used in conjunction with prudent navigation, they can be an 
effective  tool  in  an  area  where  it  is  difficult  to  discern  a  single  aid  to  navigation 
from  another  radar  return,  but  they  do  not  take  the  place  of  proper  navigation  of 
a  vessel.  To  have  utility,  an  entire  buoy  network  would  be  necessary;  however,  the 
cost to establish a buoy network, especially with RACON, would be cost prohibitive. 
Question 2b. Are there any ‘‘hot spots’’ in the Pacific, and particularly the North-

western Hawaiian Islands (NWHI), that could benefit from such transponders? 

Answer.  There  are  no  ‘‘hot  spots’’  in  the  Pacific,  nor  in  the  Northwestern  Hawai-
ian Islands (NWHI) which support the need for a RACON (please note that the term 
‘‘transponder’’  is  not  associated  with  the  U.S.  Aids  to  Navigation  system).  There  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

no recent history of vessel groundings, and the NWHI are not within primary ship-
ping lanes, and have no primary shipping channel passages. 

There  are  no  RACONs  or  buoys  presently  in  the  NWHI,  and  current  data  does 
not support the need for buoys/RACONs in the NWHI. To establish a buoy network 
across the NWHI chain, especially with RACON, would be cost prohibitive. 

Question  2c.  How  much  do  beacons  and  transponders  cost  to  install  and  operate? 
Answer. USCG estimates that the cost for a RACON is $36,435.00, $750.00 is al-

located within the Budget Model annually for maintenance of each RACON. 

Question  2d.  Do  you  believe  industry  and  non-governmental  organizations  could 
work  with  the  government  to  help  solve  this  problem,  either  through  donations  or 
through in-kind contributions? Are there any models we can look to? 

Answer.  There  are  mechanisms  in  place  to  work  with  industry  and  non-govern-
mental  organization.  However,  from  a  navigational  perspective,  and  from  the  per-
spective of the donor, current data does not support the need for RACONs or buoys 
within  the  NWHI.  There  is  no  recent  history  of  vessel  groundings,  and  the  NWHI 
are  not  within  primary  shipping  lanes  and  have  no  primary  shipping  channel  pas-
sages.  More  to  the  point,  the  NWHI  chain  is  thousands  of  miles  long  and  the  cost 
to  establish  a  buoy  network,  especially  with  RACONs,  would  be  cost  prohibitive.  If 
a  need  for  aids  to  navigation  within  the  NWHI  were  established,  the  Commandant 
of  the  Coast  Guard  is  authorized  to  accept  aids  to  navigation  as  a  gift  pursuant  to 
the provisions of 14 U.S.C. 93. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BARBARA BOXER TO 

REAR ADMIRAL THOMAS H. GILMOUR 

Question  1.  Your  written  statement  indicates  that  the  standard  the  U.S.  sought 
in the IMO negotiations was based on a sound scientific foundation. Didn’t the U.S. 
delegation  seek  a  standard  that  was  1,000  times  stronger  than  what  was  adopted 
in the IMO treaty? Please describe what the IMO standard would achieve, compared 
to the standard that the U.S. sought in negotiations, and compared to the standard 
in S. 363 and S. 1224, relative to untreated ballast water that has not gone through 
ballast water exchange. 

Answer. Yes, the U.S. negotiating position at International Maritime Organization 
(IMO)  for  zooplankton  was  for  a  standard  of  less  than  0.01/m 3,  which  would  have 
been  1,000  times  stronger  than  what  was  adopted  under  the  IMO  Standard  which 
is less than 10/m 3. S. 363 (Feb. 10, 2005 version) and S. 1224 call for less than 0.1/ 
m 3. 

The rationale behind the development of the U.S. negotiating position at IMO was 
that  ballast  water  treatment  must  result  in  a  substantial  reduction  in  the  con-
centrations  of  organisms  compared  to  untreated  ballast  water,  specifically  with  re-
spect to coastal organisms which can impact coastal ecosystems. 

The  IMO  Convention  standard  represents  a  reduction  in  concentration  of 
zooplankton from the median observed value for unmanaged ballast, but not a sub-
stantial  reduction  of  phytoplankton  for  unmanaged  ballast.  The  standard  in  S.  363 
represents a more significant reduction for zooplankton and phytoplankton than the 
IMO standard. 

The  purpose  of  treatment  of  ballast  water  to  a  standard  was  to  achieve  greater 
reduction of risk than that presented by ballast water exchange, because of the wide 
variety of efficacy achieved by exchange, and certain vessels cannot complete an ex-
change  either  based  on  route  or  vessel  characteristics,  or  both.  All  of  the  numeric 
standards  under  consideration  would  be  an  improvement  over  ballast  water  ex-
change  in  that  they  would  provide  more  consistent  reductions  in  organisms  in  bal-
last water. 

Question 2. Isn’t it consistent with the treaty for the U.S. to adopt a more mean-
ingful  and  effective  domestic  standard,  since  the  treaty  specifically  contemplates 
this  by  providing  that  countries  may  adopt  ‘‘more  stringent  measures’’  than  those 
of the treaty? 

Answer.  Yes,  there  is  a  specific  provision  in  the  Convention  for  the  Control  and 
Management of Ship’s Ballast Water and Sediment (2004), which recognizes the sov-
ereign right of a party to adopt more stringent measures to protect its waters, con-
sistent with international law. 

Question 3. How many countries have ratified the IMO treaty to date? 
Answer. As of June 15, 2005, no country has ratified the IMO Convention for the 
Control  and  Management  of  Ship’s  Ballast  Water  and  Sediments,  but  the  following 
eight member governments have provided documents expressing their intent to rat-
ify: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

Argentina 
Australia 
Brazil 
Finland 
Maldives 
Netherlands 
Spain 
Syrian Arabic Republic 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

JOEL C. MANDELMAN 

Question  1.  How  much  does  your  ozone  ballast  water  treatment  system  cost,  and 

how soon do you think we can require ships to carry them? 

Answer.  The  cost  will  vary  depending  on  the  size  of  the  ship  and,  most  impor-

tantly, on the speed with which the ballast water comes onboard the ship. 

The  flow  rate  is  critical.  The  faster  the  ballast  water  comes  onboard,  the  greater 
the  quantity  ozone  that  will  be  required.  The  Tonsina  and  Prince  William  Sound 
(the  BP  oil  tanker  on  which  the  current,  final  stage  testing  is  taking  place),  are 
125,000  dead  weight  ton  oil  tankers.  Both  ships  take  on  ballast  water  at  approxi-
mately  15,000  gallons  per  minute.  This  requires ±5,000  grams  of  ozone  per  hour  to 
treat their ballast water—approximately 12 million gallons. 

Smaller  cargo  freighters  typically  take  on  ballast  water  at  a  much  slower  rate. 
In  some  cases,  such  as  the  Navy’s  new  Lewis  &  Clark  class  of  freighters  (50,000 
DWT  ships),  they  take  on  ballast  water  at  a  flow  rate  of  only  4,500  gallons  per 
minute.  This  will  require  significantly  less  ozone  to  treat  even  the  same  quantity 
of ballast water (and, typically, they would carry far less ballast water than a tank-
er). 

Hence,  the  cost  of  the  ozone  generating  equipment,  and,  possibly  the  installation 
cost,  will  drop  sharply.  What  we  do  not  yet  know  is  whether  that  decrease  is  fully 
proportional to the flow rate of the ballast water. We expect that we will know this 
after completion of this series of tests. 

We also expect that once the use of ballast water treatment equipment is manda-
tory—and  there  is  a  significant  increase  in  demand—this  equipment  will  be  manu-
factured on a production line basis further cutting the cost. Therefore, it is difficult 
to  estimate  the  precise  cost  of  outfitting  any  given  ship  at  this  time.  However,  we 
estimate that this will likely be less than 1⁄2 of 1 percent of the total cost of building 
a ship, i.e., less than $750,000—but this is only an estimate. 

We  believe  that  our  equipment  should  be  available  for  general  purchase  by  the 
shipping  industry  within  6  months  of  passage  of  the  Ballast  Water  Management 
Act. 

Question  2.  Your  ozone  treatment  system  kills  organisms  in  ballast  water.  Are 
there  any  potential  negative  environmental  effects  of  this  treatment  on  the  marine 
environment  outside  the  ship?  You  have  indicated  that  the  ozone  breaks  down 
quickly  after  released  into  the  ocean.  What  studies  have  been  done  on  impacts  be-
fore it breaks down? 

Answer. A formal study, funded by NOAA, has just been completed. It is entitled 
Ozone  Treatment  of  Marine  Ballast  Water:  Formation  and  Decay  of  Total  Residual 
Oxidant. It is co-authored by Dr. William Cooper, Professor of Chemistry of the Uni-
versity of North Carolina-Wilmington; Professor J. Hans Van Leeuwen, Professor of 
Civil  and  Environmental  Engineering  at  Iowa  State  University;  and  Jack  Perrins 
and Dr. Russell Herwig of the University of Washington. 

This  paper  has  been  submitted  for  peer  review  to  the  Marine  Pollution  Bulletin 
and  publication  is  expected  next  year.  I  have  submitted  a  PDF  file  with  the  com-
pleted  paper,  in  a  separate  e-mail.  (This  publication  can  be  found  at  http:// 
www.nutech-o3.com/files/peerlmpb.pdf.) 

Ozone will have no residual impact if it is used to treat fresh ballast water. There 
are no residual chemicals. Ozone disintegrates in a few minutes, in fresh water, and 
it turns back into oxygen. Thus, all that would be discharged into the Great Lakes, 
for example, would be oxygen-rich-clean ballast water which is a major boon to im-
proving water quality. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BARBARA BOXER TO 

KATHY J. METCALF 

Question  1.  Does  it  really  over-burden  your  industry  that  the  standard  in  S.  363, 
and  in  S.  1224,  is  stronger  than  the  IMO  standard,  since  the  bills  also  include  a 
feasibility  review  of  technologies  prior  to  requiring  industry  to  comply  with  the 
standards? 

Answer.  It  is  not  a  case  of  over-burdening  the  industry.  Establishing  a  perform-
ance  standard  that  does  not  correlate  in  some  way  to  technological  feasibility  will 
need to be changed to reflect reality. While this is precisely the purpose of the feasi-
bility  review  as  contained  in  the  bills,  it  is  of  great  concern  that  establishing  an 
unachievable  standard  could  well  catch  the  regulated  community  in  an  unintended 
‘‘no  win’’  situation  should  the  standard  not  be  timely  amended  if  technology  is  not 
capable of achieving it as scheduled. There is also some benefit at least at the ‘‘first 
shot’’ of adopting the IMO standard as a sign the U.S. is willing to be a part of cre-
ating an international system. If technology is later shown to achieve a more strin-
gent  level,  then  the  U.S.  can  simultaneously  go  back  to  IMO  and  propose  revision 
of  the  IMO  standard  while  at  the  same  time  amending  legislation/regulation  to 
make  the  national  standard  more  stringent,  regardless  of  whether  IMO  agrees  to 
changing  the  standard  at  the  international  level  (note:  IMO  Convention  provisions 
that allow a country to adopt more stringent standards. Having noted these reserva-
tions  and  making  a  big  assumption  that  ‘‘adjustment’’  of  the  standard  based  on 
available  technology  (up  or  down,  the  latter  not  being  included  in  the  draft  legisla-
tion) will be done in a timely manner, then the standard can be set anywhere from 
millions to zero, since this review should result in an adjusted standard that reflects 
technological achievability at the time required by statute or regulation. 

Question 2. Wouldn’t it make more sense from an industry stand-point to require 
a  stronger  standard,  since  the  alternative  would  be  to  require  retrofits  later  on  if 
the initial technology proves to be ineffective? 

Answer.  In  my  opinion,  these  are  two  separate  issues.  The  standard  needs  to  be 
set  based  on  technological  achievability.  Retrofit  requirements  for  existing  ships 
should  take  into  account  a  reasonable  rate  of  return  on  the  substantial  investment 
of  installing  a  ballast  water  treatment  system.  In  surveying  our  members,  typical 
amortization  schedules  for  shipboard  equipment/systems  use  anywhere  between  7 
and  15  years,  so  establishing  a  retrofit  requirement  which  required  a  vessel  to  up-
grade  its  existing  treatment  system  to  a  new  standard  every  10  years  would  seem 
reasonable from a cost/benefit perspective. With regard to the question posed, estab-
lishing an unachievable standard does nothing to provide fewer impacts on industry, 
whether it relates to initial treatment system installation or retrofits, and thus, the 
standard should be set based on technological achievability. 

Question 3. Why should the U.S. not adopt the most environmentally sound stand-
ard, as we did in the case of our double-hull requirements for the Oil Pollution Act, 
since the IMO standard is weak and we don’t know if it will ever be in force? 

Answer. Agree in part and disagree in part. Agree that the U.S. should adopt the 
most  environmentally  sound  standard  technologically  achievable.  However,  we  do 
not  yet  know  what  that  standard  is,  and  thus,  setting  a  very  stringent  standard 
without  regard  to  practical  achievability  makes  no  logical  sense.  With  OPA  90,  we 
knew that double-hulls could be constructed, the principle issue there was with the 
cost associated with implementing the provisions (on a per vessel), and in an orderly 
fashion  (on  an  global  industry  basis)  to  ensure  sufficient  hulls  to  meet  the  demand 
for  petroleum  transportation.  Disagree  also  with  the  comment  that  the  IMO  stand-
ard  is  weak  . . .  based  on  preliminary  data  we  have  seen  from  a  number  of  test 
worldwide, 10 organisms is a very challenging level to meet. Disagree also with the 
concerns  that  the  IMO  standard  may  never  be  in  force  . . .  even  if  it  is  never  in 
force (which I doubt), the U.S. can establish the standard in domestic legislation and 
then ratchet it down as technology shows the ability to reach even lower concentra-
tions. 

Question  4.  I  understand  that  the  tug  and  barge  industry  may  have  concerns 
about the safety of conducting ballast water exchange. Doesn’t the safety exemption 
included in S. 363, and S. 1224 adequately address this concern? 

Answer. First, I would like to direct attention to the American Waterways Opera-
tors written comments submitted to the record for the June 15, 2005 hearing. These 
comments fully explain the concerns by this industry relative to the conduct of bal-
last water exchange on tug/barge units. 

In the opinion of CSA, the general safety exemption does cover the tug/barge con-
cerns.  However,  this  and  other  draft  legislation,  have  included  provisions  that  sub-
ject  a  vessel  which  claims  the  safety  exemption  more  often  than  a  predetermined 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

frequency,  e.g.,  one  draft  included  a  trigger  of  more  than  twice  in  six  voyages  to  a 
more  intensive  port  state  control  review.  While  this  is  justifiable  in  some  cases,  in 
the  case  of  a  tug/barge  unit,  invoking  the  exemption  will  be  justified  most,  if  not 
all,  of  the  time.  One  possible  alternative  relative  to  a  blanket  exemption,  would  be 
to  craft  legislative  text  which  empowers  the  USCG  to  grant  the  safety  exemption 
to  certain  types/classes  of  vessels  on  an  ongoing  basis.  It  should  also  be  noted  that 
the request for the exemption was for exchange only. 

Question 5. Isn’t it true that some tug and barge operators have in fact been able 

to undertake ballast water exchange? 

Answer.  Yes,  one  operator  of  which  we  are  aware  is  currently  conducting  ex-
change  on  specialized  tug/barge  units,  a  feat  which  is  made  possible  (not  without 
some  safety  concerns)  by  the  semi-permanent  connecting  mechanisms  between  the 
tug and barge unit. We know of no operators that are conducting exchange on ‘‘tra-
ditional’’ tug/barge units, e.g., towing behind or pushing ahead. 

Question  6.  Does  the  IMO  treaty  exempt  this  class  of  vessels  from  the  ballast 

water exchange requirements? 

Answer.  No,  the  IMO  treaty  does  not  exempt  this  class  of  vessel  for  a  variety  of 
reasons  discussed  during  negotiations  at  the  Conference.  The  first,  included  in  (D) 
above,  was  the  recognition  that  the  general  safety  exemption  would  cover  such  a 
case. The second, equally on point, was that the most tug/barge operations are gen-
erally  contained  within  the  EEZ  of  a  single  country,  and  thus,  individual  countries 
could  create  their  own  program  for  these  ‘‘domestic’’  voyages  without  violating  any 
provisions of the Convention. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

KATHY J. METCALF 

Question  1.  The  ballast  water  treatment  standards  in  this  bill  will  take  years  to 
implement  even  after  it  becomes  law.  During  this  period  of  years,  states  would  not 
be allowed to apply their own standards. Would some states see an erosion of their 
ballast water treatment standards during this time? 

Answer. Yes. If the states enact/promulgate a quantitative ballast water discharge 
standard  earlier  than  the  implementation  schedule  as  contained  in  the  bill  (which 
is consistent with the IMO Convention). It is difficult to comprehend on what basis 
the  states  would  set  this  standard  ,  particularly  with  regard  to  environmental  ben-
efit  and  technological  achievability  (See  more  details  in  third  paragraph  below).  It 
would  neither  benefit  the  environment  nor  facilitate  the  continuation  of  maritime 
trade if a state created an unachievable standard. It is instructive to note that Ms. 
Maurya  Falkner  (Ballast  Water  Program  Manager  for  the  State  of  California)  has 
stated that the IMO discharge standard permits higher concentrations of organisms 
than  the  concentrations  found  currently  in  California  water;  however  I  have  not 
seen  any  data  which  confirms  this  statement,  and  thus,  it  may  be  prudent  for  the 
Committee to contact her and solicit her opinion on the question above. 

While the states would certainly be the best source for the response to this ques-
tion,  I  am  pleased  to  provide  the  industry  perspective.  First,  at  this  point  in  time, 
there is no state of which I am aware that has actually proposed a quantitative bal-
last  water  treatment/discharge  standard.  The  State  of  Michigan  has  now  promul-
gated regulations that will require a vessel to secure a discharge permit beginning, 
I  believe  in  mid  2006,  but  has  not  provided  any  information  concerning  the  dis-
charge  standards  on  which  the  permit  will  be  based.  Other  states  which  currently 
have  ballast  water  management  requirements  base  these  requirements  on  a  re-
quired action by the vessel, e.g., exchange in waters ‘‘X’’ nautical miles offshore and 
a minimum of ‘‘X’’ meters in depth. 

Looking  forward,  I  would  expect  some  states  to  incorporate  a  discharge  standard 
in  future  requirements;  however,  it  is  difficult  to  conceive  the  basis  on  which  these 
standards  would  be  based  for  two  reasons.  First.  The  global  scientific  community 
agrees  that  there  is  insufficient  knowledge  to  assert  that  a  particular  discharge 
standard  will  reduce  the  risk  from  invasives  to  a  predetermined  level.  What  we  do 
know is that reducing the concentration of organisms in the ballast water discharge 
will reduce the risk. Second, integrating operational reality into the scientific equa-
tion, the IMO standard is the ‘‘best guess’’ as to what is achievable in the near and 
medium  term.  Currently,  a  number  of  shipboard  technology  tests  are  underway 
around  the  world,  and  as  yet,  none  have  shown  the  ability  to  reach  even  the  IMO 
standard  as  determined  at  the  July  2005  meeting  of  the  IMO  Marine  Environment 
Protection  Committee  meeting,  at  which  a  technology  review  was  conducted  as  per 
the requirements of the IMO Ballast Water Convention. It was agreed at this meet-
ing that it was likely that some technologies would be able to meet the IMO stand-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

ard  by  the  Convention  implementation  dates  (beginning  in  2009)  for  some  classes 
of  ships.  Another  technology  review  will  be  conducted  at  the  Fall  2006  meeting  of 
the  MEPC  to  assess  technology  availability  with  regard  to  developments  and  data 
generated by studies currently in process. 

Question 2. S. 363 already includes a provision to exempt ballast water exchange 

in unsafe conditions. Why is a specific exclusion for barges necessary? 

Answer. A specific provision for barges is not absolutely necessary since these sit-
uations  are  presumably  covered  under  the  existing  safety  exemption  as  contained 
in S. 363. However, in my opinion, it will always be unsafe for a tug towing a barge 
to  come  ‘‘off  the  hawser’’  and  move  around  alongside  the  barge,  and  then  attempt 
to  transfer  a  crew  member  from  the  tug  to  the  barge.  It  should  be  noted  that  even 
in  ‘‘normal’’  sea  conditions,  we  are  likely  looking  at  3  to  6  foot  seas  (swell)  acting 
upon  two  independently  floating  objects,  making  the  transfer  difficult  at  best.  In-
cluding  a  specific  safety  exemption  for  barges,  removes  the  necessity  of  the  Coast 
Guard  having  to  review  these  circumstances  every  time  they  claim  the  exemption 
(which  is  likely  to  be  quite  frequent),  and  allows  the  Coast  Guard  to  focus  more 
properly on self-propelled vessels which invoke the safety exemption for reasons less 
obvious than that found in the case of tug/barges. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

KIM HUM 

Community-Based Approaches to Coral Protection 

Question  1.  What  are  the  top  threats  to  corals  in  the  Pacific,  both  in  the  main 

Hawaiian Islands and beyond? 

Answer.  Commercially,  valuable  reef  fish  in  the  main  Hawaiian  Islands  have  de-
clined  by  75  percent  over  the  past  100  years  due  to  a  combination  of  over-fishing 
and  habitat  degradation  due  to  invasive  species  and  polluted  runoff  (from  develop-
ment,  aging  sewage  systems  and  treatment  facilities,  and  channelized  streams).  In 
addition,  throughout  the  Pacific,  the  effects  of  natural  disasters  (such  as  tsunamis) 
on  coral  reef  health  have  been  magnified  due  to  climate  change  and  associated  dis-
eases and bleaching events which often stress corals beyond their ability to recover. 
Question 2. How much have NOAA and its partners been able to achieve through 

the funding provided under the Coral Reef Conservation Act of 2000? 

Answer. Funding under the Coral Reef Conservation Act (CRCA) has significantly 
increased  our  understanding  of  the  health  and  distribution  of  coral  reefs  in  Hawaii 
and  throughout  the  Pacific.  However,  more  funding  is  needed  for  on-the-ground 
management  to  protect  and  restore  coral  reef  ecosystems,  and  to  build  capacity 
within  state  and  local  governments,  and  local  communities  throughout  the  Pacific. 
NOAA  programs  funded  under  the  CRCA  have  focused  on  research,  monitoring 
and  mapping,  and  provided  valuable  data  about  the  habitat  in  which  we  are  work-
ing  throughout  the  Pacific.  In  addition,  significant  CRCA  funding  has  ensured  that 
the  proposed  Northwest  Hawaiian  Islands  Sanctuary  designation  process  has  been 
thorough and effective. 

However,  additional  funding  is  critically  needed  for  capacity  building  and  on-the- 
ground  marine  conservation  projects,  especially  those  involving  the  human  commu-
nities  associated  with  the  coral  communities  we  are  trying  to  protect.  NOAA  pro-
vides  approximately  $400,000  annually  to  the  State  of  Hawaii  for  coral  reef  protec-
tion,  and  similar  amounts  to  the  territories  throughout  the  Pacific.  Hawaii  and  the 
territories  are  dependent  upon  this  funding  for  core  programs,  and  require  addi-
tional funding for reef protection projects that will actually begin to address the pri-
mary threats to the ecosystem. 

In addition, NOAA has provided $125,000 annually from the CRCA to The Nature 
Conservancy’s Hawaii Program, which has enabled us to start a marine program fo-
cused  on:  (1)  identifying  the  most  important  coral  systems  in  the  main  Hawaiian 
Islands,  (2)  working  with  local  communities  to  begin  managing  these  important 
coral  reef  systems,  and  (3)  developing  sustainable  private  financing  mechanisms  to 
ensure the long-term viability of coral reef protection programs in the islands. Addi-
tional  funding  for  public  and  private  conservation  projects  in  the  Pacific  would  en-
able  us  to  leverage  more  private  dollars,  and  significantly  increase  the  private  sec-
tor’s ability to address coral reef protection issues throughout the region. 

Question 3. How well have the Federal and state agencies coordinated and cooper-
ated with local groups to address these threats in the Pacific? Do you have any rec-
ommendations for improvement? 

Answer. There is excellent coordination between NOAA and the private non-profit 
sector  in  Hawaii.  Cooperation  between  the  state  Department  of  Land  and  Natural 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

Resources  (DLNR)  and  NOAA,  and  the  state  and  the  private  sector  is  also  improv-
ing. However, there is always room for more and better cooperation and communica-
tion. 

In addition to the national planning and cooperation necessary for successful pro-
tection of our Nation’s reef resources, NOAA should be given the authority to coordi-
nate with states, territories, and NGO’s for regional, ecosystem-based planning that 
builds upon the National Coral Reef Action Strategy, and addresses multiple threats 
to  coral  reefs,  such  as  over-harvesting,  coastal  runoff,  invasive  species,  and  vessel 
impacts. This authorization would go a long way toward encouraging more meaning-
ful  cooperation  and  partnership  in  coral  reef  protection  throughout  Hawaii  and  the 
Pacific. 

In addition, the Fish and Wildlife Service (FWS) is responsible for managing more 
than  700,000  acres  of  coral  reefs  in  10  refuges  throughout  Hawaii  and  the  Pacific, 
with  minimal  funding  from  the  Department  of  the  Interior.  Therefore,  interagency 
cooperation  between  FWS  and  NOAA  is  essential  to  successful  implementation  of 
the  strategies  outlined  in  the  CRCA  and  the  Coral  Reef  Action  Strategy,  and  all  of 
the  agencies  that  are  responsible  for  coral  reef  management  should  be  eligible  for 
funding  under  the  Act,  including  Interior  agencies  such  as  the  FWS  and  Office  of 
Insular Affairs. 

Mechanisms  for  interagency  cooperation,  like  the  Coral  Reef  Task  Force,  should 
be supported through the CRCA, and include national and international NGOs, such 
as The Nature Conservancy, which bring a unique perspective and global experience 
to coral reef conservation. 

Question 4. What do community-based approaches bring to the table that the Fed-
eral programs alone do not? What do the Federal programs provide that community- 
based approaches cannot? 

Answer.  The  Federal  agencies  clearly  have  the  expertise  to  provide  scientific  re-
search, biological surveys and monitoring, mapping, and a nationwide network of ex-
perts to draw from for coral reef conservation in Hawaii and throughout the Pacific. 
Their  work  complements,  supports,  and  is  supported  by  the  work  of  local  govern-
ments, NGOs, and communities who have knowledge and expertise in local resource 
issues. 

For  example,  many  local,  coastal  communities  in  Hawaii  are  interested  in  man-
aging  the  coral  reef  resources  surrounding  their  communities.  NGOs  like  The  Na-
ture  Conservancy  are  working  with  them  through  a  new  program  with  the  state 
DLNR  called  ‘‘Makai 1 Watch’’  to  build  their  capacity  to  provide:  (1)  outreach  and 
education to resource users so that they know the laws and local best practices (e.g., 
seasons and size limits, how to interact with marine mammals, where they can and 
cannot  throw  net,  etc);  (2)  surveillance  and  enforcement  to  ensure  that  laws  are 
being followed; and (3) human use surveys and biological monitoring to understand 
the threats to reef resources, and the biological effects of those threats on the coral 
reef communities. Because they live adjacent to the resources, local communities can 
provide a level of management and enforcement which no government agency could 
ever  provide.  However,  in  order  to  be  effective  and  durable,  their  work  must  be  in-
formed  by  public  and  private  partners  who  bring  good  science,  an  in-depth  under-
standing  of  marine  biology,  authority  for  the  laws  governing  the  use  of  local  re-
sources, and lessons learned from other communities around the world. 

Question  5.  Do  you  believe  community-based  approaches  can  fill  some  of  the  re-

maining gaps in coverage? If so, which ones? 

Answer.  The  biggest  gaps  in  reef  resource  protection  are  (a)  the  designation,  and 
management of a resilient, scientifically-designed network of marine managed areas 
(MMAs) that ensures the future health of our coral reefs and associated reef species, 
and (b) enforcement of that system. Community support is essential both for devel-
oping  a  system  of  MMAs,  and  managing  and  enforcing  it.  Our  goal  is  to  work  with 
local  communities,  the  fishing  community,  and  other  stakeholders  to  ensure  that  a 
network is designed and implemented which supports their goals of sustainable fish-
eries and protected resources. 

The  local  community  will  play  an  even  greater  role  in  ensuring  that  the  network 
and the resources within that network are protected through the Makai Watch pro-
gram  as  outlined  above.  Outreach  is  key  to  ensuring  that  marine  resource  users 
(fishermen, collectors, kayakers, etc.) understand the laws and rules governing their 
use of the resources, and communities can play a primary role in providing that out-
reach.  Enforcement  is  the  other  key  to  sustainable  resource  protection,  and  while 
that  is  primarily  a  state  role,  there  are  not  enough  enforcement  officers  to  ensure 
local compliance with resource protection laws. Because they live adjacent to the re-

1 ‘‘Makai’’ is Hawaiian for ‘‘towards the sea.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

sources,  concerned  community  members  can  serve  as  the  eyes  and  ears  of  law  en-
forcement to ensure that the resource is truly protected. 

78 

Question  6.  Is  there  strong  interest  in  increasing  public-private  approaches  to 

solving coral reef problems? 

Answer. Yes, there is very strong interest at all levels in increasing public-private 
approaches to solving coral reef problems. It is clear that no one agency can manage 
and  protect  reef  resources  in  Hawaii  or  anywhere  in  the  Pacific.  It  takes  the  sci-
entific  expertise  of  the  Federal  Government,  the  regulatory  authority  of  the  state 
government,  the  international  experience  of  the  NGO’s,  and  the  knowledge  and  ex-
pertise  of  the  local  communities  to  provide  all  of  the  skill  sets  necessary  for  such 
a  big  job.  The  state  is,  understandably,  concerned  about  communities  wanting  to 
take  control  of  reef  resources  for  their  own  use  to  the  exclusion  of  others.  But  the 
resources  belong  to  everyone,  and  it  is  our  collective  responsibility  to  ensure  that 
they  are  managed  properly  to  ensure  that  everyone  is  able  to  enjoy  and  use  them, 
sustainably, for generations to come. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

KIM HUM 

Question. Although the coral legislation on today’s agenda does not deal with deep 
sea  coral,  it  is  equally  in  need  of  protection.  How  do  you  believe  the  protection  of 
deep  sea  coral  habitats  would  affect  populations  of  the  many  species  that  depend 
on them for feeding and refuge? 

Answer.  While  The  Nature  Conservancy  does  not  work  on  deep  sea  coral  issues 
in  the  Hawaiian  Islands,  we  recognize  that  they  provide  important  habitat  for  sev-
eral  species  of  fish  (including  commercially  important  species  such  as  cod,  roughy, 
and  sea  bass),  crustaceans,  anemone,  sponges,  and  other  species  off  all  U.S.  coasts, 
and  throughout  the  world.  Protection  of  the  deep  sea  corals  which  provide  habitat 
for  these  species—many  of  which  are  disappearing  from  shallow  water  habitat—is 
essential for their continued survival. 

While trawling is not a threat to the deep sea corals in Hawaii, it is the primary 
threat  to  deep  sea  corals  elsewhere  in  the  world,  where  trawlers  have  been  pulling 
up  colonies  that  are  hundreds  of  years  old.  Some  of  the  natural  communities  af-
fected  by  trawling  can  be  well  over  1,000  years  old.  Because  deep  sea  corals  are  so 
slow  growing,  recovery  from  such  catastrophic  damage  can  take  decades  to  cen-
turies.  Recently,  more  than  1,100  scientists  called  for  the  protection  of  the  world’s 
deep sea coral and sponge ecosystems, and urged nations to place a moratorium on 
bottom trawling, saying ‘‘deep sea coral and sponge communities appear to be as im-
portant  to  the  biodiversity  of  the  oceans  and  the  sustainability  of  fisheries  as  their 
analogues in the shallow tropical seas.’’ 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BARBARA BOXER TO 

MAURYA B. FALKNER 

Question 1. What is the status of California’s regulations on ballast water? 
Answer.  On  June  20,  2005,  the  California  State  Lands  Commission  approved 
staff’s  recommendation  to  adopt  permanent  regulations  titled  ‘‘Ballast  Water  Regu-
lations  for  Vessels  Arriving  at  California  Port  of  Places  after  Departing  from  Ports 
or  Places  within  the  Pacific  Coast  Region.’’  The  purpose  of  these  regulations  is  to 
establish management practices for ballast water that is taken on by marine vessels 
in ports or places within the Pacific Coast Region and is to be discharged in a Cali-
fornia  port  or  place.  This,  in  turn,  would  minimize  the  transport  of  nonindigenous 
species  (NIS)  in  ballast  water  discharged  into  state  waters.  Staff  is  currently  com-
pleting the Final Statement of Reasons and other associated paperwork for the rule-
making file and intends to submit the final package to California’s Office of Admin-
istrative  Law  (OAL)  by  the  end  of  July  2005.  The  OAL  has  30  working  days  to  re-
view and act upon the rulemaking package. The regulations go into effect 180 days 
(6 months) after being filed with the Secretary of State. 

A  summary  of  the  regulations  and  issues  raised  by  the  maritime  industry  is  at-

tached for your review (Attachment A). 

Question 2. Does California’s law exempt tug and barge operations? 
Answer. No, the California Act does not exempt tug and barge operators. The Act 
does include an exemption provision for vessels of the armed forces that are subject 
to  ‘‘Uniform  National  Discharge  Standards  for  Vessels  of  the  Armed  Forces.’’  Addi-
tionally, vessels in innocent passage are not subject to the Act. During the 2003 leg-
islative session, the issue of exemptions for specific vessel classes was evaluated. It 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

was determined that there were no biological reasons to exempt specific commercial 
vessel  classes  from  the  law.  Furthermore,  it  was  and  is  hoped  that  in  the  near  fu-
ture,  technology,  either  ship  or  shore  based,  will  be  developed  for  vessels  unable  to 
conduct ballast water exchange while underway. An exemption from the Act, or sub-
sequent  regulations  for  these  types  of  vessels  would  likely  dissuade  vessel  owners 
from pursuing alternative treatment options. However, the Act and CSLC recognize 
the  design  limitations  of,  and  safety  concerns  associated  with,  these  vessels  and 
have included provisions to address these issues. 

Question  3.  Isn’t  it  true  in  California  that  some  tug  and  barge  operators  have  in 

fact been able to undertake ballast water exchange? 

Answer.  Yes,  according  to  data  provided  to  CSLC  on  the  mandatory  reporting 
form,  some  barge  operators  have  conducted  ballast  water  exchange.  However,  the 
CSLC  recognizes  that  this  management  option,  under  many  situations  may  pose  a 
serious safety issue for the crew. As such, the Act and the proposed regulations in-
clude provisions that address safety issues as well as severe hardship issues not re-
lated to safety. 

ATTACHMENT A—SUMMARY OF PROPOSED REGULATIONS GOVERNING BALLAST WATER 

MANAGEMENT FOR COASTAL VOYAGES. 

TITLE 2, DIVISION 3, CHAPTER 1 

ARTICLE 4.6 BALLAST WATER REGULATIONS FOR VESSELS ARRIVING AT CALIFORNIA 
PORTS OR PLACES AFTER DEPARTING FROM PORTS OR PLACES WITHIN THE PACIFIC 
COAST REGION 
The proposed regulations contain five sections of management requirements: 
Section 2280 describes the purpose, applicability, and date of implementation; 
Section 2281 describes the safety exemption; 
Section 2282 defines several key terms used throughout the regulation; 
Section  2283  describes  the  process  for  submission  and  approval  of  alternatives; 

and 

Section 2284 describes the ballast water management options, which includes ex-

change in ‘‘near coastal waters.’’ 

The  requirement  to  conduct  ballast  water  exchange  in  ‘‘near  coastal  waters’’  that 
are at least 50 nautical miles (nm) from shore, was selected based on input received 
from  the  scientific  community,  maritime  industries,  and  state  and  Federal  Govern-
ment  management  agencies  during  several  workshops.  These  workshops  were  held 
to  ensure  that  decision  was  founded  upon  the  best  scientific  information  available, 
while also considering concerns of affected industries. For most voyages, the 50 nm 
distance  would  require  no  course  deviation  for  some  vessels  and  a  minor  deviation 
for  many.  Exchange  at  50  nm  avoids  ballast  discharge  in  coastal  ‘‘retention  zones’’ 
and  at  the  mouths  of  estuaries,  where  currents  and  tides  can  carry  organisms  to 
shore, or sweep them into bays and estuaries. The limit also lies beyond the bound-
aries  of  sensitive  protected  areas,  such  as  Marine  Sanctuaries.  Further,  the  mari-
time  industry  requested  that  California’s  regulation  be  consistent  with  other  U.S. 
state, Federal and international regulations, in order to avoid confusion that would 
occur  should  vessels  encounter  a  patchwork  of  varying  regulations  as  they  traveled 
across jurisdictions. 

Issues  or  Concerns:  The  Commission  staff  held  two  public  hearings.  The  first  on 
June  2,  2005,  at  the  Port  of  Long  Beach,  and  the  second  on  June  8,  2005,  at  the 
Elihu  M.  Harris  State  Building,  in  Oakland.  Two  people  presented  oral  statements 
relevant  to  the  proposed  regulatory  action.  In  addition,  Commission  staff  received 
ten comment letters relevant to the proposed regulatory action. The specifics of each 
comment  will  be  addressed  in  the  Final  Statement  of  Reasons;  however,  a  few  con-
cerns and comments have been repeatedly raised and warrant discussion here. 

For  the  vast  majority  of  commercial  vessels  that  fall  under  this  regulation,  near- 
coastal  ballast  exchange  will  be  the  primary  method  of  ballast  water  management. 
Currently, it is the best compromise of efficacy, environmental safety, and economi-
cal  practicality.  According  to  industry  representatives,  the  vast  majority  of  vessels 
are  capable  of  conducting  exchange,  and  the  management  practice  does  not  require 
any special structural modification to most of the vessels in operation. 

The shipping industry has expressed concern that a small minority of vessels and/ 
or  commercial  shipping  routes  may  be  significantly  impacted  by  the  proposed  regu-
lations.  Commission  staff  recognizes  this  possibility.  These  vessels  and/or  commer-
cial  shipping  routes  can  be  categorized  in  two  ways.  The  first  are  vessels  that,  due 
to special safety circumstances, are unable to perform ballast water management as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

described  in  Article  4.5,  Section  2284  of  the  proposed  regulation.  For  example,  bal-
last  water  exchange  as  outlined  in  the  regulations  may  pose  a  serious  personnel 
safety  concern  for  tugs  and  barges.  Safely  moving  a  crew  from  a  small  boat  to  a 
barge  could  pose  a  serious  safety  risk.  To  address  this  issue,  a  provision  (Section 
2281)  is  included  in  the  regulation,  ensuring  that  the  safety  of  the  vessel,  its  crew, 
or its passengers is not compromised by the management requirements specified in 
the PRC. 

The second general concern relates to a minority of vessels, for which compliance 
with the proposed ballast water management requirements may present some hard-
ship not related to safety. To address this issue, a petition process has been included 
in the rulemaking package that would allow impacted entities to present individual 
hardship  cases  and  associated  alternative  ballast  management  proposals  to  the 
Commission.  This  section  is  necessary  to  provide  flexibility  for  the  Commission  to 
consider  special  hardship  cases  from  the  maritime  industry,  and  associated  alter-
native  management  proposals,  on  a  case-by-case  basis,  while  providing  a  formal 
public notification and/or review process. 

A  third  concern  is  related  to  the  ‘‘shared  water’’  designation.  It  has  been  sug-
gested  that  the  proposed  regulations  should  include  geographically-extensive 
shared-water designations similar to those used in Oregon and Washington. For ex-
ample,  for  transits  between  Los  Angeles  and  San  Diego,  and  for  voyages  between 
the  San  Francisco  Bay-Delta  to  Eureka,  the  industry  has  requested  various  relax-
ations to the requirement for exchanging ballast at locations 50 nm offshore and 200 
m depth. 

In  consideration  of  these  concerns,  staff  subsequently  contacted  several  scientific 
experts,  reviewed  relevant  scientific  literature,  and  completed  preliminary  analyses 
to  address  the  issue.  In  summary,  the  best  available  information  strongly  indicates 
that estuarine (bay/port) ballast water should not be transported between California 
ports,  and  this  includes  voyages  between  the  specifically  mentioned  short-haul  voy-
ages. 

absence of human activity. 

condition, maximizing chance for establishment in a new area. 

• Natural transport of organisms between estuaries appears to be very low, in the 
• Short  coastal  voyages  are  more  likely  to  transport  organisms  in  good  physical 
• The  San  Francisco  Bay  estuary  is  one  of  the  most  highly  invaded  areas  of  the 
world,  and  is  likely  to  act  as  a  ‘‘hub’’  from  which  non-indigenous  species  can 
spread to other areas of California. 
• Many  non-indigenous  organisms  found  in  one  of  the  aforementioned  ports  are 
not  yet  found  in  the  other.  The  potential  for  their  continued  spread  should  be 
minimized. 
• Some  non-indigenous  species  in  San  Francisco  Bay  are  clearly  problematic  or 
are found in very high numbers, and have not yet been found in Humboldt Bay. 
Examples include the Chinese mitten crab and the Asian clam. 
• The region between San Diego and Point Conception is an oceanographic ‘‘reten-
tion zone’’ where water re-circulates for extended periods. These zones have the 
capacity to retain organisms released in them, and oceanographers have explic-
itly recommended avoiding ballast exchange in them. 

Several  commenters  have  suggested  the  inclusion  of  language  stating  that  a  ves-
sel  should  not  be  required  to  deviate  from  its  intended  voyage  or  unduly  delay  its 
voyage  to  comply  with  ballast  water  management.  The  International  Maritime  Or-
ganization  (IMO)  has  adopted  recommended  guidelines  for  this  issue  containing 
such language with regard to deviation and undue delay. Staff feels that, while the 
language  may  be  appropriate  for  a  negotiated  international  recommendation  or 
guideline,  it  is  wholly  insufficient  for  a  regulation  that  must  meet  the  mandate  of 
P.R.C.  Section  71204.5.  Staff  has  been  unable  to  find  any  data  with  regard  to  com-
pliance  with  the  IMO  guideline,  but  anecdotal  evidence  strongly  suggests  that  the 
‘‘undue delay and deviation’’ exemption is used readily, thereby rendering the guide-
line  of  little  value.  Without  further  contingencies  and  definition,  a  small  deviation 
or minor delay in an intended voyage could easily be claimed, exempting those voy-
ages and significantly weakening the ability of this regulation to effectively prevent 
or  minimize  the  introduction  and  spread  of  NIS.  One  may  consider  analogous  to  a 
speed limit that prohibits driving over the posted speed ‘‘. . . unless it is inconven-
ient.’’  The  inclusion  of  the  language,  that  would  allow  noncompliance  in  the  event 
that  it  would  necessitate  deviation  from  an  intended  voyage  or  undue  delay,  puts 
the  decision  to  comply  entirely  in  the  hands  of  the  regulated  community,  not  the 
regulatory  agency.  If  there  were  a  clear  definition  of  an  acceptable  deviation  or 
undue  delay,  it  may  be  possible  to  craft  an  enforceable  regulation.  However,  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

commenters  suggesting  the  language  have  not  provided  such  definitions.  Therefore, 
protection  of  the  state’s  waterways  from  nonindigenous  species,  as  required  under 
P.R.C. Section 71204.5, would not be assured if such a vague, undefined and lenient 
exemption  were  allowed.  Additionally,  it  is  believed  that  without  sufficient  defini-
tion, this language would not meet the ‘‘Clarity Standard’’ required in the Adminis-
trative  Procedures  Act.  As  an  alternative,  staff  has  included  a  petition  process, 
under  Section  2283,  that  would  allow  impacted  entities  to  present  individual  hard-
ship cases and associated alternative ballast management proposals to the Commis-
sion.  If  compliance  with  the  regulation  would  clearly  cause  significant  hardship, 
then  the  Commission  and  the  affected  operator  could  determine  what  course  of  ac-
tion  could  be  taken  as  an  appropriate  alternative  to  meet  the  mandate  of  the  stat-
ute, while at the same time limiting or eliminating the hardship. 

Finally,  one  commenter  suggested  that  staff  include  in  the  proposed  regulations, 
a  provision  requiring  an  evaluation  of  these  regulations  and  their  impact  on  the 
shipping industry, six to twelve months after their implementation. While staff dis-
agrees with the need to include such a provision in the regulation, Staff does agree 
that  the  effectiveness  of  the  proposed  regulations  should  be  evaluated  on  a  regular 
basis.  To  that  end,  Staff  recommends  that  the  Commission  direct  Staff  to  review 
and evaluate the impact of the amendment on the regulated community 12 months 
after its implementation date, and report to the Commission on its findings. In addi-
tion,  the  Act  already  requires  the  Commission  to  evaluate,  summarize,  and  report 
to  the  legislature  and  the  public  on  the  status  of  the  Program,  including  the  effec-
tiveness  of  adopted  regulations.  This  report  is  due  biennially,  with  the  next  sched-
uled for January 2007. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

MAURYA B. FALKNER 

Question  1.  Although  the  coral  legislation  on  today’s  agenda  does  not  deal  with 
deep sea coral, it is equally in need of protection. How do you believe the protection 
of deep sea coral habitats would affect populations of the many species that depend 
on them for feeding and refuge? 

Answer.  I  do  not  have  any  expertise  in  deep  sea  coral  or  programs  designed  to 

protect them. 

They have only recently been recognized as important habitat for several fish spe-
cies,  including  a  number  of  commercially-important  species.  They  are  long-lived 
(100s  to  over  1,000  years  old)  and  extremely  diverse.  They  are  being  threatened  by 
a variety of fishing practices and oil exploration and extraction activities. 

Coral  protections  will  affect  associated  species  populations  positively.  Through 
protection, associated populations numbers should remain stable because their habi-
tat  remains  stable,  new  species  should  come  to  light  through  increased  research 
funding,  and  commercial  fisheries  will  also  benefit  from  better  understanding  of 
deep  ocean  climate  changes  recorded  in  coral  rings,  which  are  the  practical  equiva-
lent of tree rings on land. 

I  would  suggest  Committee  members  contact  Peter  Etnoyer  of  Aquanautix  Con-
sulting  (Peter@aquanautix.com)  and  Lance  Morgan  (Lance@mcbi.org),  or  Elliott 
Norse  (Elliott@mcbi.org)  of  Marine  Conservation  Biology  Institute.  Drs.  Etnoyer, 
Morgan, and Norse have been involved in research on deep sea corals. 

Additionally, information can be found at the following websites: 
http://www.coris.noaa.gov/about/deep/deep.html. 
http://www.mcbi.org/DSClstatement/sign.htm. 
Question  2.  You  testified  that  vessels  traveling  short  distances,  but  distances  be-
tween  two  different  estuaries,  should  still  exchange  ballast  water  offshore.  These 
vessels,  though,  may  have  to  go  significantly  out  of  their  way  to  do  this.  Do  you 
have  a  sense  of  how  many  vessels  will  have  to  significantly  alter  their  course  and 
be delayed by this process? 

Answer. It is difficult to quantify the number of vessels or voyages that will ulti-
mately be impacted by this new regulation. Based on comments the California State 
Lands  Commission  (CSLC)  received  before  and  during  the  formal  public  review  pe-
riod  for  the  rulemaking  package  (see  Attachment  A  ‘‘Final  Statement  of  Reasons,’’ 
which  summarizes  and  responds  to  comments  CSLC  received  during  the  initial  no-
tice period), most of the companies have advised us that they will be able to accom-
modate  the  proposed  regulations  with  little  difficulty.  Only  a  relatively  small  per-
centage of the population of coastal traffic has stated that they will suffer dramatic 
economic  consequences  under  the  new  rule.  This  issue  will  be  further  defined  in 
meetings  scheduled  between  the  CSLC  and  the  maritime  industry  in  late  October 
2005. Currently, staff is aware of 15 vessels, out of the ∼1,000 vessels that visit the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

state annually that, due to their design or trade route, will be significantly impacted 
by  the  new  regulation.  Under  the  new  regulation,  these  vessels  may  be  accommo-
dated  by  provisions  of  Section  2283,  Alternatives.  Such  vessels  may  petition  for  an 
alternative to comply with the regulation. 

ATTACHMENT A—FINAL STATEMENT OF REASONS 

UPDATE OF INITIAL STATEMENT OF REASONS 

As  a  result  of  the  comments  only  one  non-substantive  change  has  been  made  to 
the  text  of  the  regulations.  The  word  ‘‘or’’  in  subsection  2284(a)(1)  has  been  struck 
out  in  response  to  comment  No.  4.  No  other  modifications  have  been  made  to  the 
proposed  regulations.  As  such,  there  is  no  update  to  the  Initial  Statement  of  Rea-
sons. 
Summary  and  Response  to  Comments  Received  During  the  Initial  Notice 

Period of April 13, 2005 Through June 8, 2005 
Written Comments of Carlton D. Moore, CDFG, OSPR 

Comment  1:  Commenter  believes  that  the  proposed  regulations  provide  a  good 
starting  point  for  controlling  ballast  discharges  through  exchange,  but  hopes  that 
the  provisions  are  revised  as  ballast  water  treatment  technologies  are  developed 
that provide a higher level of protection. 

Response:  As  currently  drafted,  the  proposed  regulation  includes  the  option  for 
ballast  water  management  through  approved  ballast  water  treatment  technologies. 
Section  2284(a)(3)  permits  a  vessel  to  manage  ballast  water  using  a  ballast  treat-
ment  technology  that  is  approved  by  the  California  State  Lands  Commission 
(CSLC). 

Comment  2:  Add  language  to  Section  2280(c)  that  clarifies  that  there  is  another 
regulation in place that applies to vessels arriving to California from outside the Pa-
cific Coast Region. 

Response: The comment does not pertain to the proposed regulation, but to other 
existing  requirements  of  the  enabling  legislation,  Public  Resources  Code  (P.R.C.) 
§ 7204.2.  The  CSLC  notes  that  vessels  are  obligated  to  comply  with  the  require-
ments  outlined  in  P.R.C.  § 71204.2,  which  applies  to  vessels  carrying  ballast  that 
originates from ports or places outside of the U.S. EEZ. 

Comment  3(a–d):  The  California  Department  of  Fish  and  Game  (CDFG)  requests 
that  terms  and  processes  in  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alternatives,’’  be  elaborated  upon  for 
clarification.  Specifically,  the  commenter  requests  that  more  information  on  which 
practices can be adopted as alternative management options, steps a petitioner must 
take  to  navigate  the  petition  process,  the  length  of  time  the  process  will  take,  cri-
teria that will be used to evaluate the merits of a proposed alternative, and if there 
may be an appeals process. 

Response:  The  purpose  for  the  provision  is  to  allow  for  the  flexible  development 
of  management  alternatives  for  unusual  and  rare  hardship  situations  that  are 
deemed  valid  by  the  Commission  (See  ISOR).  Through  its  frequent  communication 
with  the  commercial  shipping  industry,  the  CSLC  anticipates  that  petitions  will  be 
submitted  by  vessels,  owners,  or  operators  with  unique  difficulties  and  cir-
cumstances.  Therefore,  a  specific  list  of  allowable  alternative  management  options 
was  not  directly  included  in  the  regulation  so  the  range  of  management  solutions 
would  not  be  constrained.  Second,  the  CSLC  maintains  open  communications  with 
the commercial shipping industry. Should a petitioner request, the CSLC intends to 
work directly with petitioners to develop biologically protective alternatives for sub-
mission to the Commission. 

Comment 4: Correct apparent typographical error in Section 2284: ‘‘Exchange the 
vessel’s  ballast  water  . . .  taken  on  in  a  port  or  place  or  within  the  Pacific  Coast 
Region.’’ 

Response: Accepted. Text will be amended as suggested. 
Comment 5: Add a section to the regulation that informs the regulated community 

of potential consequences for non-compliance. 

Response: Consequences for non-compliance are currently included in the enabling 
legislation (Marine Invasive Species Act, P.R.C. § 71216 and § 71217). Including non- 
compliance language in the proposed regulation would be redundant. The entire reg-
ulated community is fully conversant with the statue. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Written Comments of Capt. Phil Davies, ChevronTexaco 

83 

Comment  6:  Commenter  states  that  ChevronTexaco  has  been  a  supporter  of  the 
Marine Invasive Species Program, and recognizes that ballast water exchange is an 
interim solution that will reduce the risk of invasive species introductions. 

Response:  The  Commission  thanks  the  commenter  for  their  support,  and  notes 

that no response is required. 

Comment  7:  The  commenter  lists  the  five  ballast  water  management  options  al-
lowed by the proposed regulation and states that ballast water exchange is the pri-
mary  method  utilized  by  the  majority  of  ship  owners.  The  remaining  management 
options  are  not  possible  for  ChevronTexaco  vessels  due  to  operating  schemes,  lack 
of infrastructure, or lack of technological development. 

Response: Ballast water exchange 50 nautical miles offshore is among the accept-
able  management  options  listed  in  the  proposed  regulation  Section  2284.  A  vessel 
utilizing  the  method  would  be 
in  compliance  with  the  regulation.  Thus, 
ChevronTexaco  will  be  in  full  compliance  should  they  choose  to  conduct  ballast  ex-
change.  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  conduct  one  of  the  five  management  options  of 
Section 2284 due to issues not related to safety, may be accommodated by provisions 
of Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to com-
ply with the regulation. 

Comment  8:  The  proposed  regulation  does  not  make  allowances  for  extenuating 
circumstances,  which  is  inconsistent  with  related  International  Maritime  Organiza-
tion  (IMO)  agreements  and  U.S.  Federal  regulations,  which  do  not  impact  com-
merce.  Those  regulations  accommodate  vessels  that  would  be  subject  to  delays  or 
experience impacts to scheduling. 

Response: The term ‘‘undue deviation and delay,’’ used in the U.S. Federal regula-
tion  and  IMO  Convention  and  are  not  adequately  defined,  as  no  criteria  for  sub-
stantive  deviation  or  delay  is  set  forth.  Additionally,  the  regulation  must  be  devel-
oped pursuant to California statute. Vessels that are unable to comply with the pro-
posed regulation due to issues not related to safety may be accommodated by provi-
sions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alternatives.’’  Such  vessels  may  petition  for  an  alternative 
to  comply  with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  cases  of  extreme  financial  hard-
ship,  provided  that  the  petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to 
evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the 
purpose of the proposed regulation. 

Comment 9: The commenter states that, during a meeting in 2004, the CSLC esti-
mated that less than 15 percent of vessels that will be required to exchange ballast 
water,  will  be  unable  to  do  so  due  to  their  short  voyage  duration  or  vessel  design. 
The economic impact to these operators will be millions annually, though the reduc-
tion in the number of species transferred has not been quantified. 

The commenter further states that the CSLC’s intention with the alternatives pe-
tition process (Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives’’) was to collect monies from vessel opera-
tors to perform a management practice other than ballast water exchange. Such an 
arrangement  was  not  agreed  upon  during  the  development  of  the  proposed  regula-
tion. 

Response:  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  proposed  regulation  due  to 
issues not related to safety may be accommodated by provisions of Section 2283, ‘‘Al-
ternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply with the regula-
tion. These may include cases of extreme financial hardship, provided that the peti-
tioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the 
petition, and that the proposed alternative fulfills the purpose of the proposed regu-
lation. 

Several  studies  conducted  on  the  efficacy  of  ballast  water  exchange  have  shown 
a 70–95 percent reduction in the number of organisms transferred in a ballast tank. 
See ISOR for the proposed regulation, ‘‘Information Relied Upon.’’ 

No fees will be collected in conjunction with Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ 
Comment  10a:  Consider  that  in  order  to  conduct  ballast  water  exchange  50  nm 
from shore, more vessels will move into tanker lanes and will cross other designated 
shipping lanes, increasing the risk of collision. 

Response:  The  proposed  regulation  does  not  define  routes  by  which  vessels  must 
travel in order to conduct ballast exchange. Theses regulations do not supersede the 
international navigational and ship handling standards found in the Convention on 
the  International  Regulations  for  Preventing  Collisions  at  Sea,  1972,  (Colregs).  The 
only  formally  designated  vessel  traffic  routing  scheme  exists  on  the  Central  and 
Southern  California  coast.  This  internationally  recognized  Traffic  Separation 
Scheme  (TSS)  requires  vessels  using  it  to  proceed  in  prescribed  ways  including 
methods for entering, departing, and crossing the TSS. Nothing in these regulations 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

would  change  those  methods.  Most  of  the  TSS  is  closer  than  50  nautical  miles  to 
the shore. 

There is a voluntary agreement between the State (Office of Spill Prevention and 
Response  of  the  California  Department  of  Fish  and  Game)  and  operators  of  crude 
oil tankers in the Alaska trade (through the Western States Petroleum Association). 
The  agreement  includes  a  provision  that  those  vessels  will  transit  the  California 
coast  at  least  50  nautical  miles  offshore.  There  are  no  prescribed  routes  or  tracks 
that these vessels must follow. They must comply with the Colregs. 

The  Commission  has  no  information  supporting  the  contention  that  collisions  are 

likely to increase if more ships are required to transit beyond 50 nm. 

Comment 10b–c: Consider that under the proposed regulation, vessels that are not 
able  to  perform  ballast  water  exchange  will  travel  more  slowly  or  stop  in  tanker 
lanes.  Vessels  that  move  at  reduced  speeds  will  be  more  difficult  to  maneuver  and 
control, and will be a more vulnerable security risk. 

Response:  If  a  vessel  is  unable  to  perform  ballast  water  exchange,  it  is  not  clear 
why  it  would  be  required  to  slow  down  or  stop  in  tanker  lanes.  A  vessel  unable  to 
conduct  exchange  may  opt  to  perform  one  of  the  remaining  four  management  op-
tions of Section 2284. Additionally, vessels that are unable to comply with the regu-
lation due to issues not related to safety as defined in Section 2281, may be accom-
modated by provisions of Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for 
an alternative to comply with the regulation. 

Comment  10d:  Consider  that  under  the  proposed  regulation,  vessels  will  be  re-

quired to travel further distances to comply, increasing air emissions. 

Response: This issue has not been studied carefully, but since these ballast water 
exchanges  will  take  place  greater  than  50  nautical  miles  from  shore,  it  is  antici-
pated that air quality in California would not be affected. 

Further,  the  Commission  has  no  information  supporting  the  conclusion  that  air 
emissions  may  increase  or  whether  those  increases  would  be  significant.  The  Com-
mission has no information supporting the contention that ships would have to slow 
down,  nor  is  the  information  on  where  they  might  slow  down.  Whether,  where,  or 
how much air emissions may increase cannot, therefore, be determined. 

Comment  10e:  Consider  that  the  proposed  regulation  will  increase  costs  for  the 
maritime  industry,  resulting  in  costs  that  will  be  passed  on  to  consumers,  and  po-
tential loss of business to the state. 

Response: Vessels that are unable to comply with the regulation due to issues not 
related  to  safety  as  defined  in  Section  2281,  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions 
of Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to com-
ply with the regulation. 

Comment 10f: Consider that Washington, Oregon, and British Columbia do not re-
quire  ballast  water  management  of  vessels  traveling  wholly  within  their  states. 
These states conform with the International Maritime Organization (IMO) and U.S. 
Coast  Guard  (USCG)  agreements,  and  accommodate  short  voyages.  The  proposed 
regulation  would  be  inconsistent  with  those  of  neighboring  West  Coast  states,  and 
will create voyage delays particularly for short voyages. 

Response:  The  regulation  must  be  developed  pursuant  to  California  statute,  and 
thus,  is  not  required  to  conform  with  regulations  of  other  U.S.  states  or  countries. 
Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  proposed  regulation  due  to  issues  not 
related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alter-
natives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply with the regulation. 
These may include cases of extreme financial hardship, provided that the petitioner 
includes all the data and information required to evaluate the merits of the petition, 
and that the proposed alternative fulfills the purpose of the proposed regulation. 

Comment  10g:  Consider  that  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990  limits  the  number  of 
hours seamen may work, and the proposed regulation will create financial hardship 
or transit delays. 

Response:  Most  ballast  water  exchanges  are  not  personnel  intensive.  The  affect 
on the work hour limitations imposed by Federal statute will be different from ves-
sel to vessel. Operators that are unable to comply with the regulation due to issues 
not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alter-
natives.’’  Such  operators  may  petition  for  an  alternative  to  comply  with  the  regula-
tion. These may include cases of extreme financial hardship, provided that the peti-
tioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the 
petition, and that the proposed alternative fulfills the purpose of the proposed regu-
lation. 

Comment  11:  The  CSLC  should  make  accommodations  within  the  regulations  for 
vessels that are unable to comply with the proposed regulations. The regulations as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

written  would  place  businesses  in  California  at  a  disadvantage  in  comparison  to 
other West Coast ports. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers. Vessels that are un-
able to comply with the regulation due to issues not related to safety may be accom-
modated by provisions of Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for 
an  alternative  to  comply  with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  cases  of  extreme 
financial  hardship,  provided  that  the  petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  informa-
tion  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alter-
native fulfills the purpose of the proposed regulation. See comments 15 and 18, and 
response thereto. 
Written  Comments  of  John  Berge,  Pacific  Merchant  Shipping  Association  (May  26, 

2005) 

Comment  12:  The  Pacific  Merchant  Shipping  Association  (PMSA)  supported  the 
renewal  of  the  enabling  statue,  AB  433  (2003),  supports  the  management  efforts  of 
the program, and recognizes that current regulations will reduce the risk of invasive 
species  introductions  until  better  technologies  are  developed  to  eliminate  the  risk. 
Response: The Commission thanks the commenter for the comment and notes that 

no response is required. 

Comment 13 and Comment 15: PMSA applauds the CSLC’s effort to align the pro-
posed regulation with aspects of the IMO and the USCG proposals. However, these 
other  regulations  make  accommodations  that  the  proposed  regulation  does  not,  for 
vessels that would be required to make extensive deviations or suffer delays. Failure 
to accommodate these vessels could result in financial hardship to the industry, and 
could  eliminate  some  trade  in  California.  Specifically,  accommodation  should  be 
made  for  vessels  in  regular  trade  that  cannot  comply,  and  vessels  that  encounter 
irregular situations. 

Response:  The  accommodations  made  for  deviation  and  delay  used  in  the  U.S. 
Federal  regulation  and  IMO  Convention  are  not  adequately  defined,  as  criteria  for 
substantive  deviation  or  delay  is  not  set  forth.  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply 
with  the  proposed  regulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommo-
dated  by  provisions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alternatives.’’  Such  vessels  may  petition  for 
an  alternative  to  comply  with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  cases  of  extreme 
financial  hardship,  provided  that  the  petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  informa-
tion  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alter-
native  fulfills  the  purpose  of  the  proposed  regulation.  See  comment  8  and  15,  and 
response thereto. 

Comment  14a:  Consider  that  the  efficacy  of  ballast  water  exchange  at  reducing 

invasive species transport has not yet been fully quantified. 

Response:  Though  the  exact  numerical  efficacy  of  ballast  water  exchange  for  re-
moving  organisms  in  tanks  varies  depending  on  vessel  and  voyage  pattern,  numer-
ous studies have shown that the management practice reduces the number of orga-
nisms transferred in a ballast tank. See ISOR for the proposed regulation, ‘‘Informa-
tion Relied Upon.’’ 

Comment  14b:  Consider  that  the  proposed  regulation  should  reduce  the  risk 

invasive species transfer, even if a small number of vessels are accommodated. 

Response:  P.R.C.  § 71204.5 

regulation  be 
‘‘. . . designed  to  protect  the  waters  of  the  state.’’  This  requires  that  the  proposed 
regulation  be  protective,  rather  than  merely  reduce  the  risk  of  species  transfer. 
Therefore,  the  small  population  of  vessels  that  petition  for  an  alternative  ballast 
management option under Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives,’’ will be required to fulfill the 
purpose of the regulation. 

the  proposed 

requires 

that 

tablished. 

Comment  14c:  The  supporting  science  in  terms  of  risk  factors  is  still  not  well  es-

Response: The majority of research experts, and peer-reviewed scientific literature 
on  marine  and  estuarine  non-indigenous  species  generally  agree  that  ballast  water 
is  likely  the  largest  vehicle  by  which  invasions  have  occurred.  This  recognition  is 
reflected  in  existing  ballast  water  regulations  or  conventions  adopted  by  other  U.S. 
Pacific  states,  the  U.S.  Federal  Government,  and  the  International  Maritime  Orga-
nization. Further, the best available science shows that a coastal voyage can trans-
fer  millions  of  organisms  to  a  destination  port.  See  ISOR  for  the  proposed  regula-
tion, ‘‘Information Relied Upon.’’ 

Comment  14d:  Consider  that  for  ballast  water  exchange,  a  given  distance  off  of 
the West Coast is more protective than the same distance off of other U.S. or Euro-
pean coasts, because of the narrow continental shelf on the Pacific West Coast. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

Response: The requirement to exchange ballast in water at least 200 m deep and 
50 nm offshore is based on recommendations provided by Pacific West Coast oceano-
graphic experts during a workshop in 2002. In order to minimize the possibility that 
organisms  discharged  from  vessels  reached  the  shoreline,  oceanographers  rec-
ommended  that  exchange  occur  in  areas  deeper  than  200  m.  In  order  to  avoid  ex-
change  in  areas  where  water  currents  tend  to  retain  organisms  (retention  zones), 
they  recommended  that  ballast  water  exchange  be  conducted  least  50  nm  offshore 
of these regions. See ISOR, ‘‘Information Relied Upon.’’ 

Comment  14e:  Consider  that  the  majority  of  vessels  will  be  able  to  meet  the  pro-

posed regulation without undue burden. 

Response:  The  Commission  agrees  with  the  commenter,  and  notes  that  no  re-

sponse is required. 

Comment  14f:  Consider  that  ports  in  Oregon,  Washington,  and  British  Columbia 
do not require exchange of vessels engaged in coastal voyages to accommodate short 
routes  between  these  ports.  The  proposed  regulation  makes  no  such  accommoda-
tions. 

Response:  The  proposed  regulation  does  accommodate  vessels  on  short  voyages 
within  defined  shared  waters,  as  described  in  Section  2280(b).  Vessels  are  not  re-
quired to manage ballast when transiting wholly within the San Francisco Bay/San 
Joaquin/Sacramento  Delta,  or  when  transiting  wholly  within  the  Los  Angeles/Long 
Beach/El Segundo port complex. 

In addition, the regulation must be developed pursuant to California statute, and 
thus,  is  not  required  to  conform  with  regulations  of  other  U.S.  states  or  countries. 
Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  proposed  regulation  due  to  issues  not 
related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alter-
natives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply with the regulation. 
This may include regularly scheduled, short-distance voyages, provided that the pe-
titioner includes all the data and information required to evaluate the merits of the 
petition, and that the proposed alternative fulfills the purpose of the proposed regu-
lation. See comment 10f and response thereto. 

Comment 14g: Consider that the stated goal of the proposed regulation is to create 

a harmonized approach between Pacific Coastal states. 

Response:  The  regulation  must  be  developed  pursuant  to  California  statute,  and 
thus,  is  not  required  to  conform  with  regulations  of  other  U.S.  states  or  countries. 
Nonetheless, it does create consistency with other North American Pacific states by 
requiring  ballast  water  exchange  at  a  distance  offshore  identical  to  those  required 
by  ballast  water  regulations  or  conventions  in  Washington,  major  Pacific  Coast  Ca-
nadian  ports  (Vancouver,  Nanaimo,  Fraser  River),  and  the  International  Maritime 
Organization. The 50 nm distance is also identical to that prescribed by pending bal-
last water legislation in Oregon (Oregon HB 2170, 2005). 

Comment 14h: Consider that the IMO Convention and Federal ballast water pro-
posals  accommodate  vessels  that  would  be  required  to  deviate  or  extend  their  voy-
ages to accomplish exchange. 

Response:  The  language  accommodating  undue  deviation  and  delay  used  in  the 
U.S. Federal regulation and IMO Convention and are not adequately defined, as cri-
teria for substantive deviation or delay is not set forth. Additionally, the regulation 
must  be  developed  pursuant  to  California  statute,  and  thus  is  not  required  to  con-
form with other states or countries. Vessels that are unable to comply with the pro-
posed regulation due to issues not related to safety may be accommodated by provi-
sions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alternatives.’’  Such  vessels  may  petition  for  an  alternative 
to  comply  with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  vessels  on  regularly  scheduled 
short-haul  voyages,  provided  that  the  petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  informa-
tion  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alter-
native  fulfills  the  purpose  of  the  proposed  regulation.  See  comment  8  and  response 
thereto. 

Comment  14i:  Consider  that  the  effect  of  mandating  these  rules  under  all  sce-

narios could seriously impede state commerce and burden the maritime industry. 

Response:  The  proposed  regulation  does  not  mandate  ballast  water  management 
under  all  circumstances.  As  described  in  Section  2281  ‘‘Safety  of  Ballasting  Oper-
ations,’’  ballast  management  is  not  required  in  circumstances  that  endanger  a  ves-
sel, its crew or its passengers. Vessels that are unable to comply with the proposed 
regulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions 
of Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to com-
ply  with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  circumstances  of  undue  financial  hard-
ship,  provided  that  the  petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to 
evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the 
purpose of the proposed regulation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

Comment  16a:  For  vessels  that  cannot  comply  with  the  five  ballast  management 
practices required by Section 2284 due to vessel design or voyage duration, language 
is  suggested  that  allows  ballast  water  exchange  ‘‘to  the  extent  possible’’  in  near 
coastal  waters  (at  least  50  nm  offshore  and  200  m  deep).  For  vessels  on  regular 
trade routes that are unable to comply, language is suggested that would allow ves-
sels to petition for a vessel-specific, route-specific variance. For vessels on irregular 
routes, language is suggested to allow a petition for a one-time variance. 

Response:  Ballast  water  exchange  ‘‘to  the  extent  possible’’  is  not  adequately  de-
fined  in  the  commenter’s  suggested  language,  and  does  not  meet  the  clarity  stand-
ard of the Administrative Procedures Act. Under such unspecified language, a vessel 
could exchange inadequate volumes of ballast providing little or no reduction for the 
risk  of  invasive  species  introduction.  Such  a  scenario  would  not  fulfill  the  intent  of 
the enabling statute to, ‘‘protect the waters of the state.’’ 

Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives,’’ included in the proposed regulation already includes 
language  allowing  vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  regulation  due  to 
issues not related to safety to petition for an alternative to comply with the regula-
tion. As currently written, the petition process may be available to vessels traveling 
on  regular  trade  routes,  or  to  vessels  on  irregular  trade  routes,  provided  that  the 
petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of 
the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the  purpose  of  the  proposed 
regulation. Therefore, the suggested change in language is unnecessary. 

Comment  16b:  PMSA  requests  that  review  and  approval  of  variance  petitions  for 
vessels  under  irregular  routes  or  circumstances  be  completed  at  the  staff  level  of 
the CSLC. 

Response: For petitions that require an immediate response, the Commission has 
delegated  authority  to  the  Executive  Officer  for  approving  and  disapproving  re-
quests  for  an  ‘‘Alternative’’  under  section  2283.  In  cases  that  do  not  require  an  im-
mediate  response,  such  as  a  request  for  a  long-term  or  fleet-wide  alternative,  the 
Commission will approve or disapprove the request. 

Comment  17:  PMSA  requests  that  a  review  of  the  effects  of  the  proposed  regula-

tion is conducted 6–12 months after the regulation is implemented. 

Response:  A  report  reviewing  the  activities  of  the  larger  administrative  program 
(Marine  Invasive  Species  Program)  is  produced  biennially  as  mandated  by  the  Ma-
rine Invasive Species Act. The next report will be produced in January of 2007, ap-
proximately  16  months  after  the  implementation  of  the  proposed  regulation,  and 
will include the requested review. As such, a separate review and associated report 
would be redundant. 

In  addition,  the  Commission  has  required  that  after  the  regulation  has  been  in 
effect for 12 months, staff evaluate and report on the impact of the regulation. This 
report  will  be  presented  at  a  subsequent  Commission  meeting  that  is  open  to  the 
public. 

Comment 18: The regulation should include accommodation or exemptions for ves-
sels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  proposed  regulation  due  to  economic  hard-
ship.  The  commenter  provides  a  spreadsheet  summary  of  estimated  economic  im-
pacts the proposed regulation will place on five unnamed companies. 

Response:  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  proposed  regulation  due  to 
issues not related to safety may be accommodated by provisions of Section 2283, ‘‘Al-
ternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply with the regula-
tion. These may include cases of extreme financial hardship, provided that the peti-
tioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the 
petition, and that the proposed alternative fulfills the purpose of the proposed regu-
lation. See comment 11 and response thereto. 
Written Comments of Jeff Browning, Sause Brothers Ocean Towing Co. Inc. 

Comment 19: Unmanned barges are unable to manage ballast water through four 
of the five ballast water management options allowed by Section 2284 (near-coastal 
exchange,  retention,  alternative  ballast  water  treatment,  or  discharge  into  a  recep-
tion facility). 

Response: Vessels that are unable to comply with the regulation due to issues not 
related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alter-
natives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply with the regulation, 
provided that the petitioner includes all the data and information required to evalu-
ate the merits of the petition, and that the proposed alternative fulfills the purpose 
of the proposed regulation. 

In  addition,  Section  2284  allows  for  a  fifth  ballast  management  option  under  ex-
traordinary  circumstances,  which  allows  a  vessel  to  exchange  ballast  in  an  area 
agreed to by the Commission in consultation with the U.S. Coast Guard. Should an 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

unmanned  barge  choose  this  ballast  management  option,  it  will  be  in  compliance 
with the regulation. 

Comment  20:  In  most  cases,  Sause  Brothers,  Inc.  barges  are  able  to  take  on  and 
discharge  ballast  in  the  same  port,  or  minimize  the  amount  of  ballast  transported 
between ports. 

Response: If the ballast water is taken on and discharged in the same place, and 
is  not  mixed  with  water  from  another  port  or  place,  the  operation  is  in  compliance 
with  the  statute.  However,  if  a  vessel  discharges  ballast  water  from  one  port  or 
place in another port or place without undergoing ballast water management as de-
scribed in section 2284, the vessel will be in violation of the law. 

Comment  21:  Sause  Brothers,  Inc.  will  apply  their  existing  Federal  ballast  water 
plan  to  the  plans  for  vessels  that  operate  in  California.  An  excerpt  of  Sause  Broth-
ers’ Federal plan is included with the comment. 

Response:  The  requirement  to  maintain  a  vessel-specific  ballast  water  manage-
ment plan onboard is not required by the proposed regulation. Rather, this require-
ment is mandated by the enabling statute (The Marine Invasive Species Act, P.R.C. 
§ 71204). 

Comment  22:  Sause  Brothers  Inc.  vessels  that  have  operated  outside  U.S.  EEZ 
and  taken  on  ballast  water  less  than  200  nm  from  shore  typically  discharge  in  the 
next Captain of the Port (COTP) zone, discharge in the same COTP zone as uptake, 
or discharge prior to entering port. Vessels will not deviate or delay a voyage to ex-
change ballast water 200 nm from shore due to safety reasons. 

Response:  Under  the  proposed  regulation,  vessels  may  opt  to  manage  ballast 
water by exchanging 50 nm from shore. As such, vessels will not be required to devi-
ate to locations 200 nm from shore. 

Additionally, the requirement to manage ballast water originating from outside of 
the  Pacific  Coast  Region  is  not  addressed  by  the  proposed  regulation.  Rather,  re-
quirements for management of such ballast water are described in the enabling stat-
ue  (The  Marine  Invasive  Species  Act,  P.R.C.  § 71204.2).  If  ballast  water  originates 
from ports or places within the Pacific Coast Region, however, the proposed regula-
tion  will  require  vessels  to  manage  ballast  through  one  of  the  five  options  under 
Section 2284. 

Vessels  are  not  required  to  manage  ballast  water  if  faced  with  safety  issues  as 
described in Section 2281, and vessels unable to comply for reasons other than safe-
ty  may  petition  for  an  alternative  as  described  in  Section  2283.  See  comments  11, 
15, and 18, and response thereto. 

Comment  23:  If  Sause  Brothers,  Inc.  vessels  are  unable  to  conduct  ballast  man-
agement  practices  due  to  safety  issues  or  voyage  characteristics,  they  will  not  be 
prohibited from discharging minimal amounts operationally necessary. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers, as described in Sec-
tion 2281 of the proposed regulation. Vessels that are unable to comply with the reg-
ulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of 
Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply 
with the regulation, provided that the petitioner includes all the data and informa-
tion  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alter-
native fulfills the purpose of the proposed regulation. 

Following implementation of the proposed regulation, vessels that do not manage 
ballast water through one of the 5 management options of Section 2284, or through 
a petition for an alternative, will be in violation of the law. Violators may be subject 
to penalties set forth in the enabling statute, P.R.C. § 71204.2. 

Comment  24:  Sause  Brothers,  Inc.  requests  that  it  be  exempt  from  the  proposed 

regulation until ballast water reception facilities are available. 

Response:  Sause  Brothers  may  present  their  petition  and  proposal  for  an  alter-
native to the management practices to the Commission as described in Section 2283. 
Written  Comments  of  William  Douros,  National  Marine  Sanctuary  Program,  Na-

tional Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) 

Comment  25:  The  Northern  California  National  Marine  Sanctuaries  (Cordell 
Bank,  Gulf  of  the  Farallones,  and  Monterey  Bay)  view  non-native  species  introduc-
tions as a priority resource protection issue, and support the ballast water discharge 
restrictions  of  the  proposed  regulation.  The  Sanctuaries  would  like  to  coordinate 
with the CSLC on this issue in the future. 

Response: The CSLC appreciates the support of the Sanctuary Program and looks 

forward to continuing a working relationship with them. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

Written  Comments  of  Jon  Gurish,  California  Coastal  Conservancy  (letter  dated 

6/9/2005)—Late Comments 

Comment 26: Commenter questions why the proposed regulation does not require 
the  officer  in  charge  of  a  vessel  to  document  ballast  water  exchange  time  and  loca-
tion for purposes of audit. 

Response:  The  enabling  statute  requires  vessels  submit  information  on  date  and 
time  of  ballast  water  exchange  for  every  California  port  of  call  to  the  Commission 
(P.R.C. § 71205). As such, inclusion of the same requirements in the proposed regu-
lation would be redundant. 

Comment 27: The commenter believes that the placement of safety exemption lan-
guage near the beginning of the text of the proposed regulation discourages compli-
ance. 

Response: The Commission disagrees. Regardless of the textual order, the require-
ment  to  comply  with  the  regulation  is  mandatory.  Vessels  that  do  not  comply  will 
be in violation of the law and are subject to civil and/or criminal penalties. 

Comment  28:  The  commenter  questions  why  there  are  not  audit  requirements  to 

evaluate compliance. 

Response:  The  Commission  currently  conducts  a  vessel  inspection  program  for 
purposes  of  audit  and  compliance  evaluation,  as  mandated  by  P.R.C.  § 71206  of  the 
enabling statute. As such, inclusion of the same requirements in the proposed regu-
lation would be redundant. 
Written  Comments  of  John  Berge,  Pacific  Merchant  Shipping  Association  (2nd 

Letter, Dated 6–8–2005) 

Comment 29: PMSA suggests additional language to the proposed regulation that 
allows  vessels  to  petition  the  Commission  for  a  variance  to  the  proposed  regulation 
for reasons of vessel design or voyage duration. 

Response:  A  provision  for  petitions  of  alternatives  to  the  proposed  regulation  is 
already  included  in  the  current  version  of  the  proposed  regulation,  Section  2283, 
‘‘Alternatives.’’  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  regulation  due  to  issues 
not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alter-
natives.’’  These  may  include  vessels  that  unable  to  comply  for  reasons  of  vessel  de-
sign or voyage duration, provided that the petitioner includes all the data and infor-
mation required to evaluate the merits of the petition, and that the proposed alter-
native  fulfills  the  purpose  of  the  proposed  regulation.  Thus,  including  the  com-
menter’s suggested language would be redundant. 
Written  Comments  of  Capt.  Khush  Fritter,  K.P.  Fitter  &  Associates,  Inc.  (Letter 

Dated 6–9–2005)—Late Comment 

Comment  30a:  Ballast  operations  are  required  for  safe  cargo  operations.  De- 

ballasting and ballasting at sea can be unsafe and can cause stress on the hull. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers, as described in Sec-
tion 2281 of the proposed regulation. Vessels that are unable to comply with the reg-
ulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of 
Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply 
with the regulation, provided that the petitioner includes all the data and informa-
tion  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alter-
native fulfills the purpose of the proposed regulation. 

Comment  30b:  Statute  AB  433  prescribes  sedimentation  reduction  and  control, 

and should be addressed. 

Response: The comment does not pertain to the proposed regulation, and does not 
need  to  be  addressed.  Further,  sedimentation  reduction  and  control  was  not  man-
dated  in  AB  433  (2004),  by  which  the  controlling  statue  P.R.C.  § 71204.5  was  en-
acted. 

Comment  30c:  The  commenter  states  that  some  vessels  will  have  to  travel  75 
miles  offshore  and  remain  for  over  10  hours  to  conduct  exchange,  causing  longer 
routes, voyage delay, increased costs, and pose a danger for crew and vessels. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers, as described in Sec-
tion 2281 of the proposed regulation. Vessels that are unable to comply with the reg-
ulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of 
Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ These may include cases of extreme financial hardship. 
Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply with the regulation, provided 
that  the  petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to  evaluate  the 
merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the  purpose  of  the 
proposed regulation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

Comment 30d: The commenter states that there will be an increased risk of colli-

sion when vessels cross the Traffic Separation Scheme off the West Coast. 

Response:  The  proposed  regulation  does  not  define  routes  by  which  vessels  must 
travel in order to conduct ballast exchange. There is no legal shipping traffic scheme 
requiring  tankers  or  other  vessels  to  transit  50  nm  offshore  or  otherwise.  See  com-
ment 10a and response thereto. 

Comment  31a:  Mariners  on  foreign  flagged  vessels  will  give  highest  importance 
to IMO regulations, secondary importance to Federal regulations, and lowest impor-
tance to regional regulations different from Federal ones. The proposed regional reg-
ulations  will  likely  not  be  incorporated  into  documents  a  master  will  rely  upon  for 
guidance. 

Response:  Compliance  rates  by  foreign  vessels  for  other  CSLC  regulations  are 
very  high.  For  example,  the  requirement  to  manage  ballast  water  originating  out-
side the U.S. EEZ, has consistently exceed 90 percent since 2000 (P.R.C. § 71204.3). 
Therefore,  it  is  anticipated  that  compliance  rates  with  the  proposed  regulation  will 
also be very high. 

As  with  other  CSLC  regulations,  education  and  outreach  will  continue  with  the 
implementation  of  the  proposed  regulation,  with  the  goal  of  informing  mariners  of 
California state regulations. 

Comment 31b: K.P. Fitter and Associate, Inc. associated tugs and barges will find 

it difficult to comply with the proposed regulation. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers. Vessels that are un-
able to comply with the regulation due to issues not related to safety may be accom-
modated by provisions of Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for 
an  alternative  to  comply  with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  cases  of  extreme 
financial  hardship,  provided  that  the  petitioner  includes  all  the  data  and  informa-
tion  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alter-
native fulfills the purpose of the proposed regulation. 
Written Comments of Peter Korody, Indlandbotman’s Union of the Pacific 

Comment  32:  The  proposed  regulation  will  pose  serious  risk  to  crew  members  on 
tug boats, particularly when personnel must transfer from a tug to a barge in open 
ocean. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers, as described in Sec-
tion 2281 of the proposed regulation. Vessels that are unable to comply with the reg-
ulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of 
Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply 
with the regulation, provided that the petitioner includes all the data and informa-
tion  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alter-
native fulfills the purpose of the proposed regulation. See comment 33 and response 
hereto. 
Oral  comments  of  Jason  Lewis,  American  Waterways  Operators  (Public  Hearing 

transcript, 6/8/2005, Oakland) 

Comment  33:  Ballast  is  essential  for  the  safe  operation  of  tugs  and  barges.  The 
process of ballast water exchange as required by the proposed regulation can be im-
practical  and  unsafe,  because  it  requires  that  a  tug  or  other  small  boat  come  along 
side a barge and transfer of personnel between them. Articulated tug barges (ATB’s) 
can become disconnected and result in an uncontrolled barge. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers, as described in Sec-
tion 2281 of the proposed regulation. Vessels that are unable to comply with the reg-
ulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of 
Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply 
with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  cases  of  extreme  financial  hardship,  pro-
vided that the petitioner includes all the data and information required to evaluate 
the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the  purpose  of 
the proposed regulation. 

Comment  34:  The  States  of  Oregon  and  Washington  include  provisions  for  safety 

and feasibility regulations. 

Response:  The  proposed  regulation  makes  accommodation  for  safety  and  feasi-
bility. Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under condi-
tions  that  endanger  a  vessel,  its  crew,  and  its  passengers,  as  described  in  Section 
2281 of the proposed regulation. Vessels that are unable to comply with the regula-
tion  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of  Sec-
tion  2283,  ‘‘Alternatives.’’  Such  vessels  may  petition  for  an  alternative  to  comply 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  cases  of  extreme  financial  hardship,  pro-
vided that the petitioner includes all the data and information required to evaluate 
the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the  purpose  of 
the proposed regulation. 

Additionally, though the proposed regulation does provide safety exemptions as do 
neighboring  Pacific  states,  the  regulation  must  be  developed  pursuant  to  California 
statute  (P.R.C.  § 71204.2),  and  thus,  is  not  required  to  conform  with  regulations  of 
other U.S. states or countries. 

Comment  35:  The  shipping  industry’s  Ballast  Water  Coalition  has  reached  the 
conclusion that ballast water exchange for the tug and barge industry is inherently 
unsafe. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers, as described in Sec-
tion 2281 of the proposed regulation. Vessels that are unable to comply with the reg-
ulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions  of 
Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply 
with  the  regulation.  These  may  include  cases  of  extreme  financial  hardship,  pro-
vided that the petitioner includes all the data and information required to evaluate 
the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the  purpose  of 
the proposed regulation. 

In  addition,  the  proposed  regulations  allow  for  other  ballast  water  management 
options  in  addition  to  exchange.  Vessels  may  choose  to  retain  ballast,  use  an  alter-
native ballast management method (treatment system) approved by the Commission 
or USCG prior to the voyage, or discharge ballast to an approved reception facility. 
It  is  hoped  that  vessels  currently  unable  to  manage  ballast  through  exchange  will 
begin  actively  pursuing  alternative  management  options,  such  as  shore-based  or 
shipboard treatment system development. 

Comment 36: Ballast exchange is inherently unsafe for American Waterway Oper-
ators  (AWO)  members  and  vessel  owners  should  not  be  required  to  risk  the  lives 
of crew. 

Response: Vessels are not required to comply with the proposed regulation under 
conditions that endanger a vessel, its crew, and its passengers, as described in sec-
tion 2281, ‘‘Safety of Ballasting Operations.’’ 

Comment 37: The AWO requests that the proposed regulation use Washington as 
a  reference  for  the  development  of  them,  due  to  unique  nature  of  tugs  and  barges. 
Response:  Though  the  proposed  regulation  does  provide  safety  exemptions  as  do 
neighboring  Pacific  states,  the  regulation  must  be  developed  pursuant  to  California 
statute (P.R.C. § 71204.2). Conformity with regulations of other U.S. states or coun-
tries may not therefore be possible. 
Oral  Comments  of  John  Berge,  PMSA  (Public  Hearing  transcript,  6/8/2005, 

Oakland) 

Comment 38: PMSA views the goal to reduce the risk of invasive species introduc-
tions  between  coastal  U.S.  ports  as  the  next  logical  step  from  the  currently  regu-
lated  goal  of  preventing  invasions  from  outside  the  U.S.  EEZ.  Ballast  water  ex-
change is the only viable, current ballast management option, until technologies are 
developed to treat ballast water on-board a vessel. 

Response: Noted. The Commission agrees with the commenter. 
Comment 39: PMSA lauds and supports the Commission’s efforts to carefully ana-
lyze ballast water movements to formulate the proposed regulation. Though the pro-
posed  regulation  is  a  compromise  between  practicality  and  invasive  species  risk  re-
duction,  he  views  the  proposed  regulation  as  an  improvement  to  the  current  pro-
gram that places an acceptable burden on the shipping industry. 
Response: Noted. The Commission agrees with the commenter. 
Comment  40:  The  vast  majority  of  PMSA  members  will  be  able  to  comply  with 
the regulation without threatening their economic viability. However, a small num-
ber  of  ships  will  face  economic  difficulties  due  to  vessel  design  or  voyage  duration. 
Response:  Noted.  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  regulation  due  to 
issues not related to safety may be accommodated by provisions of Section 2283, ‘‘Al-
ternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to comply with the regula-
tion. These may include cases of extreme financial hardship, provided that the peti-
tioner  includes  all  the  data  and  information  required  to  evaluate  the  merits  of  the 
petition, and that the proposed alternative fulfills the purpose of the proposed regu-
lation. 

Comment  41:  Regulators  must  accommodate  the  small  population  of  vessels  that 
will be placed in an economically untenable situation due to vessel design, extended 
voyage duration, as required by P.R.C. § 71204.5(a). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

Response: The Commission considered the issue of vessel design and voyage dura-
tion  in  the  proposed  regulation,  and  as  such  included  Section  2283,  ‘‘Alternatives,’’ 
in  the  proposed  regulation.  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the  regulation 
due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  petition  the  Commission  for  a  ballast  man-
agement  alternative.  The  petitioner  must  provide  all  the  data  and  information  re-
quired to evaluate the merits of the petition, and that the proposed alternative must 
fulfill the purpose of the proposed regulation. Petitioners may include owners or op-
erators of vessels that are unable to comply for reasons of vessel design, voyage du-
ration, or economic hardship. 

Comment  42:  The  commenter  requests  the  completion  of  a  review  of  the  program 

6–12 months after implementation of the proposed regulation. 

Response:  A  report  reviewing  the  activities  of  the  larger  administrative  program 
(Marine  Invasive  Species  Program)  is  produced  biennially  as  mandated  by  the  Ma-
rine Invasive Species Act. The next report will be produced in January of 2007, ap-
proximately  16  months  after  the  implementation  of  the  proposed  regulation,  and 
will include the requested review. As such, a separate review and associated report 
would be redundant. See comment 17, and response thereto. 

Comment  43:  PMSA  is  dedicated  to  the  implementation  and  success  of  the  pro-
posed  regulation  and  ask  that  agencies  recognize  physical  and  logistical  limitations 
of vessels as the regulation moves forward. 

Response:  The  Commission  recognizes  the  safety,  physical,  and  logistical  limita-
tions  of  vessels  in  relation  to  the  proposed  regulation.  As  such,  accommodations 
have been included for vessels that encounter safety issues and other formidable dif-
ficulties  while  attempting  to  comply.  Vessels  are  not  required  to  comply  with  the 
proposed  regulation  under  conditions  that  endanger  a  vessel,  its  crew,  and  its  pas-
sengers,  as  described  in  Section  2281.  Vessels  that  are  unable  to  comply  with  the 
regulation  due  to  issues  not  related  to  safety  may  be  accommodated  by  provisions 
of Section 2283, ‘‘Alternatives.’’ Such vessels may petition for an alternative to com-
ply with the regulation. These may include cases of extreme financial hardship, pro-
vided that the petitioner includes all the data and information required to evaluate 
the  merits  of  the  petition,  and  that  the  proposed  alternative  fulfills  the  purpose  of 
the proposed regulation. 
Alternatives Determination 

The  State  Lands  Commission  has  determined  that  no  alternative  would  be  more 
effective  in  carrying  out  the  purpose  for  which  the  regulation  is  proposed  or  would 
be  as  effective  and  less  burdensome  to  affected  private  persons  than  the  proposed 
regulation. 
Local Mandate Determination 

The  proposed  regulations  do  not  impose  any  mandate  on  local  agencies  or  school 

districts. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:20 Nov 17, 2010 Jkt 062180 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62180.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

